Vol. I.B
CHAPTER I.
THE SPANISH EMBASSY.
Reader
! If thou art one of those rigidists who
look for a moral in a story, and seek after instruction
in a legend; who expect a homily in a nursery-tale,
and demand a moral treatise in a fiction; who deem
it sinful to entertain the imagination without improving
the heart, and regard as vanity whatever administers
to the taste and captivates the fancy, then close these
volumes with the reading of this paragraph; for they
will neither humour thee in thy prejudices, nor
strengthen
thee in thy philosophy. Yet, if thou canst be
content
to admire the lily upon its stalk, and the rose on
its stem, and will cease to search longer for fruits amid
flowers, thou mayst then turn in a right spirit to these
pages; and, should they fail to improve thy morals, to
add either grace to thy mind or dignity to thy intellect,
they may, perchance, have the no less pleasing power
of imparting cheerfulness to thy brow, of
communicating
warmth to thy bosom, and of infusing new
sensibilities
into thy soul; and while they spiritualize thy
imagination, they may not leave altogether untouched
thy heart.
The Peace of Paris, concluded in 1763 between
Great Britain and Portugal, France and Spain,
followed
a few days afterward by that of Hubertsberg, at
length put a period to the Seven Years' War, which
had converted the whole of Europe into one
gladiatorial
arena, where king contended with king for crown
and sceptre, and emperors wrestled together for
imperial
diadems. By this important treaty, the
government
of France reluctantly surrendered to the British
Lion her Canadian possessions, which he long had
surveyed with a wistful eye from his island-lair, and
coveted to embrace to his own royal range. The
surrender
of Canada compelled France to relinquish with
it a favourite and stupendous design she had cherished
for half a century, of drawing a cordon round the
English
colonies by means of a chain of military posts,
extending from the castle of Quebec to the fortress
of St. John in Louisiana, in order to secure her
influence
over the tribes of Indians that roamed the vast
wilderness between, and the more firmly to unite her
remote possessions along the Gulf of Mexico with those
in the north. The necessity of relinquishing Canada,
therefore, put an end to this vast project on the part
of France, for uniting the detached wings of her
American
empire; and as the territory of Louisiana was of
importance to her only as one of the pillars from which
to suspend this chain, she had come to a determination
to part with that also, if compelled to resign the former.
That this would be demanded of her by England, she
learned several weeks prior to the Peace of Paris,
and forthwith, by a secret compact, transferred it to
Spain, with which power she was then in alliance. By
this instrument, the island of Orleans, and all the
possessions
of France west of the Mississippi, were ceded
to Spain, and the French dominions in North America
extinguished. The promulgation of this secret
compact
did not take place, however, until two years
afterward
,
when Spain began to look towards her new
acquisitions.
Early one brilliant June morning in the year 1766,
the long repose of the peaceful citizens of New-Orleans
was unwontedly disturbed with a rumour, spread abroad
by certain fishermen in the market-place, that a small
Spanish vessel of war had been seen by them at sunset
the previous evening close in with the Rijolets, and
apparently standing towards the head of Lake Borgne,
which penetrates within two leagues of the rear of the
town. Scarcely had the alarmed burghers that chanced
to be abroad in the market-place at that hour of the
morning exchanged their opinions upon the probable
object that could bring the hostile stranger to their
remote
province, when the sharp sound of galloping
hoofs was borne noisily through the half-awakened
streets. A moment afterward, a
petit paysan
,
mounted
upon one of the wild colts that roam over the
prairies
of Louisiana, his leathern shirt and long black hair
streaming behind him in the wind, rode furiously into
the public
Plaza
.
His story, as he drew up suddenly amid a crowd
of anxious listeners, ran thus: that a war-lugger,
bearing the flag of Spain, had dropped anchor just at
dawn at the end of the lake nighest to the city; and
that a boat, bearing two horsemen, with their horses
saddled and richly-caparisoned, immediately put off
from her and approached the land. Whereupon,
mounting his nag, he had ridden at speed to convey
the news to the governor.
This startling intelligence spread like wildfire
throughout the town, and The Spaniard! the
Spaniard
!
was on every lip. The whole population was
soon astir, thronging not only the market-place, but the
Plaza
in front of the governor's palace; and while
they listened in the direction of the road leading
through Faubourg Declouif to the lake, as if
momentarily
expecting to hear the approach of the strangers,
their eyes were turned frequently towards the balcony
of the governor's window, in anxious waiting for his
appearance. The stirring news that had disturbed
the repose of the city had already been communicated
to him by an officer of his household.
In the mean time, many and various, as the fears and
hopes of those from whom they proceeded, were the
conjectures, buzzed about from one citizen to another,
as to the nature of this mysterious visit on the part of
the Spaniard. That it was of a hostile character, the
attitude in which France and Spain had for some time
stood to each other left little room for doubt. Yet the
small size of the vessel, and, consequently, the
inadequate
force she must bring, combined with the
disadvantageous
position for active hostilities which she had
taken up, seemed to promise intentions of a more
pacific
character than the prudent and timid dared to
believe
.
The situation of the French province of Louisiana
at this period, whether viewed in its civil, political, or
social relations, was peculiarly interesting. For many
years it had reposed under a benign and almost
patriarchal
government; and from its remote situation, and
the simple and pastoral habits of the people, it enjoyed
peace and healthy prosperity, while the green bosom
of maternal France was torn with feuds, and red with
the blood of conflicting warriors. At long intervals
of time, as chance directed some solitary vessel to its
distant port, rumours reached them of wars declared,
of sanguinary battles fought, and of kingdoms that had
changed masters; but, ere yet the far-travelled news
came to their ears, the wars had long ceased, the
grass had grown over the graves of the slain, and the
revolutions of empires had become matter of history.
Thus it happened that the long-existing hostilities
between
France and Spain had been amicably ended some
months, and, as one of the conditions of the treaty of
peace, Louisiana was ceded to Spain by the former
power, without the knowledge of the native inhabitants
of that lovely province; but they were not, however,
to be suffered much longer to remain in ignorance of
this transfer of their allegiance.
The inhabitants of the city of New-Orleans,
although
sharing the characteristics of burghers, and
exhibiting, in a greater or less degree, the peculiar
features
that men, herded together in a community, ever
B 2
present, possessed, nevertheless, in some measure, the
traits of the simple and quiet character of the
paysans
of the province, who were far removed from the
influence
of towns, and whose life was altogether pastoral.
The Marquis de la Caronde, a gray-headed warrior,
had long governed them, with a mildness of sway and
judicious exercise of power that, while it bound them
together as one family, won for himself the reverential
love of all hearts.
Besides the officers of his household, who were few
in number, advanced in years, and, like their master,
well worn in war, and a few substantial citizens, there
lived in the town several noble French families, whom
reverse fortunes and other causes had driven into exile.
Easily falling into the simple habits, and readily
adopting
the customs of their unostentatious fellow-citizens,
they soon became as plain and unassuming in their
manners and mode of life as their good neighbours,
while their days glided on with a calm, quiet tenour, in
which they derived more real peace and contentment
than they could have found amid the splendour and
luxuries they had left behind them. In nearly every
instance, the heads of these families had died on the
scaffold for political offences, or fallen on the field of
battletwo of them alone surviving.
These two old nobles, being as far advanced in life
as the venerable marquis, and of a rank nearly equal
to his own, regularly took an evening pipe with him in
the court of his
cabildo
, and, in times of intestine
trouble
,
volunteered to assist in his councils; when, the
weighty affairs discussed, the gray-headed trio would
sit over their glasses of ruby wine, and talk lovingly
and long of
la belle France
, discoursing, with sparkling
eyes and a tear on the cheek, of the glorious by-gone
days of Louis
le Grand
.
These ancient families were seven in number. In
each was a noble youth, born to titles, honours, and
domains
which he was never destined to sharetheir
names and those of their fathers having been struck
out ignominiously from the roll of France. Besides
a fair boy to each, and a small income saved from the
wreck of their confiscated estates, nothing remained
to the widowed mothers and the two old nobles. These
youths were nearly of the same age, of equal rank,
and were bound together by ties of friendship so close,
that the spirits of Damon and Pythias seemed to have
animated their bosoms. They were known everywhere
as
Les Sept Frres
, or the Seven Brothers. The
eldest, Alfrde Charleval, had not reached his
twenty-second
year, and Eugene de Thoyras, the youngest,
had scarcely passed his nineteenth summer. Noble
by birth, well-formed and handsome in their persons,
modest in speech and carriage, and possessing bold
and determined spirits, they constituted a gallant band,
who might be relied on whenever duty or chivalry
should call upon them to act. They were the pride of
the town and boast of the whole province,
maintaining
an extraordinary influence over the minds of the
provincial youth by their courage and gentle courtesy,
and over the hearts of the maidens by their comely
persons and chivalrous daring.
The governor had not yet made his appearance on
the balcony, from which he was wont to show himself
to the townspeople, and to address them on occasions
of a public nature. The anxiety of the multitude was
momentarily threatening to overstep the bounds of
civic decorum, when the governor's guard, which
formed the whole regular force of the province,
consisting
of some threescore grayheaded soldiers, issued
at a quick step from beneath the arched gateway that
led to the inner court of his palace. At this sight the
confidence of the doubtful among the crowd was
restored
,
and all were assured that proper steps would
be taken, either to receive the expected strangers with
suitable honours, or meet them at the pike's point, as
their present coming should prove of a friendly or
hostile
character.
Presently there was a cry from some one, who had
stationed himself far down the road that led towards
the lake, in order to give the signal of their approach,
and They come! They come! ran from lip to lip;
and the multitude was moved like the deep sea. The
governor at the same instant stepped forth upon the
balcony, clad in his long-disused military costume; his
snowy head covered with a well-worn gold-laced
chapeau
,
and his good sword girded to his side. He was
a fine specimen of the cavalier of the old school of
Louis Quinze. He was tall, dignified, and numbering
threescore years, which, from the fire in his eye and
the firmness of his carriage, sat upon him with the
lightness of youth. His face expressed remarkable
decision; but its soldier-like firmness was subdued by
the teachings of a gentle temper and benevolent spirit.
No sooner was he discovered, than a shout was
raised from the
Plaza
, which he acknowledged by
uncovering
his head and gracefully waving his chapeau
towards the multitude, while the sun shone upon his
flowing white hair, giving it the hue and brightness of
silver.
Peace,
mes enfans
, he said, in a tone of dignified
yet gentle command; I am informed that certain
strangers have landed in our province under the flag
of Spain, and are even now approaching the town. Let
them come peaceably. Let not a weapon be drawn
to oppose or intimidate them. Their mission is
peaceful
,
or they would be better supported than I am told
they are. Leave them with me, with whom,
doubtless
,
their business lies, and I will see that my
children
come to no harm, and that the honour of our
country be sacredly maintained. Ha! they are
already
at hand. Fontney, he added, in a lower tone,
turning to an officer who stood near him, see that the
groom leads my horse round to the palace gate! I
will meet them mounted like themselves.
While he was yet speaking, there were
approaching
,
at a slow pace, along the river road, two
horsemen
,
who, from the distance formally preserved
between
them, were plainly of different rank. The
foremost, who also seemed, from his bearing and age,
which might be about forty one or two, to be of the
highest consideration, was dressed in the cloth
armour
worn by Spanish cavaliers of the time,
enriched
with gold, and shining with polished steel; his
head was covered with a light casque of glittering
steel, and a short cloak of crimson velvet fell with
graceful negligence from his left shoulder. The
saddle
and housings of his horse, which touched the
earth with dainty steps, as if it spurned the ground and
fain would tread the air, were equally costly with the
apparel of the rider; his whole body, save alone his
arched neck, being covered with a fly-net of silver
threads, through which appeared the raven hue of his
glossy hide, shining like floss. His attendant wore a
curiously-fashioned suit of green and scarlet, with the
shield of Spain emblazoned on his breast, while the
crest of the same royal arms was embroidered on the
cuffs of his surcoat. In his left hand he bore a spear,
about which was rolled a gorgeous banner. Besides a
sword suspended at his belt, there hung at his
saddle-bow
a silver trumpet, chased with enormous royal
devices
.
The housings of his saddle also bore,
elaborately
wrought in silver, the same regal insignia. But
what more especially fixed the attention of the
observing
townsmen, and created no slight degree of
sensation
in their bosoms, was a body-guard of twelve
halberdiers
,
of gigantic stature, armed to the teeth, and
carrying shining battle-axes in their hands, marching
a few paces in the rear of the two horsemen.
In the mean while, the venerable marquis had
mounted his horse in the entrance of the
porte
coch
re
,
and, sallying into the square, no sooner
discovered
this formidable escort of the cavaliers, than he
commanded the captain of the guard to form his men
into a line in front of the palace, and hold himself in
readiness to give them, if necessary, a hostile
reception
.
Then riding a little way in advance of his
brave old guard, he stopped, facing the strangers;
and, surrounded by his officers, the gentlemen of his
household, and a thousand hearts that were beating
with anxious expectancy, awaited their approach.
When the Spaniards reached the termination of the
road on the verge of the square, they came to a halt.
The foremost, after communicating in a few words
with the horseman in his rear, then unfolded a small
white flag, and rode forward, looking about him with
careless ease as he pranced along into the
thronged
Plaza
. As he advanced, the crowd gave way on
either hand, leaving a broad path open up to the very
presence of the governor. When he had got within
five yards of the marquis, he reined his blood horse in
so shortly, though he scarce seemed to press the bridle,
that the animal reared with his fore feet in the air, and
threatened for an instant to fall backward on his rider;
but, while poised with this dangerous inclination to the
rearward, with a sharp blow of his spurred heel he
compelled him to leap fearfully forward; then, with an
almost imperceptible touch of the snaffle, and a single
word, caused the spirited animal to stand as still as if
he had suddenly been converted into stone. After
this brief passage of horsemanship, he waved his
snowy pennon above his head, and the remaining
horseman, galloping across the square, took up a
position
in his rear. Then, at a sign from the cavalier,
he disengaged his trumpet from his saddle-bow, and
blew upon it three loud blasts, such as a conqueror
gives when he demands the surrender of a beleaguered
city.
The Spanish cavalier now rose in his stirrups, and
proclaimed, in a loud voice,
I, Garcia Ramarez, count of Osma, in the name, and
by command of his Catholic majesty, Carlos the Third,
king of Spain, do herewith demand of Eugene Chartres,
marquis de la Caronde, late governor under France of
this province of Louisiana, that he forthwith surrender
the government thereof to the crown of Spain and into
my hands, as the representative of the said power:
the demand and surrender being in accordance with
the late peace made between Spain and France, and
the terms and conditions of the treaty.
As he ceased, the pursuivantsuch his office
showed
him to beblew three blasts still louder than the
first on his trumpet, and, at a signal from the Count of
Ramarez, unfolded from the spear a silken flag, on
which were represented, in the richest tints, the
gorgeous
arms of Spain. Elevating it above his head, he
flung its broad folds wide to the morning breeze, while
a murmur of indignation and surprise, like the sound
of an approaching tempest, rolled sullenly across the
Place d'Armes. The Marquis de la Caronde pressed
his sword-hilt with a firmer grasp; but age had
tempered
the fire of his blood, and, without betraying
farther
emotion, he calmly waited the issue. Without
heeding these palpable manifestations of resentment,
the Spaniard extended his hand towards the flag, and
cried, Behold the insignia of Spain and the emblem
of possession! Hear ye, all men present! I, Garcia
Ramarez, in the name of his Catholic majesty, do
now take possession of this province of Louisiana for
the crown of Spain. God and Don Carlos!
No sooner had the last words passed the lips of the
haughty Spaniard, than the indignant governor, his
brow crimsoned with shame at the insult, and his eye
flashing with the fires of stern resentment, replied in a
voice that rung defiance:
Sir Spaniard, thou hast hardly weighed the odds,
that thou comest to insult France in my person.
Neither of treaty nor of the ceding of provinces have
I heard until now! Eugene Chartres must have
higher
and less questionable authority than thine, Count
Osma, ere he give to Spain what he hath sworn to
keep for France. Depart, sir, with this answer.
Heed thy words, signor marquis, lest they become
darts to pierce thine own bosom, retorted the
Spaniard
,
his brow darkening. That peace hath been
ratified between Spain and France is true, on my
honour as a Castilian knight and gentleman. Ha!
did you speak, signor?
I did merely ask my friend, the Baron de
Thoyras
,
by my side, if it were not the Count of Ramarez
who slew his own brother, and kept an uncle shut up
in his strong tower at Osma, until death took pity on
him and gave him freedom. I did but ask this, and
no more, Sir Spaniard, replied the marquis, with the
cool, cutting irony of tone and manner that, it would
seem, none knew better how to employ.
Humph! And what said your friend in reply?
asked the immoveable Spaniard.
That I was right; the name of that Castilian
knight and gentleman being Garcia Ramarez.
What bearing has this upon the present, signor
marquis? demanded Ramarez, haughtily, biting his
lip to conceal the effect of the noble Frenchman's
words.
No more than this: If the honour of a `Castilian
knight and gentleman,' which you have pledged to us
in attestation of your veracity, be of no better metal
than the honour of the only one whom I have the
pleasure to know, added the governor, bowing low to
the Count of Osma, why, we had as well have your
naked word; for, though it may be a good round lie,
it will come coupled with no perjury.
The Count of Ramarez turned pale. The words of
the marquis had poisoned his heart, and his brow grew
dark with revenge. After a moment's silence, during
which he succeeded in keeping down and shutting
within his bosom all signs of emotion, he drew a
pacquet
from his breast, and, tossing it on the ground at
the feet of the governor's horse, said, in an even voice,
There lie papers that confirm what I have said;
though think not, he added, proudly, that a Ramarez
would produce written vouchers for his spoken word.
Thy parchments hold as little weight with me as
thy speech, said the governor, reining back as if he
would terminate the controversy. Until I receive
from my own good king the command to surrender
this province to thy Spanish king. I shall hold it until
the last drop of blood in my veins sink into its sand.
You forget, signor marquis, that the dungeons of
the Moro lie between thy paltry province and the
court of Versailles, said the Castilian, with a menace
in the quiet tone of voice in which he uttered the
warning.
They are not so deep as those of Osma, count,
retorted the governor, with a smile that awakened the
revengeful spirit of his antagonist.
With eyes burning like those of a tiger in his lair,
and lips compressed with concentrated rage, he
levelled
his sword and drove his spurs deep into the sides
of his horse, to bound forward and reach the veteran
marquis. The animal had scarce moved a muscle to
obey his fierce will, when the bridle was caught close
to the bit by a strong hand, and the horse thrust back
upon his haunches with such sudden force that the
rider
rolled from the saddle to the earth: the next
instant
a foot was pressed firmly on his breast, and the
point of his own sword was at his throat.
Hold, Renault! cried the governor to the person
whose skill and address had doubtless saved his life,
so unexpected to him was the Spaniard's abortive
attack
;
let him rise up! In Heaven's name, we want
no crossing blades with them if they will go in peace.
The person addressed was a young man of
extraordinary
personal beauty, seemingly perfect in face
and figure: as symmetrical in limb as a young
Apollo
,
while neither Greek nor Circassian ever presented
to the sculptor's chisel a finer head or a nobler
profile
.
His eyes were black, and his hair vied with the
plumage of the raven's wing in its jetty hue. His
complexion was dark, very dark; yet through the
brown of his manly cheek the red blood was seen as
if through a shadow, and richer far for the softness it
lent to it. At the command of the governor he
stepped
back from the humbled Spaniard; and, taking up
a slender pike, such as was used by the
courreurs du
bois
, or hunters of the prairies, which he had dropped
on seizing the horse, disappeared amid the crowd.
The Count of Osma rose slowly from the earth, and,
casting about him a glance of defiance, remounted his
steed, and was preparing to turn from the spot, when
his eye lighted on a flagstaff near him in front of the
Vol. I.C
quarters of the governor, on the lofty summit of which
floated the snow-white ensign of France. He
instantly
changed his intention, and, turning towards the spot
where he had left his halberdiers, made a signal with
his glove, when they rapidly advanced towards him,
and formed immediately in his rear, presenting a
formidable
front to any opponents. They were men of
huge stature, and formed both for strength and activity.
Besides their halberds or steel battle-axes, each
carried
,
slung across his back, a short arquebuss, and
wore at his side a ponderous sword, sheathed in a
massive iron scabbard. Breastplates of untanned hide
covered their broad chests. On their shoulders and
the upper parts of their arms they wore iron pieces;
while their heads were protected by scull-caps, woven
close with wire, so as to be at the same time both light
in weight, and capable of resisting a heavy stroke from
any formidable weapon. Their looks were as stern as
their garniture was warlike; while mustaches and
long heavy beards gave to their visages a still more
formidable appearance. It was plain that they had
been chosen for the present occasion, and were a sort
of gentlemen not to be lightly roused.
The public square in which the meeting between
these rival governors of France and Spain took place
was near the centre of the city, on one side bounded
by the river, and on the opposite one by the Cathedral
and governor's palace; while the two remaining sides,
facing north and south, were enclosed by
Moriscolooking
mansions, with deep, narrow windows
defended
by iron bars, vast portals opening into inner courts,
light verandahs, and flat roofs, and adorned with urns
and fantastic battlements, every available place upon
which was thronged with interested spectators of the
scene in the
Plaza
beneath. Near the centre of this
square, a little to the left, was the flagstaff, on which
floated, like a white cloud, the spotless banner of
France.
The Spaniard waited until his men had reached
him, when, with a single bound of his horse, he placed
himself at the foot of the staff, and, at one stroke of
his sword, severed the cord that kept the flag in its
elevated position, so that, fluttering and wildly floating
in the air, it descended like a stricken swan to the
ground. Ere it reached the earth it was caught by
the herald, and placed beneath him across his saddle.
Before several young townsmen could spring forward
to snatch it from its ignominious situation, by a bold
leap of his horse he placed the halberdiers between
himself and their vengeance, and gained the foot of the
staff beside the knight.
Ha, Caravello! you are at hand just as you are
wanted. Give me the Spanish flag! Halberds, form
close around me, and cleave to the chine whoever
dares attempt to break your front. Now for Don
Carlos and Spain!
With coolness and rapidity, he now began to attach
the Spanish colours to the line, the halberdiers at the
same time presenting with their glittering battle-axes a
bristling crescent on the side towards the governor and
his guards; and, before the latter could recover from
their surprise at this manuvre, or divine his
intentions
,
he had firmly fastened the flag to the dissevered
cord. The next instant they beheld it rising swiftly
into the air.
Death and St. Denis! He has done it in our
faces! Charge them, my brave guards! cried the
marquis, brandishing his sword and riding against the
firm phalanx of halberdiers; while his guards, with
loud cries, pressed forward to the rescue of their
dishonoured
flag, and to avenge the insult it had received.
Their advance, however, was soon checked by a
loud shout of triumph from the multitude; and, reining
up within five feet of the immoveable halberdiers, the
governor followed the direction of all eyes upward, and
beheld the Spanish ensign, ere yet it had reached the
summit of the pole, floating loose through the air, and
a light
courreur's
spear still vibrating in the mast.
Renault, the Quadroon! Bravo!
vive
Renault!
was heard from a hundred tongues, while the surprised
Spaniard, into whose hands the severed cord had
dropped, watched eagerly the course of the silken
banner
,
as, flashing in the morning sun, and gorgeous as a
rainbow, it floated off on the gentle winds. The stern
halberdiers and the veteran guard both arresting
themselves
in full career, and alike forgetful of their hostile
attitude, together with the whole multitude, turned their
gaze upward to this interesting object.
Now whirling round and round in wild gyrations;
now sailing outspread on the bosom of the wind; now
rustling its folds together, as the breeze turned it in its
flight, the beautiful thing floated long above the square.
At one moment it would sweep low over the heads of
the people; then, mocking their grasp, again rise
rapidly
,
in its ascent flying almost within reach of the hand
of some fair lady on the balconies.
The Spaniard watched its erratic motions with an
earnest and anxious gaze, aware of the ignominious
destiny that awaited it should it fall among the hostile
crowd; and once, as it swept past near his head, he
vainly attempted to secure it with his sword, but, only
piercing it, it eluded him, amid the derisive laugh of
the multitude. On his part, the noble old governor
enjoyed, with the keenest satisfaction, the defeat of the
Spaniard's object, and watched, with the eagerness of a
delighted child, its sportive circles through the air.
Standing on the battlement of one of the dwellings
on the south side of the square was a very young girl
of exceeding beauty; but, from the deep brown of her
cheek, and her flashing, dark eyes, as well as from the
costume of her head, it was clear that she was a
quadroone
.
Twice the winds had wafted their silken
plaything
almost within her reach, and now swept it a
third time close above her head, and bore it past her
in the direction of a square tower that rose from the
midst of the roof. Every eye watched its course
with breathless eagerness. It touched the tower
fluttered an instantand then a shout, mingled with
the deep execrations of the Spaniards, announced that
it had become entangled on a projecting point of the
stone. Instantly several young men were seen scaling
the front of the dwelling, aided by the light columns of
the verandah and the bars of the barricaded windows.
Les freres! vivant les frres!
was heard on
every
tongue, and all eyes were directed towards the
daring young men, who were seven in number, that
appeared on all parts of the front of the edifice, in
ambitious
and reckless rivalry to reach the flag. While
they were ascending, the quadroone girl, by an inner
staircase leading from the roof, gained the top of the
tower. Boldly stepping on the verge, she reached
down, and with great peril extricated the ensign.
The waving it once in triumph, she placed it beneath
her symmetrical little feet, and indignantly trampled
upon it.
Vive, Azlie! vive! bravissima!
rose
tumultuously
from the crowd below, and at the same
instant
the young men gained the battlement.
One or two of them were preparing to surmount the
tower, when she cried with a lofty energy, that, either
from the manner in which she spoke, or from the
extreme
beauty of the speaker, singularly enforced their
attention,
Stop, messieurs! The flag is mine, and shall be
given only to the defenders of our fair province.
Swear that you will hold Louisiana free of Spain and
all other power, save God and France, and it shall be
yours!
Her voice rung with the rich clearness of a clarion,
and her words were distinctly heard by those who stood
on the opposite side of the
Plaza
.
There was a smile of surprise on the faces of the
young nobles as she ceased, but the lovely girl was a
favourite with all; and, with the native gallantry of
their chivalrous land, now challenged both by
patriotism
and beauty, they, with one mind, felt inspired to
give solemnity and importance to what they at first
viewed with levity, and, in an elevated and serious
tone, answered,
We swear!
C 2
And, laying their right hands one upon the other,
they solemnly bowed their heads upon them: then
placing them upon their hearts, they looked up to
Heaven in attestation of their truth.
Then receive, each of ye noble youths, these
badges in remembrance of your oath.
As she spoke, she rent the flag into eight scarves,
and, casting one across her own bosom, threw the rest
from the tower at the feet of the young men. A loud
murmur of applause filled the air at this action, and,
taking up the brilliant scarves, they bound them across
their breasts. At this instant the report of some
fire-arm
was heard from the square, and the quadroone,
with a thrilling shriek, fell back upon the tower.
Every eye was turned upon the Spaniard, whom,
with a look of malicious triumph, they beheld in the
act of returning to a halberdier a blunderbuss which
he had discharged at her, as, relieved against the
sky, she presented a prominent mark to his deadly
aim, and a suitable victim to his vengeance.
Do them to the death! cried the governor; close
in upon the demons! Cut in pieces the Spanish
hounds.
Be firm and close about me, halberds! Present
them your faces, and retreat slowly, ordered the
Spaniard, coolly, as if most at home when dangers
thickened about him. Meet their charge with your
battle-axes, but let not a man leave his place to follow
up a blow. Keep firm and steady, and we shall yet
leave far behind us this pack of French wolves.
Led on by the marquis, the French guard rushed
forward with fierce cries; and, while the old warrior
sought to reach the Spanish chief, his men became
furiously
engaged hand to hand, helm to helm, with the
slowly-retreating halberdiers, who kept firmly together
in line, defending themselves with ponderous blows of
their battle-axes.
For a few moments the
mle
was terrific. The
roar of the heavy muskets of the guard, the sharp
ring of pistols, the clashing of swords, and the dull
sound of the strokes of the battle-axes, as they sunk
into breast or scull, were for a few seconds unceasing.
The marquis having made several ineffectual attempts
to break through the halberdiers, at length, by making
a
detour
by their flank, succeeded in getting near the
Count of Ramarez. With his herald by his side, the
latter was slowly retreating, step by step, at the head
of his men, coolly giving his orders, and enjoining
them to keep shoulder to shoulder, and steadily fall
back upon him; while, at times, seeing them hard
pressed, he would make in person a fierce charge
upon the guards, and, dispersing them, resume his
station
,
and conduct the retreat in the same regular order
as before.
Now shalt thou die the death, Count of Osma!
shouted the old warrior, as he found the path open
between
himself and the Spaniard.
Throwing his body far forward on the horse as he
spoke, he spurred towards him and made a desperate
lunge at his breast; but his sword met the resistance
of a shirt of mail worn beneath his splendid apparel,
and broke short to the hilt. The force of the blow,
nevertheless, nearly unhorsed the Spaniard, who,
speedily recovering his seat, dealt in return so
well-aimed
a stroke upon the head of his antagonist, that
he was stunned by it, and would have fallen from his
saddle but for the support of his stirrup: his terrified
horse, at the same time, swerved wildly on one side,
and, when he recovered from the shock, which he did
in a few seconds, he found himself separated from his
antagonist by the intervening bodies of the
halberdiers
.
At length, after defending themselves desperately
against such odds, fighting and winning every inch of
ground with their faces towards their enemies, the
hard-pressed halberdiers, aided by the skill and
coolness
of their chief, succeeded, with the loss of two of
their number, in extricating themselves from the
square, and reaching the entrance to the Borgne road.
Here the marquis, who had lost some of his best men
in the fray, finding nothing would be gained by
pursuit
,
recalled the guard, and permitted them to
continue
their retreat without farther molestation. Not
so the Seven Brothers! After delaying to bear the
wounded maiden to the rooms below, they now made
their appearance in the Place d'Armes. Separating
singly, they moved swiftly from group to group,
whispering
a few words to each young man they met, who,
the next moment, silently withdrew and disappeared
from the throng.
Weary, wounded, and sore with revenge, the
Spaniards
retreated rapidly towards the lake. At length,
through a distant opening in the trees, they were
gladdened
with the sight of their little vessel riding at
anchor
upon its placid breast. They hailed the broad
expanse of water with a shout of joy, and with
renewed
vigour marched towards the glittering beach.
They were yet a mile distant from the barge, when
a sound like the trampling of numerous horses fell
upon their ears from the direction of the city.
Looking
round with startled apprehensions, they beheld, to
their dismay, a body of fifty horsemen, armed with
sabres and courreur-pikes, emerging from the wood and
approaching them at full speed. The Count Osma
could discern that they were headed by several young
men distinguished by crimson scarfs, which were
streaming behind them as they rode.
Fly for your lives, my brave halberds! he
shouted
,
after watching for a few moments their swift
coming
.
To the boats! To the boats! We are in no
condition to withstand their mad charge.
With this rapid and energetic order he put spurs to
his horse, and, urging and encouraging his men
forward
,
fled towards the barge. But, finding the
pursuers
gained each moment on them, he bade his men do
their best if it came to blows, and, leaving them to
their fate, galloped onward, accompanied by his herald,
at the top of his horse's speed. In vain, however,
was the flight of those who were not mounted. Like
a whirlwind the pursuing troop came sweeping
towards
the beach; and, ere the halberdiers could turn
to show resistance, they were borne to the ground by
the mere weight of numbers, and trampled in the
earth by a hundred iron-shod hoofs. The work of
death was but of an instant's duration. Their armour
was no defence to themstrength and courage of no
avail! They fell as if a simoon of the desert had
swept over them!
Scarcely without pause, the conquering squadron
galloped onward to the lake side, in hot pursuit of the
two horsemen, who were flying along the sands as if
borne forward on the wings of the wind. The
foremost
of the pursuers, a dark, handsome youth,
undistinguished
by a scarf, and armed only with a spear,
who seemed to be one of the band that had gained the
lead by the superior speed of his horse, at length came
near the herald, and shouted to him to rein up. But
the fugitive, conspicuous with the white ensign of
France still wound about his body, continued to urge
his steed forward without heeding the call or looking
behind.
I will soon stop thy flight, gay bird! said the
youth, in a half tone; and rising, as he spoke, in his
stirrups, he threw himself far backward to give force
and energy to the blow, and launched his light spear
with such unerring aim, that, entering his body through
the folds of the flag, it passed out a third of its length
on the farther side.
The honour of France is redeemed, he said,
coming
,
with two or three tremendous bounds, alongside
of the herald's steed; and, while the two horses were
still flying like eagles along the sands, he seized the
tottering body, and, tearing the enerimsoned banner
from it, hurled it, still warm with life, to the ground.
Vive
, Renault! cried one of the
frres
, getting up
with him; this day hast thou saved the honour of our
belle province
. Thy hand, Renault! The drop of
Moorish blood in thy veins shall not come between
thee and my love. Let us be friends, brave Renault.
Noble Charleval, you have made this a happy
moment
to me! answered the youth, grasping the hand
extended to receive his with eloquent gratitude.
The young noble, then fastening the flag to his
sword, elevated it above his head, and, waving it in
triumph, continued his pursuit of the Spanish leader.
Intimidated by the slaughter of his men, and
witnessing
the fall of his attendant, the Spanish count
gored his horse to madness, reached, at length, his
barge, and, reckless of all save his own safety, leaped,
mounted as he was, into the midst of his men; while
his voice, commanding them, with oaths and menaces,
to put off from the land, could be heard above the
thunder of the hoofs of the pursuing horse. They
needed no urging; and, while the horsemen were yet
a hundred yards from the water's edge, the boat was
full that distance from the land, and its occupant
secure
from their vengeance. After seeing him embark,
and the vessel get under weigh and stand down the
lake, the party of horse, which was composed of young
townsmen, both creoles and quadroons, hastily raised
by the seven young nobles, returned in triumph to the
city.
CHAPTER II.
THE DEMAND OF SUBMISSION.
Defeated
, disgraced, and burning with revenge,
caused as much, doubtless, by the indignity offered to
his person and authority from his new subjects as by
the insult to his country, the Count of Osma retired to
the Havanna, whence he shortly afterward proceeded
to Spain, for the purpose of returning with a force
sufficient to bring the refractory Louisianians into
subjection, and avenging himself for his former
reception
.
But other affairs of higher importance then
engaging
the attention of the Cortes, farther attempts for
taking possession of the refractory province were, for
the present, suspended.
In the mean while, the citizens of Orleans fortified
their town, by erecting a low wall and digging a ditch
on the north side, and on the south by barricading the
outlets and spaces between the massive Spanish houses
that bounded it, which, by their height and the
thickness
of their walls, presented formidable barriers to
any hostile approach. The front on the river,
including
the public square before the governor's house,
was defended by a battery of cannon of heavy calibre,
which had been chiefly transferred from the ancient
fort of St. John, on Lake Ponchartrain, while the rear
was rendered inaccessible by impenetrable cypress
forests and numerous lagoons. Every man, from the
silver-haired grandsire to the beardless youth, became
a citizen soldier, each habitually wearing the harness
of warfare in the more peaceful pursuits of his daily
handicraft; and, from the general aspect of things, it
appeared to be the determination of the patriotic
Orleannois
to defend their fair province to the last.
But two years having elapsed without any farther
intelligence from the Spaniards, they relaxed their
vigilance
;
and, by degrees, laying aside its warlike
aspect
,
the city began to wear again its more befitting
civic character.
The venerable governor, overcome by the weight of
years, and worn out with long service, at length dying,
the citizens elected six of the most substantial burghers
to constitute a council for their rule and government.
This political change, however, was not effected
without
some opposition on the part of certain of the
better-born
among the townspeople and a small party of
young creoles, who were clamorous for the authority
to descend into the hands of the governor's only son,
a bold, impetuous, and wild young man, scarcely
twenty-three
years of age. The elected council,
nevertheless
,
firmly established itself, and the affairs of the
city and province went on prosperously, to the great
credit of the chosen rulers, while in the general thrift
Spain and its imperious demand was forgotten.
Such was the condition of things, when, in the
autumn
of 1769, a little more than two years and a half
after his defeat and departure, the Spanish governor
again made his appearance with a large force before
the city, and demanded its surrender. It is at this
crisis in the history of Louisiana that the first scene
in the second chapter of our story opens.
The Spanish fleet consisted of two brigantines, one
carrying ten and the other twelve carronades, a
polacca
schooner of six guns, and three one-masted
gunboats
,
each mounting a long eighteen-pounder on a
pivot in the bows, with an aggregate force on board of
seven hundred men, including one hundred and fifty
horsemen. On its first arrival it had anchored a
league below the city, whence the governor had
immediately
sent to demand its submission, and to
receive
,
in token thereof, the keys of the
government-house
and other rooms of state, giving the terrified
townsmen the six hours which intervened until sunset
to make up their minds, promising them a general
amnesty
if they quietly submitted, with the menacing
alternative
of being treated as rebels taken in arms if
they refused. This peremptory message was received
by the council at noon, and filled the town with
consternation
and alarm. Throngs of anxious and
excited
citizens rushed to the
Plaza
, and thence, flowing
towards the hall of council, which was in the
governor's
palace, thrust themselves into the chamber, and
by their cries, some for surrender, others for
defence
,
completed the disorder that already began to
find its way into this body of civic rulers. Five hours
of clamorous confusion passed away; the sun, at
whose setting their fate was to be decided, was already
low in the west, and yet no decisive steps had been
taken
either to comply with or resist the demand of
the Spaniard. As if the apple of discord had been
cast into it, the whole city was thrown into a state of
the wildest anarchy, and torn by opposing factions;
and, while menaced by a foe without, it seemed on the
eve of being a prey to a civil war within. The
members
of the council, at first divided as their interests or
patriotism prompted, or as their fears dictated, now
magnanimously forgot themselves, and, acting in
concert
,
patriotically determined to hold the city against
all comers, save their royal master Louis Quinze.
But the older and more reflecting portion of the
citizens
themselves, seeing that they were deserted by
France, and finding that farther opposition would be
not only useless, but draw upon their heads ruinous
consequences, were resolutely decided on submitting
to the Spanish domain; while many of the young
creoles
,
burning with hostility to Spain, and filled with
resentment against France, opposed every measure
for surrender, and fearlessly advanced the bold
proposition
that they should hold out the city and province
against both the powers of France and Spain, and
constitute
themselves a republic. Thus it happened that,
between the conflicting voices of three factions, each
so opposite to the other, the time set by the Spaniard
had nearly expired, and it was not yet determined
whether the city should give in its submission, or stand
stoutly on its defence. As the hour for returning an
answer approached, the council-chamber presented a
scene of disorder beyond the control of any authority
vested in the members of the council, who,
nevertheless
,
conspicuously seated upon their elevated cushions
of crimson damask at the extremity of the hall,
maintained
their municipal state and civic dignity, and,
like a rock against which the vexed surges idly beat,
continued to remain firm and unmoved in the position
they had assumed, while around them roared and
heaved the human sea which the breath of the
Spaniard
had agitated.
In the midst of this rife confusion and civic anarchy,
the report of a heavy gun shook the town. Its effect
was electrical. The uproar of voices ceased, as if the
angel of silence had waved his wing above the
multitude
,
and every eye was turned in the direction of the
Vol. I.D
windows that looked towards the setting sun, which,
appearing like a vast globe of heated iron suspended
in the sky, hung low near the horizon. They saw
that in less than half an hour it would disappear in the
bosom of the dark forest of cypresses which seemed to
girdle the earth; and the reflection that, ere it rose
again, their fair city might become the scene of
massacre
and conflagration, and their hearths desolate,
blanched the cheeks of many a husband and father;
and some of those present, who, the moment before,
were for maintaining the town against all odds, now
turned away from the sun to fix their eyes upon the
faces of the unwavering council with an imploring
eloquence
of expression that plainly betrayed the change
wrought in their feelings. A second report, still
nearer
than the first, shook the council-house to its
foundations
,
and had the effect of breaking the silence which
the other had produced, for instantly it was answered
by a deep murmur from the mass of the people, that
soon rose into a wild, inarticulate cry, mingled with
stern and fierce words.
There spoke loud warning, citizens, said the
president of the council, rising, and waving his hand
which held his baton of office, to command attention;
warning and menace to all traitors to France. If ye
be true men and loyal, fly forthwith to the defences,
and maintain the town!
To the defences, to the defences! shouted a tall,
dark young man, with a flowing crimson feather, tipped
with sable, in his slouched hat, as he forced his way
towards
the door with the hilt, and even the sharp point
of his sword, closely followed by a score of young men,
who manifested as little regard for the flesh and
doublets
of those burghers who stood in their path as did
their leader; but no one of the steadier citizens moved
to second them, and the shouts of those reckless
gallants
were drowned in the overwhelming cry from a
thousand voices of No defence! no defence!
Children of France, will ye become serfs to Spain?
suddenly cried a youth, in a plain gray capote, who
did not seem to be of their party, but whose words
showed that he also was for holding the town, though
it might be from other motives than those which
governed
the band of young men; will ye tarnish yonder
spotless standard, that floats in the evening sun like a
silver cloud? Shall the Spaniard again make a
saddlecloth
of the colours of France? Shame on ye,
Orleannois
!
Shame on ye, Frenchmen! Shame on ye,
Louisianians! How will your faces redden with the
blush of degradation when in the morning you behold
the flaunting ensign of Spain waving where yesterday
your country's banner waved! To the defences! to
the defences!
Vive
Spain!
vive
France! no Renault; no
quadroon
!
vive la republique!
confusedly filled the
apartment
from the various factions at these words, while
the uproar was so loud that the firing of a third gun
was only made manifest by a vivid flash like lightning
illuminating the hall, the extremities of which were
already
cast into gloom by the advancing shadows of
evening. At the same instant, a loud and appalling
cry of The Spaniard! The Spaniard! rent the air
from the multitude in the
Plaza
beneath, and, reaching
the ears of those within the council-chamber, the news
flew from lip to lip like wildfire.
They come! They come! were the thrilling
words that re-echoed through the vaulted chamber;
and the alarmed citizens, rushing to the windows and
balconies of the hall that overlooked the port, beheld
with fear and apprehension a Spanish brigantine of war
standing up the river under easy sail, with the gay
colours of Spain unfolded, and proudly flying above her
decks. Before they could interchange glances of
surprise
and consternation with each other at this hostile
spectacle, which, though anticipated, was not now
viewed without emotion, another vessel hove in sight
from behind the southern turret of the Alamda, with
the same royal ensign flashing in the sun that marked
the nation of the first; then came, not twice her length
behind, a light-rigged schooner, with slender masts like
pencils, and with the gliding motion of a swan, slowly
followed, one after the other, by three gunboats, each
moving steadily onward under the pressure of a
clumsy
latteen sail. The level beams of the setting sun,
already broken by the irregular outlines of the forest
into which it was sinking, were gilding sail and
streaming
pennant, flashing back from a thousand points of
steel on their decks, and exhibiting to the eyes of the
citizens their dark sides bristling with guns and lined
with armed men. After passing a little farther up the
river, in full view of every foreboding eye, at a signal
from the leading vessel, the whole squadron rounded
to and dropped anchor opposite the governor's palace,
with its broadsides bearing upon the town.
CHAPTER III.
SCENE IN THE COUNCIL-CHAMBER.
These
hostile proceedings had been watched in
silence
from the council-chamber up to this moment;
but now the excitement and alarm became terrific.
There was but one cry to be heard above all others,
and this was for instant
surrender!
To increase the
universal consternation, a boat filled with men, and
bearing the Spanish flag at the stern, was seen to put
off from the larger brigantine, and rapidly to approach
the shore. At this crisis, those careful citizens who
believed the preservation of their goods, families, and
homes, as well as their own safety, depended on
submission
to the Spanish dominion, became convinced of
the necessity of immediate action; and, resolving to
give up the town at all hazards, they were prepared
even to sacrifice their rulers, should such a step
become
necessary to effect their objects. Pressing back
into the hall, they thronged the forum, and loudly
called
upon them to give up the city. In vain were the
voices of the firm and loyal council raised to inspire
them, even at this last hour, with a spirit of resistance.
Surrender! Surrender! was the response that
sternly and menacingly met their words.
Never! cried the president of the council, in a
loud voice, which was responded to, not less
resolutely
,
by his colleagues.
What hinders us, fellow-citizens, from dragging
them down from their crimson cushions, and casting
them into the dungeons of the Calaboose if they
refuse
?
cried the young creole with the crimson plume,
in a tone as threatening as his language.
Be it so! firmly responded the undaunted
president
;
but never shall the province of Louisiana, or
the fair name of France, be dishonoured while it is in
our power to maintain either.
Bear down the tyrannical burghers! Down with
the false councillors! They count our blood as
water
!
We will be our own judges in this matter!
cried the infuriated townsmen, pressing forward upon
the steps of the forum.
Here, each man as firm as his chief, stood the city
rulers, breasting, with a moral grandeur that could
have been the effect only of the purest patriotism, the
rage of their fellow-citizens, and ready even to make
sacrifice of life in defence of the lofty position they
had conscientiously assumed; for, by an unaccountable
silence on the part of France towards the provincials
in relation to their transfer, they had yet received no
official intimation of it, and had no other ground to
believe that such a cession had been made than what
was implied in the haughty demand of Spain.
Therefore
,
they resolutely and heroically determined to
maintain the province and its capital until they should
be formally commanded by France to surrender it to
the Spaniard. In the midst of these outcries, several
men, more bold or infuriated than their fellows, leaped
upon the forum, and one of them violently laid his
hand upon the breast of the president.
D 2
What would you, citizens, he demanded, in an
elevated but composed tone of voice, without
attempting
to resist his rude violence, that you bay us like
wolves? We but do our duty as your rulers!
Down with such rulers! We want no one to rule
over us! Hurl them from the forum! was shouted
from one extremity of the hall to the other.
Get possession of the keys, cried a short, swarthy
creole, with a lurking eye like a snake's, and a
forbidding
countenance, in a voice that rose above every
other in the crowd; the Spaniard will receive these
signs of submission from us as well from those
gray-beards
.
Holla, Carra! he continued, to the man who
held the president in his grasp, if they will not yield
them quietly, take them by force.
The keys! Seize the keys! resounded from a
thousand tongues; and the man who had been
addressed
by name released his hold to wrest them from
his girdle, where, in anticipation of the demand for
them, the resolute ruler had placed them for
safe-keeping
but a few moments before; but they were too
securely
attached to it by a chain of steel to yield to his
extraordinary efforts to tear them away. As he was
about to make use of harsher means to gain
possession
of them, the low, swart individual who had given
the order to seize them, having with great exertions
succeeded in forcing his way through the tumultuous
throng, sprung like a lynx upon the forum. Then
drawing a dagger, he cut the belt that held them with
so free a hand, that the blood gushed forth from the
side of the president, and, dying the keys with
crimson
,
trickled freely to the ground. Instantly the arm
that dealt the blow was seized with a grasp so strong,
that the reeking weapon dropped from the unnerved
fingers to his feet.
Assassin! would you slay the old man?
demanded
,
at the same time, a voice of mingled indignation
and horror, as the other staggered backward with the
force with which the speaker hurled him from him.
Ha, Quadroon! he cried, fixing upon him a glance
of deadly hostility; thou shalt die for this! The
individual addressed, who was distinguished by a gray
capote negligently dropping from his left shoulder,
steadily met for an instant his vindictive gaze; and
then, without replying, save by a slightly contemptuous
curl of his lip, turned to the wounded president, and
asked, with sympathy as tender as his indignation at
the act of the assassin had been stern,
Thou art not much hurt, I trust, venerable sir?
No, Renault! no, boy! It might have been a
deeper cut but for my stout leathern belt; for it was
given with a good will and ready hand. As it is, 'tis
a mere needle scratch.
I will support thee, councillor!
Nay, good Renault, I need not thy arm. See,
thou hast already incurred their wrath. Take heed to
thyself, rather. Hear their cries! Will not even the
blood of their president appease their ferocity?
Give them the keys, father, said the young man,
as the cries for them grew louder and fiercer. It is
in vain to attempt to withstand this tornado of human
passion. Ha, Rascas, that blow was not so steadily
aimed as thy first one! he cried, arresting an
uplifted
dagger in the grasp of the revengeful creole who
had wounded the president; an old man's breast is a
better mark for thee than a young one's, who has an
eye to make thine quail and an arm quick enough to
turn aside a dagger from his heart!
As he spoke, he cast at his feet, for the second time,
the stiletto that before had been evidently aimed at the
president's life under the mask of securing the keys;
and the foiled assassin, maddened with rage and
disappointment
,
with a vow of fearful vengeance upon
his tongue, leaped from the forum and disappeared
among the crowd.
Thou hast, in defending me, placed thy life in
peril
,
brave Renault, said the president; leave me, lest
your blood be on my head!
Heed me not, venerable sir! Hear! they still
demand the keys of the Government House and
treasury! Thou canst no longer defend them but
with madness! Give them up, sir; save thy life and
those of thy colleagues, who, not less firm than
thyself
,
will nevertheless yield if thou dost!
Be it so, Renault, answered the president, with
emotion; the time has at length come for gray
hairs to learn wisdom from youth, and councillors to
be led by the son of a bondwoman. Nay, Renault,
I would not offend thee by my words! It shall be as
these madmen wish, who, if they may be suffered to
hold their household goods in peace, are content to
become
base servitors in the halls of the Spaniards. I
would rather my own wealthy bazar should be
despoiled
,
my own dear fireside made desolate by the
Castilian invader, and myself left without roof or rood,
than consent voluntarily to this degrading submission.
But be it as they cry out! Yet first I will return my
staff and seal of office to those from whom I derived
them. Behold, ye Orleannois! he cried, stretching
forth his arms to command their attention.
Then, solemnly taking from his hand his magisterial
signet-ring, on which were cut the arms of France, he
cast it into the midst of the people, disrobed himself
of his black gown, and broke in two pieces across the
railings of the forum his snow-white baton, which was
sprinkled with his own blood. Casting them on the
ground, he trampled them, with his robe, beneath his
feet, and continued,
Behold,
thus
do I dissolve the provincial council of
which ye are no longer worthy, and solemnly
extinguish
my office. Those crimson stains on ring and
baton do bear honourable witness that your council
have well maintained the honour of their city. That
council has now ceased to exist, and you are free to
fasten the yoke of Spain upon each others' necks.
Witness all of ye! that we pronounce ourselves clear
of this act of submission, and do wash our hands of it
before ye all. There lie the keys of your city at my
feet! Let him who is the basest slave among ye lift
them! Heaven grant, the dishonour that will have
come to them this day be washed away by the honest
blood with which they are stained!
There was a moment of irresolution at these words
on the part of those who crowded the forum, no man
present desiring to obtain possession of the keys at the
expense of the personal odium his words conveyed.
But the inaction was not of long duration; for an
extraordinary-looking
being, accoutred in a motley garb
of many colours, and wearing a fantastic,
high-crowned
red cap upon his head, his broad, farcical face
expressing
mingled cunning and idiocy, leaped like a cat
from the embrasure of the window above the forum,
whence he had been hitherto delightedly surveying the
exciting scene beneath, and lighted upon his feet in the
midst.
Bon diable!
he cried, in a singularly hoarse,
grating
voice, shall we fear to touch the jinglers,
gossips
,
now old white pow has done with 'um?
Lift them, Gobin! lift them! cried those around
him, as if his presence had suddenly relieved them
from an unenenviable responsibility.
Gobin's got the state-ring, he said, holding up his
fore finger, and exhibiting the broad carnelion signet
which the governor had cast away, and of which he
had unaccountably possessed himself; make me
governor
till the black Don comes to land, and I will take
up the keys!
Vive
Governor Gobin! bravo, motley! shouted
the multitude, between jest and earnest.
With a hoarse shriek of laughter he acknowledged
their assent, and, snatching the massive keys from the
floor, held them up for an instant before all eyes, and
then shook them, with idiotic glee, triumphantly in the
air. At this act, deafening cries of
Vive
Gobin!
Vive
the new governor! filled the hall, amid which the
idiot or jester, for his character seemed not to be
accurately
defined, attached them nimbly to the longest
fragment of the broken baton, arranged his grotesque
person in the cast-off robe of the president, and,
lifting
the staff high in his hand, bounded from the forum
upon the level shoulders of the crowd.
With loud hurrahs, and cries of Bear him to the
Spaniard! the multitude carried him above their
heads through the midst of the hall towards the door,
that they might, without farther delay, as evening was
rapidly approaching, lay the tokens of their
submission
at the feet of the Spanish governor. Before,
however, they could reach the outlet of the
councilroom
,
intelligence came that the boat they had seen
put off from the brigantine had touched the shore, and
landed two Spanish cavaliers, with a small party of
soldiers, who at that moment were together
advancing
across the Alamda towards the council-hall.
This announcement of the immediate presence of
their new masters had the effect of sobering, in a
degree
,
the agitated temper of the multitude; and cool
reflection on the position in which they had placed
themselves in relation to the Spaniards, took place of
the excited feelings by which they had hitherto been
governed. The power that they so fiercely had
sought, now that it was in their possession, they
trembled
to make use of; and, as the moment for
transferring
their allegiance to Spain approached, many of
those who, a brief while before, were the most violent
for this abject step, now felt returning patriotism, and
were ready, had it not been too late, to stand by the
councillors, and cheerfully aid them in maintaining the
town. This feeling of degradation was mingled with
a certain kind of shame, when their eyes rested on the
grotesque figure and grinning visage of their
mock-governor
,
who, they keenly felt, was now their only
head until the possession of the Spaniard; and those
who immediately supported him on their shoulders,
beginning also to entertain some not very flattering
notions of the pageant they were acting, would have
let him down bodily to the ground. But, divining their
purpose, the obstinate dignitary clung to their necks,
with his long, pliant feet, like a monkey, and, rapping
them over the head with his baton, bade them uphold
their lord and governor on peril of a broken sconce.
A retreating movement of the throng about the
entrance
,
such as subjects make when their masters walk
among themfor so early did the townsmen begin to
manifest the cringing spirit of subjectionnow caused
every anxious eye to turn in expectation and with
feverish
curiosity towards that quarter. Amid the
momentary
deep silence that at once settled over the
multitude was heard a rattling of swords, spurs, and
armour, and the heavy tread of soldiers approaching
through the paved corridor. In an instant afterward
there appeared in the doorway two Spanish cavaliers,
attended by a trumpeter and a guard of halberdiers.
The eldest of the two, whose locks were just touched
with silver where they had escaped from beneath his
helmet, was a handsome, bold-looking gentleman, richly
attired and gay with diamonds, chains, and nodding
plumes, with a stout sword at his side and pistols in his
belt; while the younger, whose years could not have
exceeded twenty-two, wore a plain undress of blue
cloth and an unornamented cap of the same colour, and
carried at his side only a slight small-sword in a
highly-polished
steel sheath. But the plainness of his
attire
served rather to display than obscure a form and
face which seemed to have been moulded to present
to every eye the perfection of manly beauty.
They paused a moment on the threshold, and
surveyed
with astonishment the disorganized multitude
which their eyes encountered, in the place of the
orderly
body of submissive councilmen they had
expected
to meet, ready to tender them, on bended knees, the
keys of the city.
For an instant they appeared to be overcome with
surprise; but, as if readily appreciating the cause of
so singular a scene, they advanced boldly into the
chamber, as far as the lane opened for them by the
submissive and awed townsmen would permit, and then
looked towards the forum as if to discover a head to
the multitude. But, seeing it also occupied by the
crowd, the eldest demanded, in a high and haughty
tone, who were the chief men of the province. There
was no response; for mingled fear and shame kept the
people silent; while one or two bared daggers
displayed
in the hands of those near him, and the menacing
looks of others, intimidated the jester, who, waving
his baton aloft, was on the eve of making answer
himself to the demand.
Have ye no ears? or do your tongues refuse their
office? said the cavalier, with irony; where hide
your rulers, that they do not appear and tender their
submission to Spain? he demanded, casting a stern
and inquiring glance around upon them.
Every face was involuntarily turned towards the
forum, where, nearly hidden by the throng, stood, in
grave silence, the president with his council; and loud
cries of Give back, citizens, let them be seen! at
once placed them in view before the retiring crowd,
and enabled the glance of the Spaniard, thither also
directed by theirs, to rest for the first time on this
dignified
body.
Ha! well discovered, signors! he said, on
recognising
their late official character by the black
gowns they had not, like their chief, yet thrown aside.
By the mass! we owe you little courtesy for the
grace of our reception. But let that pass! we shall
have time and occasion to better your manners when
we shall have settled the government. I come now to
receive your submission. Methinks, the sun being
down, it should be ready. So, give your attention, and
hear! In the name of his Catholic majesty, Carlos
III., king of Spain, I, Louis Garcilaso, do demand the
surrender, presently, of this province of Louisiana, to
his just rule and right; El Excmo, Seor Conde de
Osma, grande de Espana de primera clase,
gentilhombre
de Camara de S. M. con exercicio, &c., being
appointed governor thereof!
Sir Spaniard, answered the president, with quiet
dignity of manner, but not without evincing in the
tones of his voice some mortified feeling, in us you
address but the semblance of power! The provincial
council is dissolved, and its authority returned to the
people who gave it. They will themselves confer
with you, and doubtless will do it through the agency
of yonder excellent personage, whom, with more
justice
than they are conscious of, they have invested
with our late honours and authority.
The Spaniard's eyes followed the glance of the
sarcastic
speaker towards a quarter of the
council-chamber
where, hitherto concealed from his view by a
massive
column that intervened, as well as by the
obscurity
into which the twilight had cast that part of the
hall, was the jester elevated above the heads of the
crowd, and holding aloft proudly, and, seemingly to
himself, with great dignity, the broken baton, with the
state keys dangling from its extremity. For a few
seconds the astonished gaze of the Spaniard continued
to be riveted on the remarkable object it had so
unexpectedly
encountered. Gobin no sooner saw that
he was regarded, than he made some attempts to
arrange
the folds of the black robe about his
parti-coloured
person, settled his peaked cap more firmly on
his head, and, making a prefatory jingling of his keys,
cried out, in a loud voice,
Gramercy, brother Spaniard! We give thee peace
and welcome, thou and the rogues at thy back! albeit
we have a mind not to treat with thee, inasmuch as
thou hast but now discovered our august presence.
Approach and kneel, cap in hand, before us, and,
peradventure
,
it may be, we will graciously look over this
offence! Thus speaking, he flourished his keys in
the air, and rapped smartly his supporters over the
shoulders for endangering his equilibrium while he
was in the midst of his luminous address.
The Spaniard's brow darkened, and his eyes flashed
fire, while his young companion smiled with humour
at this ludicrous turn of the negotiation.
Are we mocked? he cried, in a voice that rung
through the vaulted hall.
Gently, sweet cousin! Be not ireful, lest it hinder
digestion! We will have nothing eaten in our realm
that is not like to be well digested; nor will we let
any man be choleric. Fair and softly, brother!
Gobin
the First reigneth here! Lo! I am governor! in
token whereof, behold the keys of state, my silken
gown and baton!
What means this mad mummery? demanded the
cavalier, looking first with stern inquiry at the
president
,
and then round at the multitude.
It being resolved, doth mean, that I am Gobin the
First, said the jester, instantly answering for himself,
being governor, council, and jester of this mighty
realm, which before had never governor with merit,
council with wisdom, nor jester with folly. Fear and
tremble.
So, we are made a jest of, slaves! shouted the
insulted
cavalier; and, drawing his sword, he laid the
flat sides of it with more good-will than gentleness on
the shoulders of those who stood between him and the
object of his indignation, and quickly opened a passage
towards him. As he approached, the jester began to
jingle the keys merrily, and, reckless of the
consequences
,
amused himself by encouraging with his voice
the fiery Spaniard in his attempts to reach him.
Bravely laid on, brother Don! Give Jean
Rascas
another thwack in his ribs, for he hath put a
poniard
aneath the ribs of a better man than thou, and,
besides
,
he hid a peascod in grandam's shoe last
Michaelmas
,
and it gave her the rheumatiz. Bravo! good
cavalier, prick that Pierre Lecat with the sharp end
also, brother, for he stole my red cock's feather to
make a weathercock for the town lamp-post. Stir 'um
up, cousin! Pummel 'um well! Bravo! thou didst
make gouty pre Brissot skip then quicker than he
hath done for a twenty year. Gad! devil a
podagratoe
will be left in the church, if thou hast the stirring
of 'um up, brother Spaniard! Ah, knaves, but you
are letting me a-down! Courage,
mes enfans!
Let
not your governor down to the common level! Ye
are the pillars of my empire! my chair of state! the
supporters of my throne! Bear up stoutly! for how,
if you let me a-down, shall I receive with proper
dignity
this valiant ambassador of my cousin Don Carlos!
Nay, then, brother don, and most puissant
plenipotentiary
,
harm not the fleshy pillars of the statethe
upbearers
of all the honour that remaineth in the
province
and
Here, deserted by his terrified bearers, who,
desirous
of consulting their own safety, fled as the
Spaniard
,
goaded to madness by the words of the clown,
effected an opening through the crowd to within a few
feet of the spot where they stood, Gobin the First
toppled
from his elevation towards the ground; but, ere
he touched the earth, where his foe the next instant
would have placed his foot upon his body, he arrested
his fall by fastening himself with wonderful activity
upon the backs of those nearest, and in an instant
recovered
his previous elevation. Then, skipping
lightly
from one man's head and shoulders to another's, he
reached the forum. Here, finding himself beyond the
present vengeance of his pursuer, he laughed
shriekingly
,
and jingled his keys with exulting delight. The
baffled Spaniard stood for an instant on the spot so
recently
deserted by the wily idiot, looking after him, as
he was effecting his singular escape, with an
expression
of doubt and irresolution, which he, however,
speedily put an end to by deliberately drawing from
his belt a long, slender pistolet, cocking and levelling
it as if about to fire.
Nay, nay! He is a foola natural! Do the
creature no harm! came from all parts of the hall;
while the idiot himself, with the vacillating and volatile
temper of his kind, emitting a fearful cry of mortal
terror, crouched down among the councillors, and
covered
his face with his hands.
The Spaniard quickly withdrew his finger from
the trigger, and, with a smile, replacing the weapon,
said, half aloud to himself, By my knighthood!
verily
am I an ass that I did not guess as much. In
absence
of wiser governors, I will needs treat with this
fool, who appeareth to be the only one that hath the
possession of his senses. If he deliver me the keys,
with the approbation of his subjects here, it will be a
surrender that will satisfy Ramarezthough, by the
rood! he would (if the council give them not into his
hands) that they should come to him through those of
a fair creole rather. Come hither, merry fool, he
added, addressing him in an encouraging tone; I will
not harm thee. Here is a trinket for thy red cap that
will out-jingle thy steel keys!
As he spoke, the good-humoured cavalier, whose
wrath had become appeased as suddenly as it had been
roused by what he believed to be a prepared insult to
his dignity and the demand of Spain, held up to his
view a silver chain, composed of numerous links of
little globular bells, such as the Arragonese cavaliers
were wont to suspend from their guitars when
serenading
their ladye-loves. As he moved it carelessly in
his fingers, it gave out silvery sounds that charmed
every ear with their sweetness. The terrified Gobin
removed his hands from his eyes, and looked
incredulously
,
and with a glance of suspicion, upon the
Spaniard
and his tempting offer. At length, encouraged by
the tones of his voice, and the glitter and wondrous
melody of the bawble, he gained confidence, andbut
without venturing from the shelter of the protecting
robes of the councillorscried,
Wilt give it to me, brother Spaniard?
It shall be thine for the keys, good fool.
And that long pistolet, good brother, again?
It shall not hurt thee. Nay, henceforth we are to
be friends.
Wilt thou not let Jean Rascas buffet me hither and
thither, then, at his will, valiant gossip?
Nay, he shall not hurt thee. Come and receive the
chain for thy keys.
Wilt be my champion when I am beset, and break
heads for me, gossip steel-cap?
Ay, good fool, and ribs too, an' it suit thy
humour
.
Good, cousin! I will come to thee.
He was about to spring from the forum into the
midst of the crowd, when, as if losing confidence, he
again drew back among the magistrates, saying, with
a shrewd, expressive smile upon his broad features,
In the multitude of councillors there is safety, good
brother of Spain!
Nay, Gobin, they are no longer rulers! Behold,
here, verily are the multitude of councillors, said the
Spaniard, looking round upon the assembled crowd with
a glance of slight contempt.
Gramercy for thee, long sword! Thou hast
spoken
truth!
Then quit them, wise fool!
Thou hast well said `wise fool!' My folly would
make me put my neck in reach o' thy sword for that
tinkling chain, whereas my wisdom keepeth me here
in safety. Wisdom causeth me to lose my chain, so
that my folly cause me not to lose my head!
I'faith, thou art both logical and wise, fool,
answered
the cavalier.
Marry, then, gossip, I'll tell thee a secret! 'Twas
the weight o' logic that cracked my brain, and folly
jumped in at the hole. Wisdom hath patched it up o'
the outside, but, as thou see'st, has made but sorry work
at it.
By the rood! thou art a merry jackanapes! I
will make thee my page; come hither.
I will not, lest, when thou catchest me, thou beat
me, anon, for old scores.
I will not lift a finger to thee, by my troth! But
it waxeth late apace, and I may not parley with thee
longer, fool.
Call me governor, and I will come to thee, gossip,
said Gobin, advancing. Thus speaking, he came
forward
from his shelter to the verge of the forum, and,
grotesquely assuming the dignity of the station with
which he had been so singularly invested, said, Nay,
again  but thou shalt come to me! So! advance,
brother of Spain. I am ready to treat with thee, but
he added, with wily care for his own personal interests,
do thou not forget to give me the bells!
They shall be thine, said the Spaniard, amused
E 2
at the diplomatic cunning evinced by his brother
potentate
.
Then, commanding his guard of halberdiers
to advance, and being joined by the handsome young
Spaniard who hitherto had taken no part in the scene,
he approached the forum through the dividing crowd,
when, coming into the immediate presence of the
jester
,
he adroitly chimed in with his extravagant humour,
and with gravity made him a profound obeisance.
Most high and might signor, Gobin the First,
governor
with merit, councillor with wisdom, and jester
with folly! We, poor subjects of Spain, do pay thee
homage as becometh us on bended knee!
Rise, brother Spain! said Gobin, reaching forth
his hand to raise him up.
Nay, good Signor Gobin, not till thou hast given
me the keys! Ha, buffoon! what royal signet hast
thou on thy finger? he instantly demanded,
springing
to his feet as the broad seal-ring for the first time
caught his eye.
It is the state signet, brother. Marry come up!
am I not governor?
It cannot be! exclaimed the Spaniard, looking
inquiringly
at the president of the council, who, with a
countenance between sadness and indignation, stood
not far from him.
The affirmative was too plainly expressed in the
peculiar
smile that passed over the president's features to
require words.
By mine honour! but this mummery hath had
deeper
meaning in the people's hearts than it shows upon
the surface! he cried, in a voice that startled every
ear, and drove the blood quicker through the veins.
He gazed sternly round upon the multitude as he
spoke, and then directed his glances suspiciously upon
the body of councillors, while his looks implied a
determination
of revenge that should measure the offence.
He believed now, that, in mockery and contempt of the
Spaniards, the citizens, in conjunction with their
councillors
,
seeing longer resistance would be fruitless, had
chosen to express their bitter feelings at their
compulsory
surrender in a shape that, while it served to cover
the humiliation of a formal submission, evinced their
scorn for their new masters. Without betraying his
suspicions in the fiery words that leaped to his lips, he
suppressed his emotions for a more suitable time, and
said to the jester in a dignified tone, from which all
trifling
had vanished,
You have indeed power to treat with me, poor
fool! Take this bawble in token of my sincerity, and
of my protection if you should e'er chance to need it.
As he spoke, he cast the chain of musical bells over
his head, and in turn received from the intimidated yet
delighted jester the state keys and seal. Holding them
up to their view, he then demanded of the president
and council if they were the same which they had
resigned
with their office.
The same! answered the president.
Enough, said the Spaniard, sternly.
Then, turning round to the multitude before him,
which was composed of nearly the whole body of the
citizens, and holding them up also to their eyes, he
cried, so that his voice reached the utmost extremity
of the hall, and was heard even in the
Plaza
without,
Do ye acknowledge these keys and this signet to
be the signs of your government and the token of your
submission?
A thousand tongues replied, as the tongue of one
man, in the affirmative.
It is well! ye have sanctioned with your voices
this act of your governor!
We have no governor! cried many in the throng.
You will have one ere the morrow's sun set, was
the stern and menacing reply of the cavalier. I ask,
do ye sanction this surrender of the signs of authority
which you have now witnessed, and acknowledge
yourselves
,
henceforth, loyal and obedient subjects of Spain?
A low, deep murmur of reluctant assent ran through
the assembly; but a few young men in the corridor,
ringing their swords upon the pavement, fiercely cried,
No! Spaniard, no!
Without regarding these words of hostile dissent, he
placed the signet ring and keys upon his sword, held
them up in the sight of every one, and cried,
Viva
Spain and Don Carlos! In the name of his Catholic
majesty, Carlos III., king of Spain and the Indies, I do
herewith receive the submission, and take formal and
solemn possession, of this city and isle of Orleans and
territory of Louisiana. God and Spain.
God and Spain! enthusiastically repeated the
youthful cavalier by his side; God and Spain!
responded
the halberdiers, clashing their battle-axes
together
;
the trumpets sounded a loud and triumphant
peal;
Vive
Spain!
Vive
Don Carlos! filled the air
from the fickle multitude, both in the hall and without,
while the thunder of answering artillery from the
Spanish
artillery shook the capital to its base, and sealed the
subjection of the province.
CHAPTER IV.
SCENE IN THE PLACE D'ARMES.
The
shadows of evening had fallen over the town, and
a moonlit twilight was already mingled with the sunset,
ere the Spaniard turned to leave the council-chamber,
bearing away with him, upon his sword, the signs of
submission
,
of which, in so extraordinary a manner, he had
possessed himself. As he retired from the forum, the
crowd gave back in silence before the advance of his stout
men-at-arms, and, passing through their midst, he
reached
the door leading out into the corridor without
molestation
;
though here and there a half-smothered
execration
from some about the entrance promised that the
power alone was wanting to create a reaction in the
multitude fearful to contemplate. Some such thoughts
seemed to pass through the mind of the cavalier, for he
hastened his steps; and, as he approached the door,
gave an order or two in a low tone to his halberdiers,
who immediately formed around him and his young
companion, with their glittering halberds in their hands,
presenting to the multitude an equal front on every
side. The broad staircase that led from the corridor
down to the wide portal opening into the
Plaza
, or
governor's square, by which they had ascended to the
council-chamber, they found so densely thronged with
citizens, who showed no disposition to retire, and so
obscured by the approaching night, that their progress
became sensibly slower, and, as the Spaniard thought,
more unnecessarily hindered by the pressing of the
townsmen than it had been in the hall. This
suspicion
became confirmed while they were descending
the staircase, and, before they had reached the foot of
it, they found themselves rudely borne against with
such manifestly hostile purposes by the sullen populace,
that they could no longer doubt their intentions; more
especially when they called to mind that the portion
of the townspeople thronging the corridor had given no
answering cry for Spain, and that from their quarter
proceeded the murmurs of dissent and hostility that
had reached their ears.
Methinks we are beset, signor, said the elder, in
an under tone, to his companion.
We are doubtless involved in the opposite faction,
that holds to the councillors, replied the other.
Nay, it seems to me to be rather the party that
cry neither France nor Spainthe adherents of
yonder
tall gallant in the portal with the red plume.
They constitute but a fraction of the populace, and
are mostly youths; but they appear, every one of
them, to have gathered here to oppose us. By the
good rood! I could wish thou hadst been in Spain ere
thou hadst put foot on shore with me, signor!
Heed me not, Garcilaso. At least thou wilt not
be alone in this strait. But they will not dare offer
violence in the very mouths of our cannon!
They seem likely to do so. But if we get once
on the outside, we can give them play. If these pent
fires break out while we are within, our blood will
have to quench them. In Heaven's name! they must
not set upon us in the house!
Hark, Garcilaso, to those cries without!
exclaimed
the younger. Halberdiers, be firm, and press
steadily through the portal! he instantly added, in a
cool, determined voice, but little raised above his
natural
tone.
The shouts he spoke of proceeded from a few
voices beyond the threshold in the open air, and
seemed
to be made for the purpose of ascertaining, at this
crisis, the popular feeling; but so determined were
they in their tone, and so evidently aiming at violence,
that the highest degree of precaution was called for on
the part of the small party; and, as the danger rose,
the two Spanish cavaliers showed no want of coolness
and steadiness of nerve to meet it. As they
proceeded
towards the outer door, the cries were more
decided
,
and the shouts of
Death to the Spaniard!
No Spain!
Vive la libert!
left them no room for mistaking
the temper of the people.
Methinks our tokens of authority avail us little,
he added to the younger, smiling; and removing, at
the same time, the signet ring and key from his sword,
he hid the latter in his breast and placed the former
upon his finger; then, grasping his weapon like a
man who intends to do service with it, he cried,
Advance your halberds and press right on, my
men! If any oppose you, cut them down!
Hear them, citizens! They would shed your
blood like water! cried the tall leader, conspicuous
by his crimson plume, as well as by his height, among
a score or two of young men who surrounded him,
leaning with seeming indifference, which their restless
eyes contradicted, upon bright, slender swords of
extraordinary
length, with which they were all armed;
each having also a crimson badge attached to the low
crown of his flapping chapeau. It is not yet too
late to save the city and province from the hand of
Ramarez and his minions! They have not possession.
Rally around me, and I will free you from this Spanish
yoke ere it is yet riveted! Let us make them
prisoners
,
and defy both Spain and France; ay, and the
tyrannical
council who would hold the town, not for love
of the town's honour, but to hold their own petty
power
,
which, with the new government, they know would
topple to the ground. To your homes, citizens, and
gird on your swords, and we will a second time expel
the Spaniards from the shores of Louisiana!
It is the young Sieur Caronde! cried several
voices around. He would free us from Spain, and
teach us disloyalty to France, to rule us himself with
his wild friends!
Vive la belle France! vive Louis
Quinze!
No Louis! no France! fiercely shouted the young
creoles, clashing their glittering swords together
menacingly
.
For a few moments tumultuous cries from
contending
factions rose loudly on the night air. Amid the
confusion and party excitement, the Spanish cavaliers,
preceded by their stanch men-at-arms, succeeded in
forcing their way through the portal, and into the midst
of the small band with crimson badges and long strait
swords that stood around it. Hitherto the Spaniards
had been pressed upon and jostled only by the crowd,
few of whom bore weapons, while most of them were
satisfied with this method of showing their hostility,
without resorting to one of a more sanguinary
character
.
But they had now suddenly come upon a small
but resolute band, led by a man who seemed fearless
as he was reckless and daring, and which appeared to
have waited patiently until the crowd had worried
them to the portal before they took an active part in
the scene; for no sooner did they issue beneath the
arch, than, lifting their swords, on which they had been
all the while negligently leaning (save when they
clashed them once together to give energy to their
declaration against France), the band threw themselves
desperately upon the halberdiers, crying,
A Caronde! a Caronde! No Spain! no Spain!
Cut down the Spanish bloodhounds!
Let us place our backs to this wall, Garcilaso,
said the younger cavalier, with the coolness of a
veteran
in scenes like the present, suiting the action to
the word. Spare not the sharp edges of your
battle-axes
,
men-at-arms! he added, as the tried halberdiers
met with terrific sweeps of their ponderous weapons
this sudden onset of the young men, shivering their
steels like weapons of glass. Nevertheless, short
daggers
and stilettoes instantly took the places of the
broken swords in their hands, and, like tigers thirsting
for blood, the fierce creoles leaped within the strokes,
which, if they had fallen, would have cloven them to
the chine, and buried their knives in the breasts of the
unwieldy soldiers ere they could ward off the sudden
blow.
Sound a rescue forthwith, Manuel, or the sharp
knives of these knaves will soon let your wind out
through your doublet! said the elder, parrying
successfully
,
as he spoke, a third thrust made at him by
the leader of the party over the heads of the
men-at-arms
,
whom he disdained to attack, and whose
weapons
he did not regard in his anxious wish to reach his
more distinguished adversary. Once, also, the
younger
Spaniard had crossed blades with him over the
fallen
body of a halberdier, but another stepping in to fill
up the gap, separated them almost as soon as they had
met.
Bravely dealt, halberds! Stand firm and receive
them, but let no man leave the ranks. There swung
a good stroke! Ha, that told better still! Fight
cheerily! They will soon tire of this rough play.
See, the populace take no part with them, and they
are scarce thrice our number. Bear up a little longer;
we shall soon have succour! were the cool and
inspiring
words of the younger cavalier to his men,
receiving
and turning aside, all the while he was speak
ing, deadly thrusts aimed at his breast by half a dozen
active assailants, who hovered around him,
endeavouring
,
between the descending strokes of the halberdiers,
to take him at 'vantage, but in which they were ever
foiled by his skill and coolness.
The attack, it was now apparent, was wholly made
by the small party of creoles alone that had
commenced
it, who, so far from being aided by the crowd
which, a few moments before, were so vociferous in
crying out Death to the Spaniard! were deserted
by their presence as soon as they saw them begin the
assault, for which, loudly and fiercely as they had
shouted, they were not altogether prepared. Few
passes, therefore, had been interchanged, before the
multitude began to retire from the ground on all sides,
leaving a wide space for the combatants. When the
cavaliers discovered that the populace were seized
with fear, and, at the sound of the trumpet loudly
winding a rescue, were hurriedly deserting the
Plaza
,
and pouring through the side streets to their homes,
lest, as it seemed, their giving countenance to the
affair
should bring upon them the indignation they had
sought to avert by their submission, they left their
position
by the wall and put themselves at the head of
the men-at-arms, made a sudden rush upon their
assailants
,
and broke through them with irresistible
force.
Cut them down, Orleannois! shouted the tall
young chief to his adherents, as he confronted and
crossed weapons with the elder Spanish cavalier.
Ha, Don Louis Garcilaso, he cried, with exultation,
we are well met!
Have at thee, swart creole! answered Don Louis,
in reply.
Their swords rung together, clashed, glittered in
the moon, came together again, and the steel of the
Spaniard was broken to the hilt. His antagonist
would have run him through the body at this
advantage
,
had not the younger Spaniard struck up his
sword and wounded him in the shoulder. But, being
Vol. I.F
instantly called upon to defend his own person, the
creole leader succeeded in running Don Louis through
the left arm ere he could use in his defence a sword
he had snatched from the grasp of one of the foe
whom he had slain with his own hand in the charge.
They press us hard, signor! The villains have
twice hit me! If you are saved, I am willing to die
like a bullock under their long knives! Ha! there
goes an answering gun from the brig! Ramarez will
soon send succour to us, and then, by the rood! these
knaves shall know what it is to assault a king's
messenger
.
Bear up stoutly, my brave halberds! By
the Cross! the noble fellows are falling fast around us!
This hath become a serious matter! Let us charge
them once more, my men! Swing your axes broadly,
and hew your way!
Dios  Santiago! shouted the younger, setting
the example by leaping, sword in hand, among them.
Dios  Santiago! responded the few halberdiers
that remained alive; for, out of fourteen men
composing
the guard, six had already fallen desperately
wounded or dead, though not without avenging
themselves
upon a larger number of their assailants. Dios
Santiago! they replied, and their heavy weapons
roared in the air as they swung them high above their
heads ere they let them descend among their
assailants
,
who, with a steadiness and ferocity of purpose
that would not be diverted from its course, met them
with courage equal to their own; and, with their long,
needle-like swords, inflicted upon them desperate
wounds, while, through their extraordinary activity,
they were enabled to elude the descending battle-axes.
At length, like a pair of noble stags worried by
hounds, the two cavaliers, with the loss of ten of their
men-at-arms, succeeded in reaching a marble fountain
in the midst of the square, where, with their backs
placed against it, they once more made a stand for
their lives. Hitherto it seemed to have been the sole
determination of their assailants to slay the whole
party
,
while the occasional cries of their chief showed
that, next to bloodshed, their purpose was to recover
the tokens of their submission. He now paused in
the fight, his sword entangled with that of the elder
Spaniard, and suddenly cried out, in a voice that
expressed
admiration for his courage,
Brave Spaniard! surrender the signet, and I will
withdraw my party!
Ha, Sieur Caronde, as methinks I heard men call
thee, art thou tired of the fight? or does the quick
sound of a hundred oars cleaving the water alarm you?
By the rood, thou shalt have the signet affixed to thy
death-warrant ere the sun rise!
It shall never be by thy hand, then, returned the
other, disengaging his sword, and making a back
stroke at his head, which, glancing from his helmet,
wounded him slightly in the neck, at the same time
that he cried, Set upon them, citizens! Let them
not bear off the signs of our disgraceful submission!
Strike for Orleans and liberty! Let not Louisiana
give herself up to Spain without dealing one good blow
for her honour! As he spoke, he made such fierce
lunges at the cavalier, whom alone he had singled out
through the whole fray, that he twice wounded him in
the breast, while, regardless of himself, he was
defending
his younger companion, who, standing in the dark
shadow cast by the fountain, was thrice nearly slain
ere he could see and parry the thrusts of two young
creoles who had set upon him.
The vile bourgeois press us hard, Garcilaso! he
said, having, by this diversion in his favour, recovered
his ground. Santa Maria! brave man, you reel,
and in this moonlight your face is white as the
marble
!
The villains have done for me, signor! This
demon
with the red feather has thrice put his sword
aneath my ribs.
You have given your life for mine, brave
Garcilaso
!
Thy blood shall not flow unavenged! It is the
signet he seeks. Deliver it into my charge, and they
will let you rest while they worry me.
No, Don Henrique, no! I feel better now! The
dizziness hath passed. I will yet avenge myself in
person on this fighting knight of the red plume.
Nay, Garcilaso, I will have the signet.
It shall not be, signor, while I have life to defend
it.
I will bear witness to thy valour, if thy wounds do
not! and, thus speaking, the young man suddenly
drew the massive seal from the finger of his
companion
,
and placed it on the fore finger of his own right
hand.
Knaves, behold what ye seek! he cried, holding
it so that the broad carnelion, reflecting the moonlight,
glowed like a coal of fire. Ha, Sir Creole! unless
you love an old soldier's blood better than this
blushing
seal of your bondage, press this way with your
sword! Ha! beware that assassin, Garcilaso! he
suddenly cried out, striking upward, as he spoke, a
stiletto in the hands of the creole leader as it was
glancing downward into the bosom of the elder
Spaniard
,
who, having grasped his sword anew, was about
to avenge his discomfiture. By this act, the young
man laid open his own breast to the same steel, which,
quicker than lightning, took a direction beneath his
arm into his side, the hilt at the same time closing
with such force against his chest as to cast him
violently
backward. He placed his hand quickly over
the wound; his sword fell at his feet; and, with a
groan of anguish, he swooned into the arms of his
friend.
You are not slain, signor! cried the brave Don
Louis, forgetful of the imminent peril of his own
situation
in his intense anxiety for the fate of the youth.
The lips of the young man moved inaudibly, and
then were silent; while the weight of the body on his
arm told that life was either suspended or had for ever
departed.
He is dead! he said, mournfully; and for a
moment
his enemies seemed to respect his sorrow, for
they paused around him, resting on their swords.
The flower of Spainthe rose of chivalrythe hope
of Castile is dead! Don Garcilaso, it is time for thee
to die! But I will fearfully avenge thee in my death,
brave and noble youth, he cried, in bitterness of
spirit
;
and, as tenderly as if he had been an infant, he
laid the head of the senseless youth upon the verge of
the marble basin of the fountain. Then, with the
spirit of his words, he snatched a battle-axe from the
grasp of one of the fallen halberdiers, and with the
strength that grief and revenge lend to desperation,
made a deadly assault upon the leader of the party,
who had, as he believed, slain his young friend.
If there be virtue in steel, demon, and strength to
wield it for thy punishment, thou shalt bite the dust
ere we part! he shouted, springing towards him like
an enraged lion.
In an instant the creole leader, who, with his own
hand, had slain five of the halberdiers, that, one after
the other, had placed themselves between him and
their captain, drew back, but it was only to gather
nerve for the encounter; for the next moment he
bounded forward, and, ere the cavalier, unused to the
ponderous weight of the battle-axe, and weakened by
his wounds, could bring it down upon his head, he had
closed with him, and seized the suspended arm
containing
the weapon while yet it was in the air, and
held it there with a grasp like iron. Quicker than
lightning he drew a stiletto from his sleeve, and aimed
it at his exposed breast. The Spaniard saw the gleam
of the sharp instrument as it flashed before his eyes,
and, involuntarily closing them, gave his soul to
Heaven
,
for death seemed inevitable and irresistible. But
quicker, if possible, than the movement of the creole,
were those of a third individual, suddenly appearing on
the scene of contest, who, seizing his rapid arm as the
point of the dagger pricked through the knight's vest,
and holding it not less firmly than he himself held the
elevated arm of the Spaniard, cried, with an exulting
laugh,
Ho, ho, gossip Jules! Gobin will not have cousin
F 2
Spain hurt! Did I not treat with him, and did he not
make a knee to Gobin! Nobody shall hurt a hair of
his head!
Release your grasp, mischievous fool! cried the
creole, fiercely.
If gossip will release his of brother Spain's arm,
said the idiot, with a peal of singularly hoarse
laughter.
Villain! idiot! devil! unhand me!
Let brother Spain go!
The creole suppressed a deep curse, and, with a
sudden exertion of strength, pushed the Spaniard from
him with such force that he reeled several steps ere
he could recover himself, and with the same hand
possessed
himself of the dagger, held hitherto useless in
that confined by the idiot.
Die, as a fool dieth! he cried, fiercely, aiming a
blow with it at the heart of the jester.
Overcome with sudden fear at this change in their
positions towards each other, the idiot stood paralysed,
without attempting to save himself from the glancing
steel, which was directed by an unerring hand
towards
his bosom. But at this instant an individual,
hitherto unseen, with a single bound, cleared the space
between the fountain and the creole, and, as the
dagger
was descending, severed, with a battle-axe he had
caught up, the hand that held it close at the wrist, so
that limb and weapon dropped together to the ground.
With a groan of suffering, and uttering, with an
execration
,
the name of Renault, the creole fell back
fainting among his friends, while the stranger retired
as suddenly as he had appeared. For an instant the
contest was suspended by this event, and the
Spaniard
,
on looking about him, was for the first time
conscious
that, of the fourteen halberdiers who, with the
trumpeter, had attended him to the council-chamber,
not one remained alive, all having fallen fighting,
single-handed
,
with the numbers that pressed them. But,
without reflecting upon this, he hastily retreated to the
spot by the fountain, from which the fight had drawn
him, where a moment before he had left the insensible
and apparently lifeless body of the young Spaniard for
the purpose of bearing it off, when, to his surprise, he
found it gone, a stain of blood on the white marble
alone marking the place where he had laid it. At
this discovery he uttered an exclamation of grief;
and, overpowered by his feelings, and weak from his
many wounds, tottered against a projection of the
fountain, and sunk down heavily to one knee, the keys
at the same time falling from his bosom to the ground.
In this condition his enemies saw him; and two or three
of them espying the keys, quitted their chief, and ran
towards him with shouts, levelling their swords as if to
transfix him on the spot. The sight aroused him from
the lethargy into which he was sinking; and, raising
his battle-axe, he hurled it towards them with such
force and steadiness of aim, that it sunk deep into the
forehead of the foremost, and checked the advance of
the others. He did not witness the effect of his blow;
for, as the halberd left his hand, he fell over on his
face to the earth. At this instant the barges of the
Spaniards touched the shore; and with trumpets
sounding
the onset, and loud cries of To the rescue! To
the rescue! they rapidly approached the scene of
contest. The cavalier raised his head at the noise,
and attempted to answer the cry, but his voice failed
him; and faintly muttering He will be avenged! he
again fell forward insensible.
CHAPTER V.
THE NIGHT LANDING.
Without
waiting to receive their charge, the
creoles
instantly collected their party, which had greatly
diminished in the fight, and, surrounding their wounded
chief, sullenly retired, bearing him in their midst
up the square towards the Cathedral. In the deep
shadow of its tower stood a group of horses saddled
and bridled, on which they threw themselves, still
bearing their leader, and, galloping through the town,
were soon lost to the eye and ear; while those
partisans
among the populace who had lingered behind to
witness the conflict precipitately fled through the
narrow
streets, leaving the advancing Spaniards, who
numbered about one hundred men, to take undisputed
possession of the
Plaza
. It was with an exclamation
of surprise and horror that the Spanish leader beheld,
when he reached the fountain, the bodies of the
halberdiers
and creoles strewn about, clinching each other
in the hostile embrace of death, showing how warmly,
and at what expense of life, the sanguinary contest had
been maintained by both parties.
Here hath been massacre most foul! he cried, as
the ghastly forms of the slaughtered were exhibited to
his eyes by the clear moonlight of the moon, which
shone almost with the brightness of day upon the
square; not one remaineth! Sancta Maria, save
us! If there lieth not Don Garcilaso, with his back
against the marble where he hath fallen! Lift him,
and see if he lives! By the cross of St. Andrew, this
night's work hath hung half Orleans by the neck ere
sunset to-morrow!
There is life in him, signor, answered one of the
soldiers, but he hath lost much blood.
Bear him to the brigantine, that he may presently
have the benefit of the skill of the chirurgeon. There,
too, glitter the keys, for which, doubtless, he hath been
assailed. Hand them hither, that I may take them to
Ramarez, for they betoken the city's surrender. Don
Henrique is missing too! Turn over every body on
the square! if he be among them, the bourgeois of
Orleans
had best let in the river through their dikes, and
die of honest suffocation, for they are sure to die, every
mother's son of them, by the gallows' rope else. Osma
will roar like a lion when he heareth this!
After a long and rigorous search and inspection of
the slain, the Spanish captain was compelled to believe
that the younger cavalier, in whom such extraordinary
interest had been manifested, had by some means
escaped
the fate of his party, and would, ere long,
reappear
in safety.
He hath met with some fair creole that hath lured
him from the fray, he said to one of his lieutenants;
for the youth liketh the glance of beauty's eye every
jot as well as the flash of the foeman's steel. He
doubtless hath done service enough for Mars in this
broil, and now hath listed in that of Cupid. Yet he must
not be left to seek romantic adventures alone in this
hostile city, lest he fall by the knife of some assassin.
We must despatch parties for his safety along the
different
streets. I would the count had come to land;
for, as matters are, it were expedient to take
possession
of the city at once.
He had scarcely spoken, when the roar of cannon
shook the ground on which they stood, and broadside
after broadside thundered over the city from the
Spanish
ships.
It is the signal of debarking; Ramarez hath
decided
on the very step. Now the saints intercede for
these bourgeois. If Ramarez do not fire their city, and
cast everything into the flames of it, the priest never
christened me Martin Gusman!
Amid the thunder of artillery, the roar of which was
redoubled as it rolled along the night air, a flotilla
of boats, swept by a hundred sparkling oars, left the
fleet, and approached the town with a swift but stately
movement. As it came nearer, there were distinctly
visible on the foremost barges the forms of
caparisoned
steeds shining with steel and silver; and standing
beside each, with foot in stirrup, was a horseman in
steel helmet and cuirass. On the stem of the
head-most
barge stood three cavaliers in glittering armour,
one of whom, distinguished less by his height than his
haughty carriage, wore a dazzling helm almost buried
in a cloud of sable feathers, while near him, a gigantic
Ethiopian was holding by the bit his charger, not less
sable in colour than his plumes. Beside him, with a
hand lightly laid upon the mane of a snow-white
Arabian
,
the bridle of which she held, was a beautiful
female
,
clad in green Turkish trousers, an azure vest
broidered with gold, and a light polished cap of steel
upon her head, shaded by a tuft of ostrich plumes not
less snowy than her steed. A golden belt that clasped
her slight waist contained a pair of pistols, and by her
side, in a sheath of fine gold, hung a rapier, the hilt of
which was studded with blazing diamonds.
When the barge touched the shore, she and the
cavalier
sprung upon the backs of their chargers, and
together
leaped to the land. They were instantly
followed
by the other cavaliers and the Moor, who took
his place on one side of the female. In a moment
afterward
,
bounding from the other barges as they
successively
touched the land, fifty horsemen were at their
backs.
Forward! cried the chief, pointing with his sword
in the direction of the fountain, which glittered in the
midst of the
Plaza
like a pile of snow.
Like a cloud of war rolling over the shaking earth,
the horsemen followed their fiery leader, and instantly
were on the scene of the late affray.
What is this that hath been done, Gusman? he
demanded, reining up near the Spanish captain, who
stood with his men among the slain.
It seems, signor, that Don Louis obtained the keys
of the city by some means, and that, in bearing them
away, he hath been desperately set upon. I found
them here by his body.
Nay, he is not slain? said the Spaniard, sternly.
Life hath weak hold on him, signor. He hath
been hard beset! As for the fourteen men-at-arms of
your own body-guard, here lie all that remains of them.
But the
Don Henrique is not among the slain, said the
captain, anticipating the question of the cavalier.
Hath search been made for him?
Most strict. He hath not fallen, or he would be
found among them. No one would bear off a dead
body.
But they might a wounded! Perchance they have
taken him prisoner.
Nay, my lord, I think he hath become prisoner to
beauty!
By the rood, I believe thou hast guessed it, shrewd
Gusman; for report hath it, that there is much room
for romance and adventure in this fair city; and the
gallant hath a temper that way, like the father who
begat him! We must not let him come to harm, if in
truth he do live, of which I have misgivings. Men
who would make such thorough work as I see around
me are not likely to let even one escape.
I think, sire, said the young girl who rode at his
side, and who was very beautiful, he hath been taken
prisoner, or worse hath happened to him. I know
well Don Henrique would not have deserted brave
Garcilaso when danger assailed him, though every
bright eye in Christendom were the recompense of his
treachery.
Not to mention thine own, Lil! But hist, girl!
your zeal hath put a bold word into your mouth, said
the Count of Osma, reprovingly; yet I think with
thee that he hath had foul treatment. Ride and
marshal
the troops as they land, Montejo, he added, to
the cavalier on his right; and you, fiery De Leon,
detach from them parties of thirty men each, to
penetrate
the town and occupy the guardhouses. Gusman,
I leave you to turn the cannon of yonder battery, and
plant them at the head of each outlet, so that, if the
bourgeois, who seem to be quiet enough now, are
disposed
to resistance, we can sweep them from their
streets. By the honour of a Spanish knight I will
unfold
in the glory of this moonlight the standard of
Spain, and the morning sun shall see it waving from
every tower.
The aidesdecamp lifted their richly-laced hats and
spurred away to obey the order, while Don Garcia,
with a careless eye, began to survey the noble edifice
of the hall of council, and the Cathedral, with its
massive
towers, flinging their black shadows half across the
Plaza
. The maiden, whose eye followed his,
suddenly
cried out,
Ha, signors! that is not a cloud in the sky!
It is the flag of France! cried the cavalier,
discerning
,
as the wind turned it broadly to the moon, the
ensign of France still waving on the summit of a tall
flagstaff in front of the hall of council; for no citizen,
however favourable he might be to the submission from
motives of personal interest, was found base enough to
strike it; and as Don Garcilaso had been too busy in
fighting his way through the square to do it himself,
it thus continued to wave far into the night proudly
upon its elevation until now, when it arrested the eye
of the Spanish governor. Let yonder white cloth
be dragged to the ground! he cried; I will take my
breakfast off it in the morning. I have not forgotten
the dishonour done to the Spanish flag on this very
spot, and now will I wipe out the insult then offered to
myself; as for this night's fresh work, I will make a
settlement at my leisure with the burgher gentlemen.
Tear the vile standard from its staff! he cried, to a
portly Aragonese riding near him, who combined in
his person the offices of herald and trumpeter, and in
its place, with sound of trumpet and roar of artillery,
let the proud ensign of Spain be lifted. We will
remain
here and see it done!
The herald unfolded the Spanish flag which he bore,
and, loosening his trumpet, spurred towards the
flagstaff
,
the foot of which, standing in the black shadow
of the southern tower of the Cathedral, was lost in the
gloom. An instant afterward there was heard in that
quarter a clashing of swords and quick hostile cries,
in the midst of which the ensign was seen to descend
to the earth, like a huge white bird lighting upon it.
Still the sounds of conflict continued growing each
moment louder and more determined.
There is more mischief on foot, cried the Count
of Osma, riding towards the place whence the sounds
proceeded.
Ere he was half way to the spot the noise of
fighting
ceased; when he had reached within a few yards
of the flagstaff, a horseman, with a white mantle
wrapped about his form and a crimson cloth cast over
his steed, passed before him like the wind, and the
next instant disappeared down a dark street, as if it
had been a winged spirit. His first impulse was to
follow in pursuit, foreboding something wrong; but,
hearing the plaintive voice of his herald Boviedo, he
continued on to the foot of the flagstaff, where, to his
surprise, he saw this personage unhorsed and on his
knees, bareheaded, and divested of his trumpet, who
no sooner beheld him than he began with clasped hands
to plead.
For the blessed Virgin's sake, and for the sake of
all the apostles, and for the sake of my poor wife and
six little ones, slay me not, good horseman!
Slay thee! Thy wife and little ones! Man, thou
wert never married! What mean these mouthed
lies, and this condition I find thee in? cried the
governor
,
his surprise and anger tempered by the
ludicrous
emotions excited by the scene.
It be thyself, then, noble count, cried the
corpulent
and sorely discomfited Boviedo, gaining his feet;
I am glad on't; I thought it had been that blanco
diable who set upon me as I was riding up
Silence, sirrah! Where is the French flag I saw
but now descending to the ground?
When I came riding up, excellentissimo, there was
a man or devil, I know not which, cutting at the cords
with a drawn sword. I courageously charged upon
him, when he turned him about and crossed blades
with me. I called stoutly for help
I'll be sworn thou didst.
Nay, but we had a mortal combat for a space, and,
if thou hadst been listening, thou wouldst have heard
the iron blows I laid upon him with my good sword,
like a sledge-hammer upon an anvil. I had nigh made
Vol. I.G
a jelly of him, excellentissimo, when down came the
white flag through the air, and, flapping before my
horse, so frightened him, that, what with his huge
plunges, I was thrown as thou seest. When I got to
my feet, I beheld mine enemy flying through the air
like a ghost with great red and white wings.
Villanous compound of garlic and hot pepper, thy
wits have fooled thee, or thou art a very knave! If
thou hadst as much courage as abdomen, thou wouldst
have saved the honour of Spain. Lying mess of
pottage that thou art, thou hast been unhorsed and
beaten, and he who did it hath escaped with the flag.
I would have forgiven him had he slain thee too.
Where is the Spanish ensign? By the immaculate
Virgin! if thou hast let him bear that away too, for
methinks he had its semblance thrown across his
saddle
,
thou hadst better never been born!
The poor herald made no reply; but, clasping the
fore legs of the count's horse, looked up
deprecatingly
,
the great grief that swelled his breast showing
itself
on his round merry visage, all unused to sorrow,
with a drollery of expression that disarmed the fierce
wrath of the knight.
Go to, poor braggart! If I had not heard the
clashing of the swords, I would cause my horse to
trample thee to death where thou grovellest!
Doubtless
thou hast been unfairly taken at 'vantage by one
bolder than thou! By the mass, he rode boldly for it!
When thou hast won with thine own hand another
horse from a bourgeois, I will, perchance, receive thee
again. Till then, let me not see thy face!
Thus speaking, the count released his steed from the
grasp of the disgraced herald, and galloped rapidly
away, venting his wrath, so suddenly averted from the
legitimate object of it, in deeply-uttered words of
vengeance
upon those who, from beginning to end, had so
daringly resisted his authority.
Cheer up, fat gossip! said a strange voice, as the
knight rode off; thou hast to thank thy belly for
saving
thy back; for, hadst thou had less stomach, thou
wouldst have have had more wit; when, Gad o'
mercy
!
the knight would ha' beat thee unconscionably.
Thank Heaven thou art a fool, brother! and then get
up from thy knees.
Don Boviedo, alarmed at the suddenness, and
appalled
by the singular hoarseness and depth of the
voice, looked around him on all sides, while these
words were addressed to him, in search of the
speaker
;
but, seeing no one, and fancying the voice to come
from the air, he became terrified, and, sticking to his
knees, began to pray lustily to every saint in the
calendar
.
Ha, Don Spaniolo, keep at thy prayers! for thou
art a sinner! art thou not? asked Gobin, who was
perched fifteen feet above him on the flagstaff, to which
place he had noiselessly descended from its lofty
summit
when the Count of Osma rode up. Art thou not
a sinner?
Yea, good Diabolus.
A very sinner? repeated Gobin, resolutely.
Yea am I, answered the Don, penitently.
Art thou not a rogue, Don Spaniolo?
That I am, a very rogue.
A most arrant coward?
Ay, good Diabolus, and a villanous coward.
Confess thyself the biggest liar in all Spain.
Or in all this province too.
Nay, I will not allow thee to lie better than I.
Man, I will put one more question to thee; and see
thou answer it roundly. Hast thou a rib o' the
woman-kind
?
Nay, good Diabolus, I have foresworn women
since I was a boy no higher than my knee.
Hast thou six small children?
Not a one.
I heard thee say so but now.
I lied.
Marry come up! what a thing is cowardice to
clean a sinner's conscience, soliloquized the jester,
looking down upon his penitent. Hear is a greasy
rogue, because he thinketh the horned Sathanas is cat,
echising him, makes clean work of it, and showeth
himself black as the pot. If I put a few more
questions
to him, I shall so clear him out that it will then
be a blessing to kill him, and send him to Heaven
before
he gets foul again. Lest I be tempted to do him
this charity, I will not ask him another question that
savours of purification. Come, gossip, get to thy feet,
for thou hast ne'er a horse to get to! Look up; I
am a sinner like thyself. I will not harm thee. If
thou wantest lodging, I will give it thee!
The Don took courage at his words; and, removing
his hands from his face, looked in the direction of his
voice, when, to his horror, he descried the jester, with
one leg clasped around the pole, hanging with his head
and hands downward. He was far from being
reassured
by this equivocal attitude of his new acquaintance,
and was about to give way to his superstitious terror,
when the
bouffon
, sliding swiftly down the staff to the
ground, turned a somerset towards him, and placed his
hand familiarly upon his bare head.
Poor gossip! Gobin pities thee, and will not mock
thee, he said, with singular feeling. Gossip has lost
his horse, his colours, and his master.
The poor Don groaned and hid his face, overcome
with the events he had reminded him of. Ay de mi!
ay de mi! he sighed.
I will help thee to get a horse, gossip, said Gobin.
Wilt thou? he cried, clasping him in his embrace;
and then, recoiling with an exclamation of horror at
the singular visage and extraordinary costume of the
idiot, he cried,
Avoid thee, Sathanas!
I am but a poor fool, said Gobin, encouragingly,
as if he had waywardly taken a kind and friendly
interest
in the unwieldy herald, of whose disgrace he had
been a witness, if not in part the cause of it, as he
evidently had borne a share in the disappearance of
the two standards. The encouraging tones of his
voice reassured him, and he asked eagerly,
Wilt thou, good fool, aid me to win another horse?
That will I, brother Pauncho, he replied,
assuming
his usual extravagant manner, and he shall have
saddle, bridle, and pistolets! Come along, gossip!
Verily, I will go with thee, good, speckled youth,
for I have none else to go with! Ay de mi! Boviedo,
hast thou come to this?
Thus lamenting and mourning, the sorrowful
Aragonese
suffered himself to be led away in the direction
of an obscure street by his new friend, who ludicrously
held him round the neck, and, as he went, breathed into
his ear such jests as in his cracked brain he deemed
best calculated to afford him consolation in his great
sorrow.
The count, in riding back, found the troops already
landed, to the number of two hundred and fifty
mounted
Leonese lances, and seven hundred footmen. His
orders were then rapidly given and put into execution;
and in half an hour afterward every guardhouse was
occupied by his soldiers, and the government-house and
hall of council surrounded by a select guard. Not a
citizen, save the horseman the governor had met, had
been seen in the streets, nor was a light now visible in
any dwelling; and, after the resounding footsteps of
the various detachments, as they marched along the
streets, had ceased, there was a repose upon the city
as deep as that upon some peaceful hamlet.
The horse, and five hundred of the foot that were
not detached for the guardhouses bivouacked in the
square, lying on their arms in groups around the
fountain
.
Near it was also pitched a snow-white tent, with
a bell-shaped canopy, richly bordered with broad silver
lace, upon the tall summit of which floated in the breeze
a Spanish standard, gayly displaying its brilliant hues
in the light of the moon, which, from her shield of
pearl, shed over the whole warlike scene that strange,
dreamy beauty in which romance and mystery so love
to wander and lose themselves.
G 2
CHAPTER VI.
THE WOUNDED CAVALIER.
The
same golden moonlight that shone upon the
marble
fountain, snowy pavilion, and men and steeds
picturesquely
grouped on the
Plaza
, entered through a
casement of one of those old
casas
that give to the
ancient
portion of New-Orleans the massive look of a
Morisco town, and fell upon the tesselated pavement of
a lofty apartment decorated with Oriental magnificence.
On a divan or ottoman in the deep recess of the
window
,
and nearly hidden in the shadow cast by the
ample
crimson curtains, the folds of which partly
concealed
it like a canopy, lay a youth in a profound sleep.
Save the twilight from the moonbeams that, like an
atmosphere
of silver dust, floated through the room, all
was buried in that misty, dreamy obscurity that is so
pleasing to the senses. Through a partly-opened
Venetian
door at the extremity of the chamber, opposite
to the casement, was seen a glimpse of the moonlit
court of the mansion, filled with flowers, which loaded
the air with fragrance, and a white column or two, just
visible through the foliage of lemon and orange trees
dropping with their golden fruit; while from an
invisible
fountain came the sound of water, falling on stone,
refreshingly to the ear.
The ottoman on which the sleeper reposed had, from
its position, evidently been drawn into the recess by
some watchful guardian of his slumbers, to escape the
moonbeams, while the rich Damascene hangings had
been carefully arranged around it so as more
effectually
to shade the face. But the moon had travelled
on through the sky, and now fell upon his forehead
like light falling upon marble. It was as alabaster,
save in the blue-tinted veins that the pencil of life had
painted beneath the skin. About his temples, which
throbbed with regular and even pulsation, as if sleep
was working a restoration in his system, clustered rich
chestnut hair, of the soft texture and of the silky, wavy
character of a beautiful child's. It was luxuriantly
long, after the fashion of the time, and lay in rich
masses
over the velvet cushion that pillowed his head. His
face was pale, like his brow, but not of the deadly,
wasting
pallor of prolonged disease, but as if caused by
sudden hurt in the midst of health and manly vigour,
like one who has been stricken down with ball or steel.
His features were of a noble cast, and were eminently
handsome. The manly mould, however, in which they
were shaped, on account of their extreme beauty,
scarcely redeemed them from the softness of a lovely
woman's, even aided as they were by the dark brown
mustache on his upper lip, and a certain expression of
decision impressed on the mouth. His complexion
was of a clear olive, from which suffering had drawn
the tint of health, leaving it now transparent and almost
colourless save a faint flush, scarcely perceptible on the
cheek, that might either proceed from returning life, or
be reflected upon it from the crimson hangings. He
was partly covered with a large creole manteau, which
left exposed his breast and one arm, together with a
hand of delicate whiteness and faultless symmetry, on
the least finger of which glittered an immense diamond,
like a glow-worm; while on the fore finger was
conspicuous
a massive ring, on the blood-red stone of which
was engraved the crest of France. He was dressed
in a plain blue coat, which was opened for his free
breathing, and displayed within the bosom the finest
Persian linen, bordered with lace from the best looms
of Brussels. On a low divan near him lay a blue
Andalusian
cap, and a sword, with a hilt in the form of a
cross, and heavy with precious stones, sheathed in a
scabbard of polished steel.
Like an infant he slept, so easy was his posture, and
so gentle and freely his breathing. Hitherto the
pleasant
sound of the falling water from the inner court had
soothed rather than disturbed him, while his sleep had
been too deep to be moved by the occasional warlike
notes of a distant trumpet after the landing of the Count
of Osma, the clattering of iron hoofs as horsemen
were sent on messages through the streets, or by the
heavy tramp of the armed bands that marched by to
occupy the guardhouses. It was now within an hour
of midnight; the city was in full possession of the
Spaniards, and these martial sounds had ceased to
awaken the echoes of night; and, save the distant
calls of sentinels, no noise penetrated the casement.
Suddenly the stillness of the apartment was broken by
a light footfall, and a female figure appeared in the
door that led from it into the cloistered court, and with
a gentle step, hesitating, half-retreating, approached
the sleeper. She saw, as she came near, that his
repose
continued unbroken, and with a noiseless
movement
of her arm was about to draw the curtain
farther
over the couch to shut out the moon; when some
sudden impulse arrested her hand; and, bending over
him, with the folds of the drapery held above him, she
gazed long upon his fair countenance with admiration
and sympathy. As she gazed she sighed, and in a
voice of music touchingly plaintive, murmured,
Such should the youth be whom my soul would
obey and my heart love. But, alas! I am outcast and
degraded, and can look on this noble brow only with
dishonour. There remains no bridegroom for the
doomed Quadroone but death; no bridal robe but the
winding mantle of the grave!
She sank on one knee upon a gorgeous mat beside
the divan as she spoke, and, with a hand hidden in the
clouds of raven tresses that fell over her bosom, bowed
her head upon her rounded arm, that unconsciously
rested on his couch, and seemed to be buried in deep
and painful thought. In a few moments her head
drooped upon her shoulder, and, gently sinking to the
pavement, she reclined against the divan in deep sleep.
How deep must have been the rest of the spirit of
the youth, to be unconscious of the presence of the
gentle sleeper at his pillow! At length the bell from
the Cathedral tower tolled the first stroke of midnight,
in that deep-mouthed tone which is so impressive when
heard in the stillness of night, as if Time himself spoke
warningly in its solemn voice. Slowly and heavily
rolled the successive volumes of sound along; now
swelling high on the air, now sinking fainter and far
distant to the ear, as the wind rose or fell, until the
last stroke, wafted thither by the breeze, rung out
clear and near, as if tolled close within the casement.
It startled from his repose the deep sleeper, who had
been mingling the chimes with a pleasant dream of
Castile, and who, quickly raising himself on his arm,
listened to the dying cadence of the sound as it grew
fainter and fainter in the distance; but, ere it ceased,
taking up the key, was heard the deep, sonorous voice
of a sentinel repeating his night-call, answered afar off
by another, cry answering cry, till silence once more
reigned without and within. The young man listened
in the same attitude for some moments, and then, with
a perplexed look, pressed his hand to his brow and
seemed to meditate. But gradually he allowed it to
fall again, and to rest upon the manteau which
covered
him, shaking his head as if at fault, puzzled, and
wholly unable to make clear to his mind his own
identity. All at once the carnelion signet on his
finger
caught his eye. He started with pleasure at this
key to his embarrassment, and comprehended instantly
the circumstances which had preceded his loss of
consciousness
:
at the same instant, he was made aware,
by a sharp pain in his side, caused by the suddenness
of his motion, of his being wounded.
I have been hurt, were the thoughts that passed
through his mind; and some good Christian hath
found me in a senseless state, and brought me
hither
!
He looked about him, and surveyed with wonder the
spacious apartment in which he found himself. Its
rich and luxurious decorations of ivory, marble, and
ebony; its hangings of damask, and divans of blue and
crimson silk; and the velvet couch on which he was
himself reclined, the moonbeams giving just sufficient
light to enable him to discern these, and appreciate the
Oriental elegance of everything around himthe
beauty
of the inner court, with its snow-white columns, its
foliage and flowers; the fragrance of the lemon and
citron trees that loaded the air; the clear ringing of
the falling fountain, and the voice of a mocking-bird
that at the moment filled the court with the melodious
warbling which, in that pleasant southern land, he ever
hails the midnight moon, all entranced his senses, and
filled his heart with joy.
If it were not for this ugly wound, which I now
well remember how I received, he said, I should
believe
I had fallen in the fray, and that this was
Paradise
to which I had awakened!
His glance at the instant rested on a hand and arm
like moulded pearl, laid upon the head of the ottoman.
His heart leaped to his mouth, and the blood darted
like lightning through his veins. He held his breath,
and stilled the throbbing of his bosom as he gazed.
Half in the moonlight, half in the shade, supported by
her arm, with her face hidden in the abundance of her
jetty hair that fell over it, reposed the most graceful
form his imagination could pencil.
Surely this is Paradise; and this is an Houri!
he exclaimed, as much in the tone of seriousness as in
the accents of gallantry.
The beauteous vision had brought the bright colour
to his cheek and the warmth of life to his brow; and,
bending over her, he saw, by the rising and falling of
her vesture, as well as by the relaxed and natural
position
of the limbs, that she slept. How beautiful was
the attitude of the sleeper! The polished and shapely
arm and dimpled hand, so faultless and finished in
their symmetry, with a raven tress or two thrown
upon it, contrasting its whiteness! What can
compare
with the glossy softness of those tresses, or the
blackness of their hue! They concealed all her face
and bosom like a veil, having escaped in their
wantonness
from a band of wrought silk that had been
gracefully bound above her forehead. Her vesture
was of the finest lawn, with large and loose sleeves,
open at the neck and breast, embroidered with gold,
and ornamented with little diamond buttons. She
wore drawers of the finest linen, deeply bordered with
lace, and around her waist, which was bewitchingly
small and elegantly turned, was tied a broad sash of
silk and gold folded together, the ends of which,
entwined
with precious stones, hung long from behind in
an exceedingly graceful manner to the knees. The
hand that was free lay negligently in her lap, and the
arm, like that beneath her head, was bare nearly to
the shoulder; but, unlike that, it was clasped with a
broad and solid gold bracelet set with rubies, while on
the fingers of the hand were several small gold rings
of delicate workmanship. Sleep, in her innocence, had
permitted one foot and ancle to escape from her robe,
and unconsciously display so much of the beautiful
limb as betrayed the matchless perfection of her
charming figure. Her slipper of golden tissue,
curiously
embroidered, had fallen off too, and a naked
little
foot, all warmth and beauty, and like a child's in
its minute and soft proportions, caught the moonlight
and finished the picture.
He gazed enchanted! He feared to move, to
breathe, lest it should be a beautiful spirit that had
watched his sleep, and he should frighten it away.
But the whole form was breathing with life, and he
knew it must be mortal. He laid his finger, as if to
test its humanity, on the hand by his pillow, as gently
as if it had been a timid dove he feared to startle from
its rest, and the touch thrilled to his heart.
She is mortal, and no creature of air! he
exclaimed
.
Whither has my adventurous fortune
wafted
me? What beauteous being hath love
commissioned
to attend upon me? Before I have beheld her
features, I am in love with that foot of pliant ivory,
and charmed with the beauty that floats around her
like a transparent cloud. If she wake not, I will lift
that virgin veil of raven tresses that enviously hides a
face which should be a match to, and, as it were,
gloriously
crown a form of such perfection.
He rose from the ottoman with the indolent motion
occasioned by the lingering influences of a sleeping
potion that had been administered to him, and with
the unsteady but graceful step of one whose natural
ease of manner is superior to physical suffering,
noiselessly
passed round her, as she slept with her face to
the moon, and knelt beside her, his person hid within
the shade of the hangings. For a moment he paused
to contemplate her, and admired the glossy waves of
hair profusely covering her arm and descending to the
pavement, with here and there, like shells of pearl
gleaming through the midnight waves of Indus,
glimpses
of her face and forehead.
It were sacrilege, he said, to lift this modest
veil which sleep hath cast over her beauty. Yet it
were discourtesy to Nature, who hath formed a thing
so beauteous, to leave it shut up in a casket. I will
dare the crime, if crime it be to gaze on beauty.
With a bold hand, but with a touch that would not
have waked an infant, he removd the raven tresses
from before her face, and held the shining mass so as
to shade the eyelids from the moon, for he would not
have waked her at that moment for an empire. Her
left cheek lay upon the arm in such a position as to
show only one side of the face in outline; but it was
the most perfect profile he had ever seen. From the
forehead to the chin, the line of beauty was drawn
with such grace and truth, that the intimate union of
soul with feature was presented with a fidelity that
mocked the imitative power of the pencil. He gazed
on the fair low forehead, just enough retreating to give
feminine dignity a place, and intellect its throne; on
the jetty and finely-curved eyebrows, laid in minute
lines, like the delicate vanes of a feather, themselves
appearing like two sable feathers, twins in beauty and
size; on the veined lids of the closed eyes, fringed
with an interlacing of lashes, both love's palisades and
battery, that swept the cheek; on the soft hue of that
cheek, just shaded by the warmth of the glowing
southern
sun, that loves the olive rather than the lily; on
the ripe lip, like a parted rosebud in which love lay
covert; upon the sweet, yet sad expression of the
mouth, left by her last melancholy thoughts, and which
sleep had sealed there ere it fled; on the chaste,
expressive
beauty of the whole reposing countenance!
he gazed, and wondered that aught of earthly
workmanship
could be so perfect, that moulded earth which
the breath of life hath warmed could prove so beautiful.
To all these charms, which, as he gazed upon them,
served to turn admiration into a softer emotion, was
added extreme youth, scarce seventeen springs having
served to unfold so fair a flower.
By'r lady! he said to himself, this divine
creature
would grace a throne, and these brows would add
lustre to a regal diadem! Were I emperor of Ind,
methinks I would become a peasant most willingly for
love of her. How calmly she slumbers! 'Tis thus
only innocence and childhood rest. Innocence is
written on each lineament; is part and parcel in the
compound of her beauty; wanting which, it would
lose its better principle. 'Tis to it what lustre is to
the sun, fragrance to the rose, vision to the eye'tis
the heaven of her loveliness. I will maintain, and
pledge my soul's bliss on it, that her cheek hath ne'er
been touched by guilty lip! Nor will I profane its
virgin purity, though the temptation had wellnigh but
now overcome my better feelings. Nay, I will leave
the cheek as pure as the envious moonbeam that,
unconscious
of the loveliness it shines upon, lies coldly
on it. Yet she hath watched my pillow, till, weary
with her vigil, sleep has overtaken her. Methinks it
will be no desecration to touch her cheek in gratitude.
Nay, I will do it like a brother who salutes a sister
who hath done him kindness. Ah, Don Henrique,
he added, smiling, thy arguments have little virtue at
the bottom! Cupid is a lying logician, and hath filled
thy heart with reasons which are against the sober
Vol. I.H
judgment of thy head, and which will ill bear the test
thy honour would try them by! 'Tis plain thou art
in love, or on the verge on't, for none but love would
teach thee sophistry so palpable, disguise foul wrong
under semblance of right, and into heaven-born
gratitude
convert the impulses of earthly passion! Yet
mine is not passion; 'tis love for the beautiful! If I
should touch her lip, it would be sinless of thoughts
or intent of wrong, as the worshipper devoutly doth
kiss the shrine of his devotion. Nay, I will just press
my lip to her hand; but if I were gently to kiss her
cheek it were not more bold. I will do it so lightly
that she will not wake; nay, will dream a fairy hath
lit upon it!
Thus reasoned Don Henrique with temptation, and
thus do men argue with themselves when they would
yield to what they have a will to do; outreasoning
conscience till she hath not an argument left in her
defence
,
and then, because she is silent, delude themselves
with the belief that she approves. As the young
Castilian
made up his mind to yield to the temptation, he
bent over the face of the fair sleeper with his bold lip.
Suddenly a hand was laid lightly upon his shoulder.
He started between guilty surprise and alarm, and,
looking quickly up, saw suspended above his head a
glittering stiletto ready to descend into his bosom,
while bending over him was a young man wearing the
rich habit of a chief of the
courreurs de bois
. He
was rather under the middle height, slightly but
elegantly
formed, with the symmetry of limb of a young
Apollo. His complexion was dark as an Italian's, and
his hair was black, and hung in glossy masses about
his bared and shapely neck. His features were lofty,
and of an enthusiastic cast, and cut with the accuracy
of finished sculpture, offering to the chisel of
Praxiteles
the model for a youthful warrior. They wore an
ingenuous expression, while the soft lashes that shaded
his eyes, notwithstanding the fire in them and the
quick blood in his brown cheek, betrayed a diffident
and retiring nature, and showed that to the bravery of
a man he united the bashfulness of a maiden.
His dress consisted of a short spencer of green
cloth, embroidered with myrtle leaves, the edges
turned
out with gold; buff boots of deer's hide, with
ample
tops, that came up to the calf of the leg, and then,
falling over, descended to the ancles again, with a
silver
fringe bordering it, and most becomingly setting
off the feet. An under-dress of the softest doeskin
closely fitting the limb; an inner vest of blue silk
laced with silver; buckskin hunting-gloves, that
covered
the whole wrist; a sable hat, with the broad flap
looped boldly up in front, secured with a brilliant, and
a dark green plume, that drooped low to his brows, with
a sprig of green myrtle stuck in the button,
completed
the costume. He wore a short curved sword,
in shape and size between a Turkish sabre and a
rapier
,
with a plain iron hilt, suspended by steel chainlets
from a belt of black leather, in which also were stuck
a pair of pistols, the handles ornamented with lions'
heads carved in silver, as was also the sheath of the
stiletto that he held in his hand; while a small
serpentine
bugle of elegant workmanship, chased with
devices
,
representing stags and hounds in full career, hung
beneath his arm.
His attitude was rather warning than threatening as
he bent over the young man, and reproof tempered the
flashing fire of his eyes as he fixed them upon the
handsome invalid's face, from which the blood, with
which the sight of beauty had mantled it, had once
more retreated, leaving it pale as when he slept; but
the collected and steady gaze of his eyes, and the
decision
of his compressed lip, showed it was the
paleness
of sudden surprise rather than that of fear.
For an instant the young man gazed down upon him
as he knelt beneath his extended arm, and then, with
a voice less in anger than in reproof, said,
Is this honourable recompense, noble Spaniard, to
sully the purity of a maiden's cheek who hath
watched
thy pillow till sleep hath overpowered her? with
wanton lip to insult the sister beneath the brother's
roof? Is it thus Castilian cavaliers repay deeds of
hospitality?
Signor! by mine honour as a Spanish gentleman,
said the youth, blushing with ingenuous shame at the
deserved rebuke, and, struck with his manly language
and noble self-restraint, experiencing, too, an instant
admiration for him, notwithstanding his hostile attitude,
I had never meant wrong to this maiden. Waking
from deep sleep, I found her slumbering by my couch,
and scarce believed she was not an angel. I rose,
knelt down by her side, and gazed enraptured on her
marvellous beauty. As I gazed, I thought that with
weary keeping of midnight vigil over my slumbers she
had sunk to sleep; and, while I thought this, gratitude
for her gentle service rose in my breast, and, rashly
tempted by her loveliness, I mingled gratitude with
worship; and with something of a brother's tenderness,
but without a thought that would not have borne the
Holy Virgin's scrutiny, I would have kissed her as she
slumbered. By my truth, fair sir, I have given thee
the measure of my offence!
The candour and openness of his defence, though it
did not altogether demonstrate the entire propriety of
the fraternal mode by which he had chosen to express
his grateful sense of a maiden's kindness, at once
changed the attitude of the two young men towards
each other, and the interest the Spaniard had felt
towards
the youth was instantly reciprocated by his own
bosom in return. Replacing in its scabbard the
shining
steel which a moment later would have penetrated
the heart of his seemingly false guest, he extended his
hand towards him with a frank smile, saying,
I would fain believe I did thee wrong, signor, in
suspecting thee of ill-requiting my hospitality. She is
a Quadroone, signor, and I thought thou hadst
presumed
on this to offer her thy licentious love. But Azlie
shall die by a brother's hand ere she share the fate to
which her degraded race is doomed! I am her
brother
;
she is dearer to me than liberty or life; and he who
dares insult her with lawless passion hath not an hour's
lease of life if Renault the Quadroon cross his path!
The young Spanish cavalier rose from his knee as
the quadroon extended his hand, and accepted it with
a friendly grasp, and then listened to his impassioned
words with wonder and the most lively interest. When
he had ceased, he asked earnestly,
What meanest thou by a Quadroone, brave Renault?
I am but recently from Spain, and though I have heard
often of the far-famed beauty of the creoles of
Louisiana
,
and something said of a lovely race of women
termed
quatr'-unes
, I knew not that they were not one
and the same.
I will first wake my sister, lest the cold marble
chill her tender limbs. She slumbers profoundly.
Poor child! she hath suffered much anxiety since the
arrival of your ships, signor, lest I should be brought
hither slain or wounded even as thou wast! I have
need to hold my life dearer than I do for her sake;
for if I fall, she hath only her own honour and pride
of spirit to defend her against injustice, with her trust
also in Heaven!
He spoke with a deep feeling, which awakened the
other's warmest sympathy. There was a brief silence
on the part of both, and then the cavalier, taking his
arm, said,
Let her sleep, Renault! It were rude to break
such sweet repose; nor can her head lie softer than on
the ivory arm that now pillows it! Thou mayst well
be proud to call so fair a creature
sister!
Is she not
most lovely?
Signor, said the quadroon, sadly following the
admiring eyes of the youthful Spaniard, and resting
them for a moment with affectionate gaze upon the
reclining
form, while his fraternal pride acknowledged
its wondrous beauty; Signor, thou hast well saidshe
is most lovely! It is this brilliant and most dangerous
beauty that will poison the cup of her young life! It
is this that arms a devoted brother with jealous
watchfulness
,
lest the prowling wolf come about his fold and
devour his only lamb! Yes, she is lovely and gentle,
H 2
and good as she is fair; Heaven avert evil from her
head, and turn aside the dark curse that hangs about
her race, that it may not descend upon her! Oh, thou
who art merciful and just, he cried, impassionately
kneeling on one knee, spreading his hands over her,
and lifting his tearful eyes towards Heaven; thou in
whose eyes all are equal save in guilt; who sees not
as man seeth, and judgest from the motives of the
heart rather than from the actions of the hand,
forgive
me if, to save the honour of one whom thou hast
given me to protect, I should one day set at liberty her
pure spirit!
While he was speaking the maiden lifted her head
from her arm, put back the shining veil of hair from
her temples, and gazed up into his eloquent face, her
large, glorious eyes filled with wonder.
Brother, she murmured as he ceased, and threw
around his neck her graceful arms, and for a moment
hung there like a tendril clinging to the stately trunk
it hath grown up with; Brother, she said again,
methinks
thou wert praying for me! There is no danger
threatens me that passeth thee by!
Nay, sweet sister! thou hast fallen asleep
unawares
,
he said, avoiding a direct reply: the cold
stone will penetrate this mat of Angola floss! Thou
hast not been a wakeful watcher to sleep on thy post.
I had affairs abroad in the city that kept me late, or I
would have relieved thee earlier. But see! thy
patient
hath little need of watching; nay, he added,
smiling and lifting her from her reclining position, I
came and found him watching thee!
The lovely Quadroone turned her eyes for the first
time from the face of her brother, and saw, standing
within the radiant moonlight, him whom she had left
sleeping now gazing upon her with mingled devotion
and admiration; for, if he had been charmed by her
beauty as she slept, he was now bewildered by the
light of her eyes and the sweet melody of her voice.
She blushed, and, turning with instinctive delicacy,
drew back within the shade of the curtain.
Thou seest he needs not thy farther care, Azlie.
Thy sleeping draught was drugged with health. Go,
now, and seek thine own pillow, which, but for the
stirring matters that kept me abroad, thy cheek should
have pressed four hours ago. In the morning the
signor
will thank thee for thy nursing; good-night.
He kissed her as he said this, with that delightful
tenderness that so becometh a guardian brother
towards
a sister.
Buenos noches! seor!
she said, as he released
her, in those mellow tones that the cavalier thought so
ravishing, and the like of which he thought he had
never heard save from the throat of the nightingale.
Then, bending her head with the modest salute of
parting courtesy beseeming a maiden towards a
handsome
young stranger, she retired slowly from the
apartment, with an easy, undulating, and almost
stately
motion; for, with all her loveliness and feminine
grace, there was a certain native stateliness in her air
and carriage as she walked that was only wanting to
complete her charms, and most agreeably harmonized
with her height, which was of that just stature that
cannot be described by words, and of which no sort of
idea can be conveyed in feet and inches.
CHAPTER VII.
THE CASTILIAN AND YOUNG COURREUR CHIEF.
Azelie
had some moments disappeared through the
door that led into the corridor, and her faintest
footfall
had for several seconds ceased to break the
stillness
of the distant cloister along which she retreated,
ere the youthful Castilian turned away his gaze from
the doorway where he had last seen her form relieved
against the moonlight that filled the court. He then
started only at the sound of the quadroon's voice,
who said, somewhat quickly,
Thou wouldst know, signor, something of the
Quadroone.
Renault, forgive me, for my youth and for her
peerless beauty! I will not offend again, said the
young man, observing his sensibility, and with
difficulty
appreciating his quick emotions; but he had to
learn, what Renault too painfully knew, that his
admiration
could be none other than guilty, and to herself
infamy; that in the cradle the mark of degradation is
placed upon the brow of the Quadroone, and that, in
the richness of her womanhood, no man can look upon
her with honourable love.
Sit on the divan, signor, for the pain of thy wound
hath drawn the blood from thy cheek. I will stand
here beside thee.
The young cavalier had, indeed, grown suddenly
pale on the departure of the fair creature, whose
presence
had raised him, almost supernaturally, above his
physical weakness. The wound he had received had
been inflicted rather with the blow of the dagger's
hilt than the steel itself, which, glancing from its
direction
,
but slightly entered his side, against which the
handle struck with the full force of the creole's arm.
The effect of this, nevertheless, was nearly as severe
as if the blade had entered deeper into his body, and,
as has been seen, had instantly deprived him of
consciousness
.
He had awaked, after five hours' sleep,
almost
entirely free from pain, and the sight of his
lovely
watcher had caused him to forget his wound
altogether
;
but her absence restored him to the
consciousness
of suffering; and he found, on placing his hand
instinctively upon his side, that the exertion he had
made in rising from the ottoman, with the subsequent
excitement, had opened his wound afresh. He gladly
availed himself, therefore, again of the downy pillows
of the ottoman. Reclining at length thereon, and
supporting
his face in his hand, he looked up into the
ingenuous
countenance of the quadroon as he leaned
against the casement, and said,
Proceed, noble Renault! I am deeply interested
in theeand, pardon me, thy gentle sister also; and I
fain would learn the mystery that seems to hang over
you both. Pray thee, go on!
I have no tale to fit the ear of pleasure or amuse
the idle, signor. Stern truths are told in few words.
I am a quadroon, the son of a bondwoman, and the
child of guilt. My father is the late Marquis de la
Caronde
,
once governor of this province; my mother a
Moorish slave, whom he freed at my birth. This is a
noble parentage, and a proud, signor! he said, his
fine lip curling with an expression of mingled scorn
and shame.
Caronde! Methinks I heard that name given to
the fierce youth who attacked our party.
You did, signor. We are brothers, save that he
was born under sanction of Holy Church.
Humph! said the other, with a comprehensive
glance; proceed, good Renault! Thou hast not
spoken
of thy sister yet.
This impatience, signor, promises evil to her who
is the object of it, said the quadroon, sternly; but
I need not warn thee of the danger which menaces him
who dares give his thoughts to my sister. Think no
more of her, and you will find me a friend. Breathe
her name again, and we are foes; for she can never
be thy leman, and thy wife she may not be!
I will not be angry, Renault; for doubtless thou
hast excuse, in thy condition, for this hasty jealousy.
Listen, and thou shalt learn. The quadroon is
of the fifth generation in descent, from the European
on one side and the Ethiopian slave on the other,
supposing no African intermixture of blood after that
of the original progenitor. Each generation growing
fairer, in the fifth the African blood is nearly lost, and
quite so in some instances. Nevertheless, the existing
law of this province against the intermarriage of
Europeans
with slaves extends to the descendants of slaves,
and are so wide as to embrace within its statute the
most remote descent from Ethiopian lineage,
forbidding
,
on the severest penalties, such unlawful
connexions
,
and declaring them unlawful. This refusal to
legalize marriages with the quadroones, who are
especially
aimed at by this law, has loosed the hymeneal
ties, and the mistress everywhere usurps the place of
the wife. It has at length become a system.
Quadroone
mothers, who have obtained their freedom at the
hand of their paramours, as naturally educate their
daughters to become like themselves, as do wedded
mothers theirs to become wives. The wealth that has
been lavished upon themselves they draw from its
hoarded coffers, to expend upon their daughters, in
developing
the charms of their persons, and adorning
them with those light and luxurious accomplishments
which will best fit them for the condition for which they
are destined. For this purpose some are sent even to
Europe to receive the more elegant part of their
tuition
;
returning, in after years, rich with those charms
and graces of person that fascinate and bewilder, but
with minds wholly destitute of moral culture; and, if
religious, superstitious; in person fitted to adorn
thrones; in soul too lamentably adapted to the
degrading
state for which they are so carefully educated.
Truly, that lovely angel who watched by my
pillow
Heaven has given her a brother! said the
quadroon
,
in a voice that spoke volumes to the heart of the
young Spaniard.
Renault! he repeated, and grasped his hand
impressively
,
as if to show his sympathy with him.
Renault
acknowledged it with a grateful look, and then
continued:
The number of quadroones in this city and
province
is large for the population: they are beautiful,
attractive, and fascinating
That I will asseverate, on my honour, said the
Spaniard, with youthful enthusiasm, as he recalled the
beauty of Azlie.
They are also rich, with few exceptions,
continued
Renault, without noticing his words, save by a
frown. Degraded virginsunwedded wives
dishonoured
mothers! But there have been exceptions
to this universal licentiousness. Quadroone maidens,
in whose breasts dwelt native purity of principlefor,
degraded as our race is, we are of mankind, signor,
and virtue may dwell with ushave risen above their
state of degradation, and, with virtuous indignation,
spurned the criminal proffers of licentious paramours.
But these exceptions are few, and sudden and violent
death has often been the reward of their virtue. What
had they to do with virtue? The honour of a
quadroone
!
Ha! ha! would it not be a rare jest for
gallants
to make merry with over their midnight cups!
Renault clinched his hand, and laughed with
ironical
bitterness as he said this; then, leaving the
casement
,
he made two or three rapid strides before it ere
he resumed his attitude.
You speak not of the male quadroonsof the
brotherof
yourself
, Renault, said the Spaniard,
after
waiting until he had recovered his composure.
The brothers are accounted useless; we can
administer
to no mother's vanityto no ruler's passion.
We
remain slaves, while
our sisters
become free; and
if we are free in our mothers' rights, or are made so
from a father's pride, who will not let his own blood
remain in bondage, we are suffered to grow up like
noxious plants by the road side, without culture and
without care. Signor, often does the brother present,
on his bended knee, the winecup of his lord, while he
is luxuriously reclining his head in the lap of his
beautiful
sister.
Heavens! is this thing so, Renault? cried the
youth, half rising from the divan, and looking
earnestly
in his face.
Had I the slavish spirit of bondage that becomes
my birth, I should, ere this, have done what I have now
named.
Explain, Renault!
Hear me, Spaniard! I have told thee that I am
the illegitimate son of the venerated Marquis of
Caronde
.
I loved him, and revere his memory. He
gave my mother her freedom, and with it followed
mine; for, by our laws, the fate of the offspring
follows
that of the mother. From childhood I was his
idol. He cherished me, educated me, spoiled me with
indulgence. The wealth and luxury around me I owe
to his munificence. He is now dead. Scarce had the
marble covered him ere his legitimate son, who had
ever hated me for our father's partiality, exhibited the
books of franchise, and challenged the judges to point
to the records of my mother's manumission.
It was there? asked the youth, eagerly.
The marquis had forgotten to record it.
And you became
On the instant, with ill-concealed exultation, he
proclaimed my mother, with her offspring,
slaves!
His own blood! It could not be.
You shall hear. He produced proof that his
father
had paid one thousand dollars in Spanish gold to
a Cuban slaver for her, and that she became his
property
;
but that he manumitted her afterward he defied
proof.
Well, interjected the deeply-interested Spaniard,
on observing him to pause, as if he could proceed no
farther.
Well, signor, she was adjudged to be his slave.
Wherefore should he wish this?
He cared not for the mother for her valuethere
was a deeper aim.
What motive so base that could lead him to desire
her return to bondage?
Hatred towards myself was the least.
But he surely hated not thy sister?
No, Spaniard, no, no! he did not
hate
her.
Ha! what? you do not mean to say that he
Loved her.
I did mean to speak these words, but could not.
I have spoken them. He loved her, Spaniard.
Intensely as he hated the brother, loved he the sister.
Not with a guilty love?
How else?
And his
sister
, too?
The Marquis de la Caronde is not the father of
Azlie. This I have discovered by accident. Jules, by
some means, knew it also. To all save ourselves it is
a secret; the marquis ever acknowledged her as his
child. There is a mystery about her birth and her
father, known only to the marquis (if indeed to him)
and my mother.
'Tis strange he should have lived with her,
believing
her to be false.
He was a weak man, and she had over him a
wonderful
influence. My earliest recollection of Azlie is
when she was in her third year. Up to that time my
mother says she was with a foster-mother. I alone
am related to the young noble.
He loved her, then? and
she
Returned it not; nay, met his guilty love with
scorn, as a maiden should do. He gave me, rather
than her virtue, credit for it; and his hatred grew, till,
to avenge himself on both at one blow, he devised the
plan of reclaiming us to servitude, that, as the master,
he might obtain what was denied to the paramour.
Base ingrate! foul and fiendish! cried the
Spaniard
,
with indignation flashing his pale cheek. When
was this judgment given?
But yesterday morning. The arrival within the
hour of your fleet only prevented him from dragging
my sister to his couch of lust.
And would you have seen him do it? asked the
youth, the fire flashing from his dark eyes.
Seen him do it!
he repeated, clinching his
dagger's
hilt like a vice, articulating each word slowly
and with terrible emphasis through his shut teeth,
which glared with rage, while his eyes blazed in their
sockets;
Seen him do it!
He smiled, too, as he spoke, and such a
smile
has
seldom gleamed on the human countenance! The
young man was awed, and singularly impressed by the
terrific effect of his looks and manner; he remained
Vol. I.I
gazing upon him with feelings of the deepest wonder
and admiration, showing, by the expression of his
features
,
that he fully appreciated his nobleness of soul
and the lofty sternness of his character. At length,
after taking a few rapid turns through the apartment,
Renault said, with composure,
Now, signor, thou knowest if I have cause to guard
my sister as if she were the jewel of my own honour!
Thou knowest now what it is to be a quadroone! that
it is another name for degradation, both moral and
physical. We must have no feelings, no honour, no
purity! Slaves, mere slaves, are only so in the
bondage
of the body; the quadroone is a slave both in
body and soul! What a fate is before the delicate
and sensitive maidens of our race! Their young love,
if it rise, and it must and will rise, for noble youths,
must be crushed in the bud in the heart, or be
cherished
only to ripen into sensuality. Our young men
may not look, but at the peril of their lives, upon the
blue-eyed maidens of their hearts' choice; and our
love, too, must wither and decay within the bosom,
while we see the object that awakened it lost to us
for ever in the love of another.
He spoke these words with a sadness and
tenderness
,
that conveyed to the young Spaniard the
impression
that he himself was the victim of such a hopeless
passion as he had described.
Renault, upon my honour, you have my warmest
sympathy, said the youth, in a tone that won
confidence
,
and bore witness to the truth of the words he
uttered. If in my power, the evil you dread shall
not come upon you; nor, so help me Heaven! upon
your sister. Spain now holds the province, and her
laws shall govern. This young Marquis of Caronde
hath no claim on thee or thine from this hour.
Nay, signor! to change our laws could not be
done with safety. The whole city would rise as one
man. The judgment has gone forth. I am his slave
I am my brother's bondman. Were I not so, I should
not feel the spirit within me that I do. It is because
I am his slave
that I am free! free as Nature made
me! As his slave, I have flung defiance into his
teeth; and as his brother, did yesterday mock and
laugh at his power in the gate of the Place d'Armes,
when, aided by his minions, he would have seized and
made me captive.
Ha! did he dare this!
He knew that he must do this ere he could
possess
my sister, signor! The coward feared a
brother's
protecting arm! He knew me well.
What did you?
I struck down the base villains, and, leaping upon
a horse near by, reached my house in time to bar my
doors against a party that were crossing my threshold!
They then stormed the house.
Did
she
know of this claim?
Not the truth. She knew not he claimed her as
his
slave
. I have kept it from her.
Bless you for it, Renault. And did you alone
withstand them?
Ay, for full ten minutes; when their leader, my
nobly-born brother, joined them, and bade them, in a
savage voice, bring brands and set fire to the lintel.
On hearing this, I bore my sister to the battlements,
in sight of all, suspended my dagger above her
bosom
,
and swore by Heaven, if a single spark were
borne against the house, even by the winds, I would
strike it to her heart. This would not have suited my
brother's purpose, and he bade them hold, and, instead,
batter down the
grand porte
leading from the street to
the inner court. I placed myself before it, and gave
Azlie the dagger. She kissed it, and stood beside
me. Suddenly, amid the thunder of their assault, we
heard the Cathedral bells tolling out warlike alarm, and
the cry of `The Spaniard!' flew wildly along the
street.
And this, noble Renault, created a diversion in thy
favour?
It did; for the bars were giving way at every
stroke, and in five minutes more my sister would have
fallen by her own hand, a sacrifice to her honour. As
their retiring footsteps ceased, the heroic girl cast
herself
upon my bosom and wept. It was a grateful
moment
to me, signor, and in my heart I thanked
Heaven
that the Spaniard had been sent to rule our
province
.
It was this feeling of gratitude, then, that led thee
to shelter me?
Nay; I was swiftly returning home, after the
dispersion
of the populace, to see if my dwelling was
secure
from the assaults of lawless ruffians, when a tall
person, wrapped from the feet to the eyes in a long
gray cloak, bade me, in a voice of irresistible
command
,
`Fly to the succour of the Spanish cavaliers if
I were a Christian man!' Ere I could speak, the
figure
had disappeared in the shadows of the wall of the
Ursuline convent. I instantly drew my sword and
hastened to the Place d'Armes, whither the clash of
arms directed me. I saw you hard pressed, and, by
the plume and bearing, recognised Jules and his free
band. My bosom burned to meet him in fair battle,
and I bounded forward. Before I could reach the
scene of contest, I saw you struck down, and left for
dead beside the fountain. As I was passing the spot,
with my eye fixed on my brother, I saw your
companion
,
the noble Spaniard, in great jeopardy from the
dagger of Jules. I bounded forward to save him,
with an uplifted battle-axe which I caught up from the
ground. My brother and I met; and, at a blow, I
severed his right hand at the wrist, to save the life of
a poor idiot, who, before I could reach the spot, had
himself arrested Jules's arm, at his own imminent
peril
.
This event put a period to the contest; and, hastily
retreating to the fountain, I raised you from the cold
marble, bore you in my arms to this place, dressed
your wounds, administered to you a healing draught,
and left you to the careful watching of my gentle
sister.
I cannot thank thee in words that will express my
feelings, dear Renault, said the youth, rising and
embracing
him with grateful enthusiasm. Who can be
this mysterious individual who has manifested such
interest
in me and Don Garcilaso? Perhaps some
partisan
of the Spanish party in the town!
It was a woman by the voice, and I know no
female
of her stature in the province. I cannot
account
for the extraordinary power of her words over
me, that I should obey them so readily. If I were
superstitious
,
signor, he added, solemnly, I should
think the appearance was not of earth.
It was mysterious, certainly. It hath done me a
kindness, whether it be of flesh or spirit. If
supernatural
,
it is at least a spirit of good.
It may be so, said Renault, musingly.
The young men for a few moments seemed to be
wrapped in their own reflections in reference to the
subject of their conversation, when the quadroon,
drawing his belt tighter, and bringing round the
handle
of his sword so as to be readily grasped, said
quickly,
Sir Spaniard, I must now crave your indulgence.
The night wears apace, and your-pillow invites repose.
I have duties that call me forth until the day break.
Nay, Renault, let me not detain thee. My wound
is something more painful than it hath been, for your
discourse hath driven the indignant blood through my
veins till it hath got the fever heat. I will remain
quiet. But first I would ask thee if the brave Signor
Garcilaso be living, and if the city hath quietly
submitted
to the Spanish arms?
The Spaniards, led by their commander, landed in
force shortly after you fell, signor, and have occupied
all the gates and posts with their detachments, while
the main body is encamped in the Place d'Armes!
And have you heard nothing from them that
showed
anxiety at my absence?
Nothing, signor.
'Tis strange! Hath Ramarez hoped that I have
been slain? he said, half audibly. So, Renault, it
is well! Let it not be known that I live or that I am
I 2
here, till I shall name a time fitting for the disclosure.
This jealous Cond, he added, to himself, shall have
an eye over his actions that he little suspects. I know
his temper well; and he is scarce likely to change
slavish laws and systems of licentiousness like these
I have heard unfolded! No! no! not Ramarez! they
chime too well with his free manners! Brave
Renault
,
I honour and esteem you. Let us hereafter be
friends. Count on my protection if thou shouldst ever
need it, and, I pray thee, count on my honour in
reference
to one who is most dear to thee.
How mean you, signor?
Thy sister.
Speak not of her, signor; thou knowest thou
mayst not.
Nay, Renault, I would share with thee in thy
brotherly task of protecting her.
It were setting the hawk to guard the dovecote!
said the quadroon, with a slight smile.
We will speak of this more anon, Renault. The
knight of the red plume will have cause to cross blades
with me if I e'er get the better of this wound. Now I
think of it, there were many of the assailants bore the
scarlet badge that distinguished him.
He is a leader of a party of some fifty young
creoles
,
said Renault, turning back at his remarks;
most of them are of good families, who voluntarily
took up arms three years ago in defence of the city,
when Spain made her first demand of surrender.
And when Ramarez got the worst of it. He is
yet sore upon it.
Most of these being wild and free in their habits,
continued the quadroon, they soon became lawless,
and grew overbearing among the townsmen, going
through the streets in bands with swords drawn,
browbeating
and threatening, and even attacking all who
murmured or opposed them; till, at length, goaded
beyond
endurance, the citizens rose in arms against them
and drove them from the town, when they retreated to
a small tower, situated on the shore of a lagoon about
a league distant, where they fortified themselves, and,
under the name of
chasseurs
, bade the citizens defiance.
Occasionally they were permitted to enter the city in
small parties, being first deprived of their arms at the
gates, to visit their families or friends, on condition of
departing before night. On the rumour of the approach
of the Spaniards they appeared, sixty in number, on
horseback, before the Pontchartrain gate, and offered to
aid in defending the town under the direction of the
councillors. After much hesitation, they were
admitted
without arms; but, instead of presenting themselves
to the disposal of the rulers at the government-house,
they dispersed by twos and threes throughout different
streets, and met at a preconcerted rendezvous, from
whence they appeared in the Place d'Armes, armed
with those long, sharp, two-edged swords, which made
their attack so formidable. Their assault upon your
party was wholly unexpected by the town's-people,
who, as you must have seen, fled in consternation from
the consequences. After the attack, they mounted
their horses, which were held in waiting by some of
their band, and galloped out to their stronghold.
They fought for the keys, then, methinks, if such
is their character, rather that they might obtain
access
to the treasury and armory, than from shame at
their being in our possession! observed Don Henrique.
This might have been partly the cause. Their
patriotism, when it first showed itself three years ago,
was pure, but it is now corrupted by licentiousness.
They wish to make a republic of the province. There
were seven among them, called, from their friendship
to each other, the Seven Brothers, who once
distinguished
themselves by their virtue and patriotism,
one only of whom has escaped the contagion. It is to
him the city has looked for a champion.
Was he present in the council-chamber yesterday?
He was more surely employed in the service of the
country. When a man cannot breast the tumult of the
waves, he must patiently wait until they subside.
You speak ambiguously, Renault.
I can speak no plainer to the ear of a Spaniard,
signor.
Methinks there is something like conspiracy hidden
beneath your words, Renault. Ha! that dress you
wear is the studied costume of a band, and that
myrtle
sprig is like a badge and token of brotherhood.
'Tis worked in silk also on your breast. That bugle,
too, at thy belt! Thy absence this night, Renault, on
my life, hath something to do with recovering the city.
The quadroon smiled as if the other had divined the
truth, and then, waving his hand, was about to leave
him, when his eye rested on the signet the Spaniard
still wore on his finger. He half extended his hand,
and seemed as if he was about to demand it; then,
suddenly drawing it back, said, beneath his voice,
'Twill do as well another time and by another hand.
Signor Cavalier, he added, aloud, I leave thee a
pleasant repose and healthful waking.
Stay, good Renault. Bid one of thy slaves leave
this message with the captain of Count Osma's guard,
lest he be disposed to make my absence an excuse for
doing mischief to the town's-people.
As he spoke, he pencilled the following note and
gave it to the quadroon:
Give thyself no trouble about my absence
.
Henrique
.
Now, he continued, as you have been so kind
to me, I will, in gratitude, give you the countersign
decided
on, for the first night's possession of the province,
by Osma himself. You may wish to go beyond the
barriers, which you tell me our troops now occupy, and
it will, perhaps, be of service to you. Thus saying,
he placed a folded paper in his hand, and bade him
good-night.
Renault accepted it with thanks, pressed his hat low
over his brows, and strode, with the firm and manly
step of a freeman rather than a slave, from the
apartment
.
He had been absent about a quarter of an hour,
when the ear of Don Henrique, who was once more
reclining
upon the divan and thinking of Azlie, was
invaded
by a sweet strain of music. He started with
surprise and rapture. It came from a great distance,
and approached nearer and nearer till it filled the court,
when it died away until almost lost in silence; then
swelling, clear, strong, and near, it would rise, wave
on wave, and flow onward, a flood of ravishing melody
filling the whole apartment, and melting his very soul
with ecstasy. It would then sink gradually away,
retiring
farther and farther from the ear, till distance and
silence gave back no sound save the dashing of the
falling fountain in its marble basin. He continued
still to listen like one bewildered, and again rose the
same sweet, wild strain, floating and undulating,
ascending
and descending, as if the sport of a fitful
zephyr, that now wafted its volume of sound
triumphantly
along with invisible power, now soared with them
on indolent wings into upper air, or now bore them
swiftly into infinite distance. Insensibly, while he
listened
,
his senses yielded to the spell of the unseen
minstrel
,
and he fell into a deep and quiet slumber.
CHAPTER VII.
SCENE IN A PAVILION.
The
midnight chimes, slowly and heavily tolling
from the Cathedral Tower, which had so suddenly
broken
the slumbers of the young Spanish cavalier, had
also penetrated the interior of the pavilion in the
Place
d'Armes
, and struck upon the ears of an individual
who occupied it. He was writing over a little ebony
escritoire, on which were scattered letters just finished
but not yet folded; despatches, unsealed, directed to
the minister of state, and an open packet or two, with
the royal arms of Spain impressed upon the broken
wax. Near them lay a bunch of massive keys,
stained
with dark spots of crimson, and by the side of them
a naked sword of great finish and of the finest
temper
,
with diamonds set thickly on the hilt. On the
floor of the tent, which was overlaid with a Turkish
mat of great softness and brilliancy of colours, was
negligently strewn the imposing apparel of a soldier:
here a casque glittering through a cloud of sable
plumes, there a pair of spurs lying upon a steel
corslet
,
which seemed as pliant as the cloth of gold with
which it was lined. In a corner were the magnificent
trappings of a warhorse; the gorgeous Andalusian
saddle covered with blue cloth, worked in with silver
thread, the housings a leopard's hide, the bridle plated
with silver, and ornamented with chains of exquisite
workmanship in the same metal. An Egyptian
ottoman
,
with a pillow of swan's-down, completed its
furniture
.
The pavilion itself was of the most elegant and
tasteful description. Though its outside reflected the
moonbeams from a surface of spotless white, the
interior
was hung with sky-blue tapestry, on which was
represented, in needlework, the first interview between
Fernando Cortes and the Emperor Montezuma. From
the centre of the tent a purple canopy was suspended,
by silken cords, above a spacious arm-chair, covered
with a lion's skin and crowned with a coronet.
Before
it, as if a footstool for his master, whose right
foot rested upon his neck, slumbered a beautiful Cuban
bloodhound. All around, from the roof down to the
thick carpet, hung azure tapestry, thus constituting
within it a cabinet as retired and private as if it were
buried in the recesses of a palace. It was, however,
visibly so much less in dimensions than the broad and
lofty canvass pavilion itself, that it was apparent there
were other apartments within it, either appropriated
as private chambers or anterooms; and certain cords
at intervals of the hangings seemed to have been
placed there for the purpose of drawing them aside;
nay, in the rear of the apartment, they were in one
place slightly raised, as if some person had passed
through and neglected to drop the folds again quite
over the aperture. The whole interior wore that air
of luxurious ease and warlike repose which
characterized
the Spanish gentleman and soldier of that day,
whose sumptuous pavilions were redeemed from the
softer elegances of a lady's boudoir only by the
presence
of the knightly arms and insignia of war, that
held the place of her lute and embroidery-frame.
Like the voluptuous Persian princes of an earlier
time, whose tents vied in splendour with the fairy
palaces
of their poets, and who made war a medium for
the display of luxury and magnificence, the
conquerors
of the New World, dazzled by the wealth which
the rich mines of Mexico poured out at their feet,
decked themselves profusely in gold and jewels; all
parts of their armour glittered with precious stones;
their war-chargers scarcely moved under the costly
weight of silver that loaded their trappings; while
their tents were marked by a commensurate splendour
and grandeur.
But, as the empire of the Americas gradually
departed
from the sceptre of Spain, their luxury
proportionally
decreased; yet at this time, and in the
display
of this pavilion itself, sufficient traces remained
of this former state of enervating luxury to convey
some idea of what it had been in the more palmy
days of Spanish power, and, it may also be said,
affored
the key to its rapid downfall.
The first stroke of the deep-mouthed bell caused the
occupant of the tent to pause in his task. With his
pen suspended above the paper, and with his head
slightly turned in a listening attitude, he numbered the
strokes, as slowly and solemnly they broke, one after
another, upon the stillness of night. A lamp, hanging
by a chain from the canopy, and diffusing around a
soft and equal light, revealed his features as he lifted
his head. They were those of a man about forty-two
years of age, and of a noble and commanding outline.
The forehead was broad and massive, and shaded by
dark hair, sprinkled with gray, which also, in thick,
short curls, clung about his neck. His brow was
strongly marked with intellect, but ungovernable
passions
had mingled with it their stormy aspect. His
eyes were of a hazel colour, and vivid in their glances
as light, yet pleasing in their expression; while above
them projected thick eyebrows, which had been
arched
in childhood, before passion got control, but which
impatience of temper had now bent into a stern and
habitual frown. His nose was well-shaped, but of that
peculiarly aquiline form which is remarked in men of
resolute spirits and cruel natures. His lips were full
and firm, but around the mouth there seemed to
slumber
,
ready to awake on the least occasion, a
voluptuous
,
if not licentious passion, that gave to the whole
features a decided character, which was not a little
strengthened by the round, feminine fulness of the chin
and throat, and the speaking fire of the intensely
brilliant
eye. A short mustache, that darkened his upper
lip, qualified this trait, in some degree, to the eye of a
superficial observer; but to one in the habit of
studying
the faces of men from the instinctive expression of
their features, rather than from their exterior form and
accidental aspect, it was plainly the distinguishing
mark of the man. This soft though guilty attribute
of his nature spread over his countenance a peculiar
tenderness, that seemed to derive its birth from the
heart, and was replete with danger to the
unsuspecting
,
and fatal to those who trusted in it. It gave an
aspect of mildness to his countenance, and seemed to
be twin-born with gentleness, yet knowing no higher
origin than that libertine passion, which, on the face
of man, is too often mistaken for the virtue to which
it bears outward semblance. It is thus that the most
evil men sometimes wear faces of the most fascinating
mildness of expression; the lingering beams of the
glorious beauty that Vice, ere she fell, once shared
with her sister Virtue, still shining around her, and
which the clouds of guilt cannot altogether obscure.
A smile, whether to man or woman, from such a mouth
as that of the individual described, was infinitely more
dangerous than the knitting of his stern brows.
His complexion was a ruddy brown, and his face
full and fleshy, yet not too much so to be handsome,
which it must have been, in an eminent degree, in his
youth. His stature was large, and his person manly
and full, though not too heavy; for it had scarcely
parted with any of the elegance and lightness of more
vigorous manhood. He was attired in a black velvet
surcoat or long doublet, which descended to his thighs,
and had been girded at the waist by a belt of white
leather (in which hung the scabbard to the sword that
lay on the table); but the belt was unbuckled, and lay
across an arm of the chair. This doublet was
carelessly
left open at the neck, and displayed within
ruffles
of the finest lace, which also fringed the wrists,
and showed the straps of deer's hide which had
fastened
the corslet within it across the breast. The collar
was wide, and lay back flat upon his shoulder,
displaying
a broad edge of gold lace running down along the
front, and also ornamenting the cuffs. On the breast
of the surcoat was a richly-marked
cross-gules
,
surmounted
with the
fleur-de-lis
, the sign of the order of
the Knights of Calatrava, and around it sparkled
several
military stars; while, appended to a broad collar,
composed of golden links or rings, curiously
interwoven
one with the other, hung a single ruby, of great
size and marvellous brilliancy, cut in the shape of the
Cross of Calvary. He wore an underdress made of
buff-coloured buckskin, such as are worn at the
present
day by officers of rank, which relieved, while they
harmonized with, the sable hue of his coat, and gave a
certain air of military elegance and finish to his
costume
.
They were open at the knee, with the points
loosely hanging, and his feet were thrust into Indian
slippers: the negligence and
dshabille
of his whole
apparel altogether suited the hour of the night and
the privacy of his apartment.
As he numbered the last stroke which proclaimed
midnight, he started hastily to his feet:
Vol. I.K
Twelve! midnight! he said, in a tone of
surprise
.
Time hath flown, or these provincial clocks
do note its passage with false tongues. Ho!
without
!
The curtain in front of him was instantly drawn
aside, a gigantic Ethiopian appeared at the entrance,
and, making a salutation so low as to touch the border
of his vest, waited to be addressed.
Hath not Don Henrique yet appeared, Sulem?
No, cadi, he answered, in the shrill voice of a
boy, that sounded most strange and unnatural, coming
from one of his stature, and was singularly unpleasant
to the ear.
No intelligence of him?
Muley Garcilaso hath come to speech under the
skill of the chirurgeon, answered the Moor, indirectly.
What said he? demanded the Spaniard, as if
accustomed
to his Oriental method of communicating his
ideas.
That the young cadi fell in the fray, and that his
body was borne off the ground.
Slain, said he?
He knoweth not.
Be it so or not, these rebellious bourgeois shall
answer for their last evening's work, if I stain every
hearthstone with the blood of its own household. Is
all quiet in the town?
Silence hath become your slave, and bound the
city in her chains.
This is well! Seal and direct these despatches.
They convey to his majesty intelligence of our
success
.
The Moor approached the table, and, kneeling on
one knee, began to fold and seal the packets with an
adroitness and neatness that showed it was no new
employment in which he was engaged.
The appearance of this extraordinary private
secretary
was as striking as the task he was assigned was
unusual to personages of his complexion and race.
His stature was truly colossal, while his movements,
instead of being unwieldy, like his frame, were
remarkable
for a certain cat like stillness and activity,
that produced the same sensation in an observer as is
caused by the gliding and stealthy motion of the huge
anaconda, as he suddenly uncoils his vast length and
moves swiftly over the ground to gorge his
unsuspecting
prey. His skin was of the blackest Ethiopian
dye, and his shining black hair fell in a mass,
composed
of innumerable crisp tresses, to his shoulders.
It grew within an inch of his eyebrows, leaving a low,
simious
forehead, that was far more deficient in the
lines of intelligence than the broad front-head of the
hound recumbent beside him. But there was a
sparkling
light in his coal-black eyes, and a quickness in
their motions, that gave indication of cunning and
cruelty
,
attributes which do not often exist to a great
extent
in men of mean intellect. Satan, without the
angelic
intellect he possesses, would be Satan no longer.
The remaining features were characteristic of his
race: the broad, flat nose, with its thin, transparent
nostrils; the full, projecting lips, and abruptly
retreating
chin. His lips were singularly flexible, and, from
their constant motion, he seemed to be habitually in
soliloquy with himself, or unconsciously giving his
thoughts the shape of words with his mouth; and so
expressive was this language without a voice, that an
observer could plainly read the operations of a mind
which was ever thus betraying itself.
The usual character of his face was that of cautious
observation; of seeing without appearing to see.
Above all, there was a softness in his eye like a
woman's
,
and he was without beard on lip or cheek. His
hands, as he plied his task, appeared delicate and soft;
they were well-shaped, extremely small for his size,
and remarkable for long, oval nails, which looked like
pearls in whiteness and beauty. The fingers glittered
with massive gold rings set with topaz and carbuncles,
and on each wrist was a bracelet of polished brass,
with magic Arabic characters graven upon them.
Upon his head was an ample Oriental turban of the
whitest linen, and upon his feet he wore laced boots of
red morocco leather, highly ornamented with fringes
and embroidery. His legs were buried in Turkish
trousers of scarlet silk, of the most voluminous
fullness
,
confined at the waist by a belt, over which was
folded a yellow sash, the ends of it descending to his
knees. The sleeves of his shirt were long and wide,
not gathered at the wrists, and over it was a vest of
crimson cloth, elegantly embroidered; above this, and
over all, was worn a
haick
, or loose gown of green
cloth, something shorter than the vest. In his belt
was stuck a brace of small but superb Venetian
pistols
,
and at his side swung a ponderous cimeter, with
an iron hilt and scabbard, that, unlike the rest of his
costume, seemed worn more for use than personal
adornment.
This pacquet to the king would better please him
if it bore another seal beneath his own, he said,
without
looking up, impressing, as he spoke, a letter with
the royal signet of Spain. There was a meaning
hidden
in the under-tones in which he said this that
caused
the Count of Osma, who was, meanwhile, pacing the
tent lost in thought, to stop and survey him fixedly.
What mean you, Sulem? he inquired, after a
moment's
survey of his face.
The signet of the captured province, your
excellency
,
he replied, melting, with an indifferent air, as
he spoke, the wax in the flame of a taper that burned
in a cruse of olive-oil before him.
Ha! thou sayest well? Wherefore is not the seal
of the city with these keys? he asked, as if for the
first time aware of its absence, pointing sternly to
those signs of submission upon the escritoire.
I put the question to Muley Garcilaso when I
went on board.
True, thou hast said thou didst commune with
him when he came to himself. What said he?
That the Don Henrique took it in safe keeping,
answered the Moor, carelessly, but with observant
eyes watching the effect of his words.
Don Henrique! By the red cross! I'll warrant as
much. He hath ever a meddling with that concerns
not himself. It were not a wide guess to make
him the cause of this onslaught upon Garcilaso and
my brave men-at-arms. He hath kissed a citizen's
daughter, and a round dozen of veterans have to shed
their blood to pay for it. Would he had been safe
under
a cardinal's red hood ere I took the tutelage of
him on this madcap expedition.
There may be deep cunning hid beneath his light
folly, cadi, said the Moor, cautiously lifting his quick
eyes to his face.
Speak out.
Canst thou not divine his hidden purpose in
coming
hither with us?
Thou meanest my daughter! No, no! she would
not have tolled him out of the Moro. He careth not
the finger of his glove for the girl; and, by Dian! the
wench hath as little liking for him in return! They
have quarrelled like very brother and sister all the
passage. Had he not a brother that chanced to come
into the world a little before him, I should have made
my will control hers. As it is, I leave it to time and
Cupid.
It is
not
Lalla Estelle, said the Ethiopian, with
deeper meaning.
Then, in Mohammed's name, out with it, Moor!
As a
spy
.
On whaton whom?
On thee and thy government.
Your proofs.
Himself.
Hath he told thee so?
In his eye, when fixed on theein every look and
motion.
Hath he said it?
Not in speech, cadi.
Thou art a fool, Sulem. Because thy own
countenance
is an open book for men to read thy thoughts
in, thou deemest every man's to be the same. Thou
K 2
art at fault this time, with all thy subtle knowledge.
If I believed this of Don Henrique, he might perish
ere I would draw blade to rescue or avenge him. But
he hath come as no spy; it is an idle freak, and
because
he likes to rove the world better than to wear a
monk's gown. Nay, Sulem, if I thought other
motives
than love of adventure brought him hither, I
would hunt him out of every bower and boudoir in the
province, and cast him into the deepest dungeon it
contains.
None here, methinks, is so deep as those of Osma,
said the Moor, maliciously.
To me this! demanded the count, approaching him
a step in a menacing manner.
The victim of his wrath crossed his hands on his
breast, and sunk his head upon them deprecatingly.
It is well thou art so useful to me, Sulem, or thy
head were, ere this, rolling on the ground. I know
that evil and hatred are the moving springs of thy soul;
and that, if thou open thy mouth to speak, bitterness and
biting words come forth naturally. Beware again how
thou hintest at what none know save thee and me, lest
I should take it into my head to become the sole
possessor
of the secret. Beware! Don Henrique must
be looked after. Hatred alone towards him, and which
thou bearest to all men, hath cast this film of suspicion
over thy vision. He must be found. As a Spanish
knight, I owe this to my honour. If he come to harm,
it were as much as my spurs are worth. I will
tomorrow
demand an explanation with the weapon's
point at the naked throats of these traitorous
councillors
,
who alone have stirred the city up to this
massacre
.
Quick with these despatches, and see that they
are, by the dawn, in the hands of the captain of the
brigantine, and command him that he make sail
forthwith
for Spain. He hath my private orders already.
The Moor busied himself with the pacquets, while
the Cond paced the floor of the tent with a perplexed
air, for some time uncertain what course to adopt in
reference to the citizens who had committed so gross
an outrage upon the mission he had despatched to the
council-chamber. But a man of his stern and hostile
spirit had not room for indecision at such a time.
Independent
of the indignation that inflamed his bosom
at the slaughter of his
garde du corps
, he had a
private
insult to avenge, remembering the reception he
had met with three years previously in the very square
and on the selfsame spot on which his pavilion was now
pitched. As he thought of this, and summed together
the aggravation and divers causes of offence, both
recent
and by-gone, his soul burned, and he determined,
at sunrise, to make an example of several of the chief
citizens, by putting them to death in the Place d'Armes.
If it should also appear that Don Henrique had been
slain in the affray, he resolved, for certain reasons,
which, it will be plain hereafter, had more to do with
his own standing and interest with the Cortes and with
his monarch, when his death should be known to them,
than with any regard for the young Castilian, to
convert
the town into a heap of ashes in retribution
thereof
.
Such was the revengeful and merciless
determination
he had formed in his own mind, when the shrill,
unpleasant voice of the Ethiopian startled him from
his meditations, as, rising from his knee, he informed
him that the despatches were sealed and directed.
See to them when I have done with thee, he
replied
;
and then, in a voice that partook of the stern
and savage nature of his recent decision, he said, Now
take your pen and write as I shall dictate.
He then, in a few brief words, every letter of which
breathed conflagration and blood, dictated an order,
which this confidential secretary took down with
extraordinary
rapidity. It was addressed to the several
captains of his army, and was thus worded:
Headquarters, Place d'Armes
,
12
o'clock night, Sept.
10
th
, 1767.
You are ordered to have your command under arms
half an hour before sunrise. At sunrise you will re
ceive orders to sack the town. The public buildings
and dwellings on the Place d'Armes are to be spared
.
(
Signed
)
Osma
,
Lieutenant-general of the armies of Spain,
Governor
and Captain-general of the province of
Louisiana
.
Make sealed copies of this, he added, as it was
completed, and despatch them by safe bearers to the
different officers in the square, and to those
commanding
at the outposts and guardhouses.
If Don Henrique appear in the meanwhile
The order will be countermanded.
And, continued the Moor, significantly, those
chief citizens you spoke of will instead?
Thou art ever awake to bloodshed! Fear me not,
Sulem. I will give them to the tender mercies of thy
cimeter; for the slaughter of my men-at-arms must
be atoned for by their lives.
The countenance of the Moor lighted up, and his
lips moved with the silent expression of his satisfaction,
while, half drawing his weapon from the sheath, he
addressed
congratulatory words to it, as if it had been a
sentient being. He speedily completed the copies of the
order, and, with a low obeisance, laid them at the feet
of his master.
Give them to my pages without, and bid them say
to those to whom they may bear them, to see that they
break not the seal until they hear a gun fired at the
dawn of day. If by any chance this purpose should
get wind, the bourgeois may have time to arm
themselves
,
and give us trouble. Depart!
CHAPTER IX.
ESTELLE AND THE CONDE.
The
Ethiopian hid the orders within his oreast, and,
lifting the hangings, disappeared as he had entered.
For a few moments the Count of Osma fixed his eyes
vacantly upon the waving tapestry, while in his heart
he was striving to justify the deed he had resolved on
against the arguments of his conscience.
They have merited it if it do fall upon them, he
soliloquized, turning and pacing the tent with the
measured
step of one who habitually walked when in thought.
Did they not, three years since, rend in pieces the
national
flag of Spain? Did they not cut down my whole
body-guard, and leave me the only alternative of a
disgraceful
flight? Have they not withstood our arms till
now, and the last night repeated anew the outrage upon
my guards; wounded to the death a noble Spanish
gentleman
,
and perhaps slain one, a drop of whose blood
alone hath more value in the eyes of Carlos and the
Cortes than even an Osma dare answer for? If he
be not heard from by sunrise, my orders shall be
executed
.
What if there be truth in this suspicion of
Sulem
!
By the cross, the Moor may have ground for it.
If it should be truethe youth is in
my
power, not I in
his!
For my acts I am accountable to no one but
those from whom I derive my rank and authority. If
I do well or ill, what avails his espionage, unless, indeed,
he be secretly delegated with higher powers than mine?
This may be! If so, let him first produce them if he
would rule in my stead, and my last act of power shall
be exerted to destroy him, if he were the Infante
himself
.
Thus ran the thoughts of the crafty governor, his
own active fears and consciousness of a criminal life
now condemning, now excusing alternately both himself
and the object of his thoughts, and magnifying
suspicions
and malignant hints, that originated in a hateful
and wanton spirit, into certainties. Garcia Ramarez,
the Count of Osma, was no ordinary man. Though
only in the prime of life, he had risen to the highest
rank a subject can hold in the armies of Spain. This
elevation he owed to his extraordinary ambition, love
of war, undaunted bravery, and a masterly skill in
military
science. He was descended from a noble
Castilian
line; the founder of his family, Cond Velasquez
Osma, having greatly distinguished himself in the
conquest
of Granada, both in numerous single combats,
and in capturing one of the strongest holds of Boabdil,
which Isabella afterward conferred upon him as a
reward
for his bravery. His descendant, the present
Count Garcia, was the younger of two brothers, the
elder of whom, it was said, fell from the battlements of
one of the towers into the sea, near which, on a high
rock, the Castle of Osma was built; but suspicion gave
out other rumours to account for his sudden and
mysterious
disappearance, for the credibility of which, the
ambitious and cruel character of the young Garcia
afforded
sufficient foundation. But Spain was too much
torn at the period by civil contests for so slight a
matter
to create any sensation, if the rumour ever reached
the government, which was doubtful; the younger
brother assumed the title and vast estate of his
deceased
brother, Don Louis, without question or
hinderance
,
and the rumour was soon forgotten. Arms
soon became his passion, and, favoured by one or two
acts of personal valour and his family influence, at the
age of twenty-three he was made a lieutenant-colonel,
and sent into Africa to demand of the Moors
reparation
for certain acts of piracy committed on
Spanish
ships. A battle took place within a league of
Morocco
,
and Osma was defeated and taken prisoner.
After several months' bondage he made his escape,
and suddenly appeared at the court of Madrid, where
he once more offered his services to the king. He
was now remarkable for being attended by a hideous
Moor, who followed his footsteps like his shadow, slept
at his feet, rode by his side in battle, and without whom,
indeed, he never appeared abroad. It was reported
that he personally educated the unsightly Moor in the
language and customs of Spain, and that, as his
knowledge
of both increased, he made him controller of his
affairs, and eventually his private secretary and
confidant
;
some dared to say, indeed, that he was also
made his instrument of vengeance when a man's life
stood between him and his fierce passions or
sanguinary
ambition.
A few months after his return from captivity in
Africa
,
he married the only daughter of the Marquis de la
Torre, who died a few years afterward, leaving an
infant
daughter of great beauty and promise. When
she was at the age of thirteen, the father of Estelle, or
Lil
, as he fondly pet-named her, took her away from
the convent, where he had left her to be educated, and
made her his companion in the field, taught her the
art of fearless horsemanship, of fence and defence, to
wield the cimeter, dart the spear, and fire pistol or
hand-gun with accurate aim. She attended him in his
battles, riding by his side, with the gigantic Ethiopian
at her rein, protecting her from danger like the fabled
genii guarding a princess, who hath commanded his
services by the charm of magic. Yet her warlike
education
,
under the eye of so great a warrior, took from
her but little of the softness and gentle manner of
maidens
of her age. She was bold, but not masculine;
boldness such as hers serving only to heighten the
charm of her singular beauty. Her eye was blue as
heaven, and full of light and intelligence; and though
it never quailed with fear, it was soft as the mountain
gazelle's in its expression; and though it might flash
like the eagle's as she galloped beside her father into
the battle, it could droop like the turtle-dove's when
thoughts of tenderness filled her soul, as if young love
had rested upon the lid. She was not spoiled by her
father's indulgence, for he tenderly loved her, though
the severity of his nature was mingled with his
affection
.
She returned his affection with her whole heart,
and, by her irresistible love, beauty, and devotion, held
an influence over him that rendered her, in some
degree
,
a spirit of good sent from heaven to control the
evil he would do. His stern spirit yielded to her
gentleness
,
and his affection could seldom deny her
requests
when eloquently and tearfully urged for some
victim of his displeasure or vengeance. For, although
the Cond of Osma possessed the revolting traits of
character that have been asserted of him, yet there
was one current of gentleness flowing through his heart
that had not been darkened by the foul streams of vice
that ran beside it: towards his daughter it showed
itself
in the shape of paternal love; but towards the
young and lovely of her sex it was less pure, and
assumed
the turbid aspect of sensuality. In his bearing
towards women he was gay, gallant, and fascinating;
it was only to those of his own sex that he manifested
a certain haughtiness of port and sternness of speech
that usually characterized his intercourse with those
around him.
He now appears with his Ethiopian confidant on the
scene of action after the lapse of eighteen years from
his captivity by the Moorish emperor, Sidi Mohammed,
and, save in increase of years and in guiltfor this
period of the eventful life of the Cond de Osma had
not been passed without more than one instance of
dark and fearful crimethey were still the same
inseparable
,
mysterious pair, united by some unknown,
and, men thought, unholy compact. Some, indeed,
hinted at a familiar spirit, while all believed the two
were linked together soul with soul in secret guilt.
The officers loathed the presence of the Moor, and
avoided him, while the common soldiers looked upon
him with fear and superstitious dread.
The commission of the Cond de Osma, which
appointed
him governor and captain-general of the
province
of Louisiana, bore date Aranjuez, April 16th,
1767, and conveyed to him the special power to
establish
,
in this new part of the king's dominions, with
regard to the military force, police, administration of
justice, and finances, such a form of government as
might most effectually secure its dependance and
subordination
,
and promote the king's service and the
happiness
of his subjects. To carry out these ends, he
was to be supported by a military force equal to three
times the number of persons capable of bearing arms
in the colony, one half of which he had now brought
with him. He was accompanied on board his ships
by several Spanish gentlemen, of whom he was to
form his council or
cabildo
, which was to be composed
of six perpetual
regidors
, two ordinary
alcaldes
, an
attorney-general
syndic, and a secretario; over which
body he was to preside in person. Besides these, he
was attended by the
alferez-real
, or royal
standard-bearer
,
the provincial
alcalde
, his
alguazil mayor
, and
receiver of fines. Besides these, other necessary
steps had been taken for the absolute Spanish rule of
the city and province. His powers over all were of
an extraordinary nature, and from his decision, both in
criminal as well as in civil cases, there was no appeal
but to the king; and this could be made and
transmitted
to him only through the
cabildo
, which was to be
composed of Osma's own creatures, beyond whom a
complaint was scarce likely to find its way. A
remote
delegated power is the greatest evil a
monarch
can inflict upon his subjects. Injustice,
oppression
,
and tyranny are ever its fruits. Such was the
character of the man who was now thoughtfully pacing
the pavilion! Such was the soldier who had long led
the armies of Spain! Such was the governor who
was now to rule over Louisiana!
The Moor had not been long absent from the
apartment
,
and the Cond still gloomily paced the gorgeous
carpets, his step giving back no sound from the thick,
soft texture. His mind was occupied now with
suspicions
of the young Don Henrique; now with the
contemplation
of his own unforgotten wrongs at the
hands of the bourgeois, and the prospect of the
morrow's
Vol. I.L
revenge; and with ambitious visions of his
future
power and grandeur. Suddenly the arras behind
his chair of state moved slightly, as if stirred with the
wind; and a female hand, like ivory for brightness and
beauty, was thrust through an opening in the folds,
grasped the tassel of the silk cord that passed across
them, and, with a timid, hesitating manner, drew aside
the hanging, showing another apartment within. He
was too much occupied with his thoughts to observe
this. There was a pause, as if the intruder were
surveying
the cabinet before entering it; and then a
beautiful
creature, with sun-bright hair, large, glorious blue
eyes, and a complexion like the lily from which the
dew has just fallen, stepped forth, and, with her hands
folded across her bosom, stood in his path.
My daughter! he exclaimed, sharply, as if
displeased
at the intrusion; but his angry glance was
arrested
as it met her lovely person, wrapped loosely in
a night-robe, that was folded about her limbs like the
richest drapery of sculpture, displaying the exquisite
grace of her figure, as if the effect of studied statuary,
and encountered the bright beauty of her face, about
which the unconfined hair fell like a cloud of light.
None would have recognised in her the bold, free
maiden that rode beside the Cond on his landing. It
seemed a radiant vision that met his eyes. The
father
was entranced by the daughter's charms! He
could not speak the sudden anger that rose to his lips!
He could only gaze with all a parent's pride upon her,
while tenderness took the place of rising displeasure.
What has disturbed thee, Lil? he asked, smiling
affectionately and kissing her, and then holding her
back to gaze upon her enchanting face.
I have not slept since the midnight bell, signor,
she said, with a glance at himself and then at the
escritoire
,
which he easily interpreted.
You are a silly girl, Lil, he answered, tapping
her on the chin; and, were it not that you look just
now so much more angelic and more like your mother
than usual, I could be well angry with you. So you
have been a listener to my cabinet secrets?
I have, father.
And, like a child, and a woman who knows her
power, have left your couch to sue for grace to these
graceless bourgeois, I'll warrant thee!
Thou wilt not do this thing, signor!
Lil, my fawn, I love you more than I have loved
any human being. But even love hath its bounds.
Ask me not what I cannot grant, that I may not have
the pain of refusing thee.
Father, I love you also too well to have thee do
wrong. How will it be told in Spain that the brave
Count of Osma hath declared war against women and
children?
How mean you, girl? he asked, surveying her
glowing countenance as it warmed with the feelings
of her heart. It is against men in armsrebels
and assassins, as the last night's work hath shown.
If you fire their dwellings, and let loose the
soldiery
with the broad license of indiscriminate
slaughter
,
she answered, with firmness, will not every
threshold become an altar of blood for the sacrificing
of mother and child? If the men of the town have
done evil, father, let them be heard in fair defence, and,
if proved guilty, adjudged by the king. Let not their
blood be on thee and thine.
If
they have done evil, daughter! he repeated,
with warmth; have they not resisted our arms,
rebelled
against their lawful sovereign, and slain fifteen
Spanish men within the twelve hours?
Men have been slain, sir, she said, steadily, but
with the filial respect in her voice and manner that
became a daughter; but, in truth, are these
councillors
,
or the citizens whom you condemn, guilty of
crime against the state? They were not Spanish
citizens
or voluntary Spanish subjects when they did this.
The flag of France was still waving over the province,
and the laws of that kingdom retained their empire in
it. I do not think, sir, it constituted an offence against
the state.
St. James save us, girl! he cried, more in
humour
than displeasure; you are half a rebel
yourself
.
France has no more to do with them, nor they
with France, than with the Grand Seignor. They are
rebels all, and as such shall be treated. Go to bed.
They did not acknowledge the right of Spain;
they were still French subjects. You cannot, sir,
contend
that they could bear the yokes of two sovereigns.
How can you expect to command the submission and
obedience of these colonists, until you make known to
them your character and powers? How can his
majesty
count on their allegiance before he has extended
to them his protection?
By the rood, if thou art not infected with
disloyalty
to the very core, girl, he said, with harshness.
I have taught thee arms, and made a gallant soldier
of thee; and the devil hath finished by making thee a
pleading attorney.
Nay, be not angry with me, signor, she said,
laying her hand upon his arm, and looking
deprecatingly
up into his face; I would spare bloodshed and
avert misery. If they had been born subjects of Spain,
they were then rebels, and deserving of punishment.
Send and countermand thy cruel order.
There is a statute of Alfonzo the Eleventh, which
is the first law of the seventh title of the first partida,
which denounces the punishment of death and
confiscation
of property against those who excite any
insurrection
against the king or state, or take up arms
under pretence of extending their liberty or rights,
whether subjects born, or acquired by conquest or by
treaty.
True, sir; death and confiscation, indeed, but not
conflagration and massacre. Let the chiefs of the
rebellion
be arraigned before thee, and stand or fall as
they shall be proven guilty or innocent. This law,
sir, giveth thee no such power as you would exercise.
My power is delegated, and independent of written
statute. Life and death are in my hands, until the
judiciary of the cabildo be established. But, my child,
I have not ordered the city to be treated like a town
carried by storm for this offence of rising in arms
alone.
But from personal revenge, sir, she said, boldly.
It is more noble to forgive, my father.
Nay, daughter, your quick and blunt honesty of
spirit hath made thee forget that I am thy father.
Forgive me, sir, she cried, pressing his forehead
with her bright lips, which had pleaded so eloquently
and so well. If I have in anything gone out of my
filial duty, it is from pity for these bourgeois, who, if
Don Henrique appears not, will, ere long, be houseless
and wandering in the fair land God has given them.
Thou hast it. It is for Don Henrique I have done
this.
I will answer, the city hath naught to do with his
absence.
Thou art not a good listener, or thou wouldst have
learned from Sulem that Garcilaso saw him struck
down. Should I not visit them with vengeance for
this? How else am I to account to the king and
Cortes
if he be slain? Shall I let his death pass by as if
he were a plebeian? Thou knowest he likes me not,
and that I have small friendship for him in return; but
his absence, nevertheless, must be looked to. If he
return not in safety, I will do what I have commanded.
The city shall be fired and sacked. The king will
demand
it.
And a million of the king's property, and many
lives of his subjects, will be sacrificed. Is this doing
the king service, my father?
Out upon thy inquisition, Estelle! I have borne it
full patiently. Now I look upon thee, much of thy
loveliness hath departed with-the admission of this
plebeian pity into thy blood. Thy complexion hath a
rebel tinge, got from thy thoughts. Go to thy couch,
and sleep! My orders have gone forth, and shall be
obeyed. Not even thy love, he continued, with a
L 2
stern and vindictive look, that caused her to shrink
involuntarily
,
though her clear azure eye quailed not,
as, full of virtuous resolution, it encountered his; not
thy love, as it hath done before, to my grievous hurt
and often shame, shall turn me. Heaven itself hath
not power to move me from my purpose. The town
shall lie in ashes, and its councillors swing between
earth and air, though the foul fiend in person should
cry hold!
Hold! instantly echoed a voice near him, that
made his heart stand still with fear.
CHAPTER X.
OSMA AND THE SORCERESS.
He
turned, and beheld standing before him a tall
figure, wrapped to the mouth in a large gray mantle,
like the
haick
worn by the Moors, which swept the
ground, its head nearly buried in a deep cowl, through
which glared upon him a pair of glittering eyes, like
the burning orbs of a tigress shining in the dark.
Sathanas! avoid thee! he cried, lifting between
himself and the object of his superstitious fear the ruby
cross that hung from his neck.
There was no reply, no voice, no movement from
the mysterious being, who had appeared, as if by
supernatural
power, in the very midst of his tent, though
surrounded by a triple guard. There was no answer,
but the steady, fixed, and burning glance, that seemed
to scorch his soul. His own fearless eye quailed as
he strove to return the look; his face became pale, and,
clasping his daughter by the arm, he seemed, for a
moment
,
as if he would sink into the ground. His fear
was too great and unnatural to be caused wholly by the
supposition that his challenge had been replied to by
the fiend himself. It was, from his looks, evidently
connected with some recognition of, or association
with, the figure.
Father, my father! cried the noble girlwho had
no dark and secret crime to answer for, and to whom
innocence gave courageon witnessing his mental
terror, be thyself. It is mortal like thyself.
Dost thou believe it, child? he asked, with
incredulous
alarm, in a low tone, covering his eyes with his
hands.
Fear it not: my father, what dreadful thing hath
come over thee?
Hath it spoken? he asked, with terror, without
noticing her words.
Nay, I will make it speak, she cried, resolutely.
'Tis fearful to see thee tremble so like a woman.
Surely Heaven hath suddenly taken from thee thy
soldierly
spirit! I will relieve thee or die.
She seized, as she spoke, the naked sword that lay
upon the escritoire, and, quicker than thought, levelled
it at the heart of the silent and fearful intruder.
Speak, mysterious being! she cried, with a sudden
and fearless intrepidity, her soul armed by her father's
pitiable state; speak! or this steel shall prove
whether
thou be flesh or spirit.
There was no movement of the silent lips; the eyes
were fixed still upon the trembling Cond like a
withering
charm.
Nay, then, if thou art flesh, I will make a spirit of
thee, she said, and threw herself forward with the
sword; but it struck ringing upon a vest of mail, and
shivered in her grasp. The sound instantly roused
the count from his torpor of fear. Beneath a steel
corslet he knew must beat a mortal heart; and, if
hitherto
he had believed he had seen a spirit, all his fear
now at once forsook him, and the stern man and daring
soldier returned.
Ho, treason! we are beset! he shouted, drawing
a short dagger from his bosom, and assuming the
attitude
of one prepared for attack or defence. Ho,
guards without there!
Spare thy voice, Count of Osma, said the
individual
,
with irony; it will scarce be heeded by those
who permitted me to enter thy tent.
Ho, Sulem! Moor! Ha, am I betrayed? Who
art thou? Who hath admitted thee?
My own power. Who I am thou wilt know in the
day when they cup of guilt shall be full! was the stern
and menacing answer.
What would you with me? he cried, turning pale
and dropping the point of his dagger, yet looking as if
he would shrink from an interview which he felt he
could not avoid.
Thou art not alone.
Nay, 'tis but my child.
Wilt thou, then, I should speak with thee before
her? asked the stranger, with a significant sneer,
concluding the words with a low laugh that chilled his
blood.
Lil, leave me, he said, with an assumed
indifference
of tone, observing her look from one to the other
with suspicion and alarm; I have business with this
stranger, that, it is hinted, will not be fitting for a third
ear. Seek thy couch, and court the sleep that hath
been so untimely chased from thy pillow.
Nay, I will stay with thee. I will not leave
thee, she said, firmly. Thou wilt speak to the
father
in the daughter's presence? she added,
addressing
the extraordinary intruder.
If the father will, answered the same cold and
mocking voice.
It may not be, child, he said, sternly. If
afterward
it prove of moment or interest to thee, thou shalt
hear it. Leave me.
The imperative command conveyed in the last words
she felt it would be dangerous to disobey; so, embracing
him, and whispering in his ear a prayer for the victims
of the morrow, she cast a glance of mingled dread and
curiosity upon the silent figure, and retired within the
tent.
For an instant after her departure the Cond kept
his gaze fixed upon the place where she had vanished,
as if fearful to turn and encounter again the power of
that eye which had frozen his blood.
We are well met, Garcia of Osma, at length said
the stranger, taking a stride towards him, and placing
a brown, skinny finger upon his wrist.
Who art thou? he cried, shrinking from the
touch, that intrudest at midnight into my tent, and
seekest to alarm my fears with dark words and darker
hints?
Thou wilt not know me if I utter the name men
like thee know me by. Thou wilt not know me if I
let thee look upon my features.
Who art thou, then, in Heaven's name?
Thou didst but now believe me to be the shade of
Don Louis Ramarez, thine elder brother, whom thou
last saw in such a garb!
Dost read my thoughtsdost know that deed? he
cried, in amazement, and with a look of guilty horror.
Fiend! thou art come from hell to mock me!
Nay, Don Garcia, it matters not whence I come.
It is enough if thou acknowledgest my power over
thee; for I have a request to make thou wilt scarce
grant without first fearing me.
What wouldst thou have? my soul, dread being?
he asked, shuddering.
Nay, but I would control thy guilty mind, and
make it the obedient slave of my will, was the cool
reply.
Thou
do it! he repeated, roused by the words to
his former haughty pride and self-possession, and
forgetting
his fears in his quick indignation;
thou
control
the mind of Garcia of Osma! It should not bend
to the will of Lucifer. By the rood! thou art an
impostor
,
who hath raked up a buried rumour, and
comest
hither to fling it in my ears to frighten me withal!
And how did I come hither? repeated the
stranger
,
in a quiet tone.
That is the greatest wonder, and my tent thus
guarded! Ho, Sulem, slave!
The Moor hath done his duty, and still lieth with
his huge body across thy tent door.
How passed you him, and how that triple guard?
By my power.
The count trembled.
Art thou supernatural, and is thine errand here
for good or evil?
Both for good and evil. Wilt thou acknowledge
my power, proud Spaniard?
The Cond paced the floor with a bent brow, and
hurried, uncertain step for a few seconds, and then,
looking up, said with firmness,
I know not thy purpose nor who thou art. Thou
hast appeared before me mysteriously, and
outmastered
the sleepless watchfulness of Sulem. Thou hast
shown, too, a knowledge of a secret I thought
deposited
in only two bosoms, and thou hast guessed the
thought of my fear when first I beheld thee, enwrapped
in that gray garment, which hath associations, I need
not tell thee, who already knowest so much, I would
not willingly recall. All this is marvellous, and may
be accounted for on natural grounds, and referred to
mortal causes; therefore, most mysterious being, ere
thou canst subdue my spirit to thine, thou must show
deeper knowledge than thou hast done. Thus far I
acknowledge thy wonderful power. Yet it can be
measured by the human mind, and its depths fathomed.
There is one secret of my life, if thou canst tell it, I
will confess thee more than mortal. If thou failest to
do it, thou shalt be cut to pieces for the secret thou
already hast. The Count of Osma spoke like a man
whom guilt and fear had rendered desperate, and as if
determined to stake all upon a final cast.
That secret hath a key.
Name it.
It is the signet by which I passed your guard, and
led captive the will of the submissive Moor.
Speaking these words, this extraordinary individual
stretched forth a dark, shrivelled arm, from which the
robe had fallen, showing, to his infinite surprise, the
form and garb of a female beneath, and on the finger
of the hand exhibited to his eye a private signet set
in a peculiar fashion, and bearing the arms of the
house of Osma, with a Moor's turban for a crest.
He gazed upon it for an instant with starting
eyeballs
,
and then, leaping forward and grasping the finger
that bore it with a convulsive hold, surveyed it closely,
with an intensity of astonishment and despair that
language cannot depict. Suddenly he touched a
concealed
spring in it, and his own miniature, taken in
youth, met his eyes. He looked up then into the face
of the other, and cried, gasping,
The namethe nameif thou knowest the
name
Zillah! she answered, in the deep, guttural voice
that distinguished her.
Thou hast conquered! Do with me what thou
wilt, he said, and sank down into his state-chair
nearly
lifeless.
The singular being who had shown such wonderful
power over the mind of the boldest and fiercest man
of the age, save that secret guilt and the superstition
of the times enslaved his soul, gazed upon him for a
few moments with a look of triumph mingled with
pity. Then, lifting her eyes heavenward, and
crossing
her hands upon her bosom, she said, fervently,
Now Allah be praised! He hath given my
greatest
enemy into my hands!
Her cowl fell back in this extraordinary act of
devotion
,
and the lamp cast its rays upon a harsh and
haggard countenance, with a broad yellow forehead
impressed with innumerable minute lines of age;
shaggy white hair, a high, prominent nose, and a
mouth with a nervous strength and stern fierceness of
expression, that gave indication of a wild, implacable
spirit, that knew no master save its own will. Beneath
thick, shaggy brows, which time had whitened, glared
a pair of fiery, bloodshot eyes, like globes of heated
iron; and so unearthly was their piercing lustre that
no human eye could encounter them unblenchingly.
Their expression was that of wakeful vengeance, of
watchful suspicion, and of implacable hatred, which
the act she was for the instant engaged in did not
diminish
:
it seemed to have been superinduced by some
circumstances of an extraordinary nature, rather than
originally to have belonged to her character, as if deep
wrong, and deferred but ever-sought retribution, had
given to this feature the expression of the passion that
filled her soul. Her hair was white as wool, and,
contrasting strangely with her dark countenance, fell
down over her breast and back in long shining strands,
that gave a singular aspect to her features and majesty
to her person.
When she had ended her brief orison of gratitude,
she dropped the entire robe, and displayed a singularly
thin figure, erect as an arrow, above six feet in height,
and slender as a skeleton. A short tunic of blue
cotton
,
a green petticoat, a corsage of yellow silk, and
sandals bound upon naked feet, completed her
costume
.
Her arms were bare and long, and adorned
with broad bracelets of solid brass. Her haggard
neck was encircled by several necklaces of coral and
ebony, to which were appended divers charms and
amulets, one of which, in the shape of a tortoise, was
remarkable for being composed of a single amethyst
of great size and beauty. In her right hand she
carried
a small black wand, covered with cabalistic signs
and letters, done in pearl, and ornamented at one end
with a miniature death's head carved from human
bone. At her waist, in a broad blue girdle, on which
were represented, in brilliant colours, the signs of the
zodiac, she wore a long, sharp knife, and a pair of those
small but highly-finished Algerine pistols so celebrated
at that period. From within the folds of her vest
appeared
the shining surface of the polished steel
corslet
which had resisted the sword of the Cond's
spirited
daughter, and which she doubtless found it
necessary
to wear in the mode of life she chose to lead.
It will be seen, from this description, that she was no
spirit or supernatural being, and, from what had
hitherto
passed between her and the Count of Osma, that
her power was a moral one, and had for its basis her
knowledge, which he now believed to be supernatural,
of certain crimes he had committed, and which he had
thought were known only to Heaven and himself, and
perhaps his slave and confidant Sulem. From the
character of the ornaments of her person, she
appeared
to be a chief or priestess of that class of Morisco
necromancers, or worshippers of the Prince of the
Air, who once held such influence over the minds of
the Orientalists, and by their deep sagacity and
cunning
,
and through their knowledge of men's hearts
and intimate acquaintance with the avenues to their
passions, exerted an influence over even kings and
emperors, enslaving their minds, and receiving the
homage of their souls and the services of their bodies.
But, whatever might be her profession, her power in
the present instance was acknowledged by the object
of it.
If the Count of Osma had reason to believe her to
be a being of another world on account of her
knowledge
,
he had now, in her present wild and singular
dress as a sorceress, in the extraordinary height and
exility of her remarkably attenuated person, in the
wildness of her air and aspect, and the enthusiastic
malignity of her countenance, which seemed in
himself
to have found its object, additional reason to look
upon her with dread and evil apprehension. Like
most Roman Catholics of that day, Garcia Ramarez
was superstitious. He firmly believed, as an article
of his faith, in the infinitude of saints and guardian
angels that mingled familiarly in human affairs, as
well as in troops of evil spirits that went to and fro in
the earth working ill to mankind. The belief in
supernatural
agency was rife in the early part of the
last century, and even down to this time, few men,
however elevated their intellects or brave their hearts,
were above its influence. Miracles increased in the
Romish Church, and spirits, both of good and of evil,
were made to appear to the eyes of the people at will,
for the growth and quickening of their faith;
menacing
apparitions were said to have made nightly visits
Vol. I.M
to the couches of wicked kings and cruel lords; while
witches or soceresses, wizards or necromancers, as
England, the south of Europe, or Africa were the
scenes of their work, left mankind little room for
rational
judgment, and witchcraft and enchantment,
spells and charms, almost subverted the moral law of
nature. The world itself seemed to lie under a
charm, and the enchanted days of the Persian tales to
have returned. In Great Britain, her colonies, and
other Protestant countries, many a supposed witch
paid the forfeit of her life at the stake; but in Spain
and the south of Europe, as well as in Barbary and
Morocco, where their numbers were far more
numerous
,
and their pretensions and acts more daring and
marvellous, they were too much feared to be
prosecuted
,
and habitual religious superstition soon taught
men to convert fear into downright awe. The wand
of these
charmers
had been broken in England and
America nearly half a century before Spain and the
south of Europe had thrown off their allegiance to
this so wonderful and mysterious a power, which, real
or feigned on the part of its agents, will remain for
ever one of the most extraordinary characteristics of
the century in which it appeared, and stand in all ages
a witness to the darkness of the human intellect, the
nothingness of human learning, and the foolishness of
human wisdom.
Such being the preparation of the mind of a man of
that age for supernatural events, it is not surprising
that the bold yet superstitious Count of Osma should at
first have looked upon his visitant, who seemed to wear
the garb and height of one he believed to be in his grave,
as a visitant from the unseen world; or, when she told
him all that ever he did, he should so readily admit her
spiritual agency, nor wonder, as a man of the present
age would do, that such a thing should be. Now, sober
reason and cooler judgment hold the balance of men's
minds, and all things, however extraordinary the aspect
in which they show themselves, however high may
appear
their claim to the supernatural, must be tested by
the even weights of probability, and measured by the
skeptic eye of cause and necessity, ere the claims be
admitted and their empire fully acknowledged.
Shakspeare
,
writing in this age, would have some other
point d'appui
on which to frame his story of Hamlet
than his father's ghost.
The mind of the Count of Osma bowed to the power
that he believed to be supernatural. He was awed by
her knowledge, and his soul shook with the guilty
apprehensions with which awakened memory filled his
bosom. She continued to gaze upon him with mingled
hatred and contempt for a few moments as he sat in
his chair, his head sunk upon his breast, and his
forehead
covered by his hand, and then addressed him in
a voice of triumphant scorn, as if she would use the
power she saw she possessed by her secret to its utmost
extent. As he gazed upon her, he thought of the
fearful
visit Brutus had received, and the words I am thy
evil genius, Brutus, came to his mind, as she said, in
a deep, warning voice,
Garcia Ramarez, I said we were well met. I
have prayed Allah sixteen long years for this hour, and
it has come. I see thee at my feet, writhing with
guilt and trembling with fear. It is thus thou shouldst
be before those whom thou hast wronged.
Wronged, dread sorceress! he said, looking up,
yet scarce daring to encounter the stern gaze she fixed
upon him. I have wronged Heaven, but not thee. I
know thee not, save that I believe thou hast commerce
with the unseen world, and bearest in thine eyes hatred
towards me.
Thou wilt know me, and wherein thou hast
wronged
me, black-hearted Osma, but not to-night. I am a
messenger of vengeance to thee, but thy time has not
yet come. A bloody day in thy life's calendar will
soon fall, and then wilt thou know me.
St. Michael's day?
So, so! Ha, ha! haughty noble! and she
laughed
derisively; oh how quick is guilt in a seared
conscience
.
Thou hast truly named the day's
anniversary
I mean.
Thou art a fearful woman.
Then obey me. I am in thy tent this night not
to play with thy fears nor trifle with thy crimes; thou
art a bad man, and it became needful that thou shouldst
know that there is one more terrible than thou, who
hath thy destiny in her hands, and will watch thy rule
with a jealous scrutiny, for there is one within this
city's gates dear to me as the apple of my eye. In
being her guardian, I am the city's.
How mean you? he demanded, with quickness,
yet with reverence, marking the menacing tone in
which she spoke the last words, and fearing lest she
had known and would step between him and his
coveted
vengeance.
That not a roof shall blaze, nor a head fall on the
morrow for this night's work.
By the cross of St. James! woman, thou
presumest
too far, he cried, starting up, his fear of her
power suddenly swallowed up in his resentment at this
broad asseveration. If thou be linked with devils,
thou art flesh and blood, and good steel will tell in it.
I know and fear thy power, but I will not be its slave.
Speak to me again of this, and I may take mind to be
the sole repository of my own secrets. Thou knowest
too much for thou and I to live in the same elements.
'Fore Heaven! I know not what keepeth my hand
back from slaying thee where thou standest. His
eyes flashed, and his spirit got the mastery over his
superstitious dread. He held his dagger in a menacing
attitude, and for an instant his eye flashed back the
lightning of her own.
It is because thou darest not do it, she said, with
a stern dignity, that suited well her commanding air.
In thy hand steel is powerless when it would strike
at my life. I am flesh and blood, as thou sayest. My
power over thee is of earth, and the secret of it thy
own guilty conscience. I boast no supernatural
knowledge
therein, yet am I not a whit behind, in mine art,
that arch-priestess who bade one of thy prophets rise
from the tomb in the mouldered cerements of the dead,
and stand before living men.
Woman, hast thou power over the dead? he
asked
,
stepping backward from her with awe.
Ay; I can make murdered stand a bleeding
ghost before his murderer; walk before his eyes a
fleshless skeleton, clanking his bones; or watch his
midnight pillow with grim visage, chattering his ivory
jaws; or, wrapped in a winding-sheet, cross his lonely
path, with one finger ever pointing to a wound, one
hand to heaven; or, if thou wilt, I can make him
appear
as when he lived, tall and stately, with cowl and
long gray cloak, till all should think he lived again
save for the blazing eyeballs and cold death-touches
of his flesh.
Hold! terrible being, my brain is on fire. Cease,
or thou wilt drive me mad! Spare thy power, in the
name of the blessed angels! and I will be thy slave.
'Tis well. Art thou prepared to do my will? she
asked, with the same unbending sternness that
characterized
her throughout.
Name it, and if it be aught that endangereth not
my precious soul's salvation
Thy salvation! Hast thou a soul to be saved,
Count of Osma? she fiercely demanded, contempt
and irony mingled in her harsh tones.
Yea, sorceress, unless thou hast robbed me of it
by thy unholy arts, he answered, with alarm visible
on his features.
Ha! ha! Thou hast no need to fear me, Garcia
of Osma! she said, laughing scornfully. Thy
precious
soul is best in thine own keeping till it hath
filled
up its measure of wickedness. It is too late for
thee to care for it now.
Heaven hath forgiveness for the deepest crime,
woman.
On repentance, so says thy Koran.
What is repentance? Do I not regret the past?
he said, sadly.
That is not the repentance thy prophet hath
commanded
.
Let thy hand refrain from evil. What wrong
thou hast once done, do thou no more. This is
repentance
,
and such as thou hast never known, and never
M 2
wilt know. Evil will ever be in thy right hand. Thy
soul! Ha! ha! Trouble not thyself, countit is
cared for.
Be it as thou sayest. Holy Church hath
indulgences
.
Which thy ill-gotten gold will scarce purchase.
But fear not! My desire of thee will not endanger
thy soul's welfare. Thou hast given orders to sack
the city at dawn.
Ha! has Sulem
Be calm, knight! When I know so much, is it a
strange thing I should know this? Thou hast resolved
to lay the city in ashes. Light a torch, and it shall be
to kindle thine own death-pyre.
The command has gone forth, and the day dawns.
It becomes thee to be the more speedy. Obey!
It shall be done, so I see thy face no more.
We must meet once, twicenay,
thrice
more!
she said, solemnly.
May it not be, mysterious woman?
It may not.
If I see thee not after St. Michael's day, I will do
thy bidding.
Thou shalt not.
The city is then safe. Thou that knowest so much,
canst tell me aught of a young Spanish cavalier that
hath disappeared?
He is safe.
Then shall it be as thou wilt.
Write me the ordernay, thy secretary shall do
it for thee! Absulem Hassan!
The curtain was swept aside, and in an instant the
Ethiopian stood submissively before her, and, without
looking at his lord, fixed his eyes expectantly upon the
face of the sorceress. The expression of his
countenance
was that of the deepest awe and reverence.
The count saw this with wonder. Where had the
slave been that he obeyed not his voice! How knew
she a name he himself had not called him by for years!
He gazed in silent surprise.
Absulem Hassan, write as thy master shall dictate,
she said, authoritatively, pointing to the escritoire, while
her commanding eye was turned threateningly upon
the noble.
Without a word, the count motioned with his hand
for the slave to kneel at the table.
Thy secretary waits for thee, she said to him,
impatiently.
Write a countermand of the order of twelve
o'clock, in these words, he said:
Headquarters, Place d'Armes
,
1
A.M., September
10.
The order issued at midnight is countermanded
.
(
Signed
)
Osma
,
Governor and Captain-general
.
It is enough. Place copies of them in my hand.
I will see that they are delivered to thy captains.
She received from the Moor the sealed orders, and,
folding them in her mantle, once more gathered it
around her tall, thin person, and drew her cowl over
her eyes.
I adjure thee, meet not my vision in that shape.
Go, if thou hast done thine errand, he cried, with a
ghastly countenance, in which shame and indignation
at what he had been compelled to do plainly struggled
to vent themselves; leave me, and may the depths
of hell receive thy horrid form.
Thrice more I will visit thee, Knight of Osma, and
my errand will then be done, vengeance appeased, and
justice satisfied. Till then, remember in all thy acts
of power that mine is greater than thine, and that this
province, for the sake of one in it whom else thy lust
and power might blight, hath a sleepless guardian.
Thus speaking, she gathered her flowing mantle
about her limbs, and, with a commanding majesty of
aspect and demeanour, stalked across the tent, lifted
the hangings, and disappeared.
The count looked after her a moment, and then
convulsively clinched his hands together, gnashed his
teeth, glared around with demoniac wildness, while
rage and shame filled his soul. He seized the dagger
which had fallen at his feet, and, shaking it aloft, struck
it madly out in the air, where the sorceress had so
lately stood, as if he would vent his impotent rage on
empty space. The prostrate form of Sulem, who had
fallen on his face in profoundest Oriental veneration
of the departing sorceress, met his eyes, and he sent
the weapon towards him with such force that it sunk
into the ground beside him to the hilt.
Get thee to thy feet, Leviathan! he cried. Art
thou become a fool also? Thou deservest death in
permitting this fiend to enter my tent. I will pour my
thwarted vengeance on the false sentinels; so, speak
for thyself.
She is a dark woman, cadi! he answered, with
awe.
Dost thou fear her?
Sulem is her slave.
She is thy countrywoman, too?
She hath the Moorish tongue, cadi, and spoke
words into my ear with it, when she would enter, that
made my soul tremble. She is a dark woman!
What meanest thou?
She hath her seat in the sun, and her feet resting
upon the sea. She knoweth the future as if it were
the past, and the past hath no secret that she knows it
not. The spirits of the dead are at her command, and
the living become like dead men in the scorching
glance of her eye. She commanded me, and I
obeyed.
And she commanded me too, and
I
obeyed, he
repeated, fiercely, while his countenance gleamed with
indignant anger. I am levelled with my slave. By
the cross of my knighthood, I will not live under it!
This twenty-ninth of September! This accursed St.
Michael's day! Wonderful and damnable is her
knowledge! Not a secret of my soul but what she
knoweth it. Sulem! he cried, suddenly turning to
the Moor, who now stood before him in his usual
attitude
,
with his arms folded across his breast.
Cadi!
That sorceress must die!
The Moor uttered a cry of supernatural terror, and
fell prostrate at his feet, which he clasped imploringly.
What means this, fool?
The lightnings of Allah will consume to ashes the
mortal that lifts hand against one like her.
Out upon thee, superstitious idiot! cried the count,
though not himself free from the fears that filled the
breast of the trembling Ethiopian.
She must die!
he added, slowly and determinately.
She hath no life! he said, with horror.
No life! She hath veins, and blood in them, and
it must flow. Look well to thy cimeter's edge. If
she live till the morning of St. Michael's day, thy head
shall answer it. To thy post without my tent door.
If but a shadow fall upon its threshold, I will send thee
in chains to thy Moorish master. Ha, you shrink!
Go: I would be alone.
Left alone, the Count of Osma gave himself up to
long and calm reflection upon the events that had
transpired
in his interview with the extraordinary being, who,
by mere moral force, had subdued his haughty will and
bent it to her purpose. At length he cast himself into
his chair, and, summoning the captain of the guard
before
him, learned from him that a mysterious individual,
such as the count now described to him, had been
permitted
to pass both to and from the pavilion on the faith
of his signet, which had been exhibited to each of the
posts in succession and recognised.
It is thus far well, he said. Henceforward,
signor
,
obey no signet that is not backed by the
countersign
also. To your duty.
The officer then left the cabinet; and, soon
afterward
,
worn and wearied both in body and mind, the
count threw himself upon his couch, and sought
oblivion
in sleep.
CHAPTER XI.
SCENE IN A QUADROONE'S BOUDOIR.
When
the beautiful Quadroone retired from the
presence of her brother and the handsome young
cavalier
,
she traversed the latticed and vine-shaded cloister
of the square court, heedless of the floods of song
poured from the throat of her favourite nightingale at
her approachof the flowers that scattered their
dew-heavy
leaves at her feetof the moon shining on her
skyey throne, turning the clouds to silver as they
sailed
beneath, and filling the court with its cold, chaste
splendourheedless of all save the remembrance of
him whom she had just left. At the extremity of the
corridor, opening outward, was a double Venetian door,
dropped across the opening of which, on the inside, was
visible a curtain of crimson silk, its colour receiving a
richer tone from a lamp within. She placed her hand
upon it, but, ere drawing it aside, lingered on the
threshold
in a listening attitude, as if she fain would once
more distinguish the voice of the stranger, whose
image
filled her soul.
Hist, Egl! wilt thou not be quiet? she said,
angrily
,
to her mocking-bird, which at that instant
alighted
upon a vase near her, and made the whole air alive
with melody.
Scarce had she spoken ere she felt she had betrayed
her heart to herself, and surprised, alarmed at the
knowledge of it, she bent her lovely head in confusion,
and, lifting the curtain, disappeared within.
The apartment into which she entered was well
fitted
to receive so fair a mistress. It was a small
boudoir
,
characterized throughout by the most exquisite
taste. The floor was inlaid with mosaic in flowers and
figures, as finished as a painting in fresco, and shining
with the lustre of polished marble. Over its
mirrorlike
surface were strewn gorgeous mats of dyed
Angola
hair; the walls were hung with figured tapestry, and
around them were ottomans and divans of the most
luxurious
description. In the furniture and architectural
decorations, azure and purple, gold and silver, were
called into service, and the softest and the most delicate
colours seemed to have contributed to perfect the
harmonious
whole. In the midst of this elegance, which
rivalled that of a cabinet of a fairy princess, were
conspicuous
the signs of the Christian faith. At one
extremity
of the toilet-chamber was a miniature altar of
black marble. On it stood a small ivory crucifix,
before
which burned a silver lamp, the gentle rays from
which emitted a soft radiance throughout the room, and
diffused around a spicy aroma. Beyond the altar, in
a recess, was a deep window looking towards the Place
d'Armes, and towering above it, in the moonlight,
appeared
the white towers of the Cathedral, like gigantic
guardians of the city. On the right of the altar the
drapery was drawn aside, giving a glimpse within of a
simple yet tasteful couch, hung around with snowy
curtains
sleeping-room
ante-roomand they both
constituted
the sacred home of the maiden. Here
doubtless
were passed her most retired hours and seasons
of devotion. Here were her broidery frame, her harp,
her lute, gilded volumes, and scrolls of music. Here,
unsuspecting their real end, she pursued and perfected
herself in those accomplishments, in which her guilty
mother had taken pains to make her a proficient.
Hither she fled from the oppression and vice of the
judging and unfriendly world, in the forgetfulness of
sleep no more to remember her sorrow; or, bowed
down before the altar of her Redeemer, stay her heavy
soul.
Within the last twenty-four hours she had found need
of this consolation. The object of criminal love, she
depended, in the confidence of her sisterly heart, on
her brother's arm and fervent affection, and by faith on
Him who could give that arm strength in the cause of
virtue, and make that affection a consuming fire to her
oppressor.
Azlie entered her boudoir with a flushed cheek, and,
dropping the silken curtain again across the entrance,
passionately cast herself upon her knees before the
crucifix, and, putting back her dark hair from her
beauteous
face, clasped her hands upon the altar and laid
her forehead upon them. For a few seconds she
seemed
like a statue, so motionless was every limb and fold
of her vesture. She was struggling with a
supernatural
effort to keep down her newly-awakened love. But
in vain. Her bosom began to heave violently, her
breath came quick and convulsively, and her spirit
seemed as if it would burst its tenement. Suddenly
tears, blessed tears, came to her relief, and dropped
upon the altar like rain, thick and fast. In a few
moments
afterward she lifted her dewy face heavenward,
with a look of calm and divine resignation, such as
Raphael loved to give his Madonnas, and her lips
moved
.
There was no soundyet she prayed.
She prays for protection and for mortal strength to
the Virgin Mary, the protectress of virgins! Gentle
Azlie! There is a beautiful propriety in thy petition
thine is the poetry of religion! But One whom thou
hast forgotten, whose dread name thy lips are forbidden
to pronounceOne whom thou art taught by error to
believe too high and august to regard human petitions
HE will hear thee, lovely child!
He
will protect
thee. Yet thou knowest not the extent of thy
wretchedness
,
nor how much protection thou needest to pray
for! Thou knowest not of the unjust and wicked claim
of which thou art the victim! Thou knowest not that
he whom thou fearest, from whose unhallowed passion
thy pure soul shrinks, hath proclaimed thee his slave,
and that the judges of the city gainsay it not!
She rose from the altar, and, seating herself by the
trellised casement in the recess behind it, with her hand
supporting her cheek, gazed vacantly forth. A garden
filled with lemon, orange, citron, and other tropical
fruit-bearing trees was beneath, or, rather, before her,
for the ground window opened outward into it. The
heavens were deep and tranquil. Silence reigned over
the city. Not a sound came from the deserted streets.
The fragrant night breeze-fanned her brow and
sported
with her raven tresses, while the moon slept upon
her pale forehead as if it had lain on marble. How
exquisitely formed was the hand and arm that
supported
the head! How full of grace her figure! How
beautiful the depth of the upturned eyes! What
sweetness
in the line of her mouth, just parted as if to speak!
How eloquent with tender sorrow was all!
She directed her look to the skies, but her thoughts
were not there. She was communing with her own
heart, into which, unknown to her, love had stolen as
she watched the pillow of the Spanish youth. She
thought of his wondrous beauty and noble demeanour!
She recalled each feature, dwelt on every varying
expression
,
and remembered his accents when he spoke
to her brother. To herself he had not spoken, save
with his eyes; and they were so full of respectful
tenderness
so
impressive, yet so devotedit seemed to
her young heart the language of loveof honourable
love, such as became a maiden to receive.
Does he love me? she tremblingly asked of her
heart.
That she loved him she could no longer disguise
from herself. Like that sweet bud that unfolds its
petals
to the honey-bee only when the sun shines upon
it, her young heart had expanded at the first glance of
his dark eye, and admitted love.
Does he love me? she asked of herself.
She trembled to answer. A deep sigh escaped her,
and thought, busy thought, involved her in its mazes.
Suddenly she started to her feet, as if some bitter
reflection
had stung her to the soul, and, with a wild
laugh and flashing eye, cried, in the short, energetic
tones of despair,
Love me! Ha, ha, ha! Am I not a quadroone?
Yes, he
may
love me! she added, with ironical
bitterness
;
a quadroone is easily loved! Ay, marry!
Vol. I.N
she hath lovers enough! Thou art well punished,
foolish
maiden, for forgetting thy condition. That burning
thought! It is fire to my brain! Crushed are all my
bright visions! wrecked my hopes!
Love
,
Love
!
The very word, so dear to a virgin heart, so pleasant
to her ear, becomes a name of guilt on my lip!
Her air, the indignant, ringing tones of her voice,
and the vivacity of her manner, showed a spirit and
dignity that were scarce to be looked for in one so
gentle and feminine. But the awakened spirit of an
insulted woman hath ever the lofty character of
sublimity
.
She walked her room with a rapid step for a few
moments, then suddenly stood still, as if a flash of
thought had checked her. Her voice was now more
subdued, and hope beamed in her eyes.
Nay, he was so noble, and his presence so gentle,
and his eyes were so respectful! Ifyet he may not
have known me to be one of the accursed race!
Men are not wont to look upon
us
as he looked on me!
I could have cast myself at his feet, for I felt he would
have lifted me to his heart. Oh! my poor heart!
Still thy throbbing; for he whom thou art so wildly
beating for will ne'er care for thee if thou break! Ah
me! thou wilt be soon quiet enough in the grave.
She sank upon an ottoman as she mournfully said
this, and seemed lost in the bitterness of wo! Poor
Azlie! Who will not pity thee! Child of guilt,
and daughter of infamy! Notwithstanding thou hast
lived amid all the fascinations of vice and the
allurements
of luxurious temptation; notwithstanding thou
hast been taught to believe beauty given to thee to
ensnare
,
and that female purity hath its price! that
virtue
is only a name, and honour as the idle wind;
notwithstanding
thy mind has been poisoned by subtle
morals, and thy soul perverted by the example and
precept
of an unnatural mother; notwithstanding all of
thy race, and the light-hearted maidens of thy youth,
embrace dishonour, and blush not at what they know
no wrong in, yet thou art innocent and pure! Heaven
hath given thee a spotless spirit and a virtuous heart;
endowed thee with a lovely and gentle nature, yet a
firmness and pride of spirit that leadeth thee to prefer
death to infamy, and the dark silence of the grave to
the silken couch of illicit love!
She had remained in the drooping attitude into
which she had sunk upon the divan, her soul full of
gentle sadness, but a few minutes, when a door at the
opposite extremity of her sleeping apartment opened,
and a female, of the most majestic beauty of form,
stately, but not tall, with an inconceivable grace in her
step and carriage, entered, and drew back the
curtains
of the couch. With an exclamation of surprise
at finding it unoccupied, she, with a quicker step,
entered
the room where sat Azlie, too deeply busied in
her own reflections to observe her presence. She
was about thirty-five years of age, with an eye of the
most voluptuous black, and depth of passion. Her
complexion was of the richest brown of the ripe
berry
,
warm, sunny, and glowing, and soft with all the
delicacy of youth. The high, smooth forehead was a
model for a queenly brow, notwithstanding the shadow
of the olive, and not the bright light of the lily, rested
there. Her brows were black as night, but pencilled
to a hair in the most perfect arches; while the eyes
beneath
!they
were orbs of soul, glorious, magnificent
languid, burning, and ardent in their glances, yet
melting with tenderness: eyes dark and dangerous as
they were beautiful! The mouth was as dangerous as
the eyes, for Love seemed there to have touched his
arrows
ere he shot them from the latter. Her nose
was straight and finely shaped; her lips cut as if with
the chisel; her chin of that faultless roundness and
downy finish that will be remembered in beautiful
woman, and which no pen may delineate. Her face
was a fine oval, the contour of which the arrangement
of her raven hair, parted on her forehead, as if for
night costume, smoothly on each temple, contributed
to preserve. Her form was enveloped in a
robe de
chamber
, that displayed her superb bust, and small,
elegant
waist, without altogether hiding the shape of an
arm of matchless proportions; while beneath were
visible a pair of very small feet, very hollow in the
instep
,
of that pure model and exquisite delineation
characteristic of the quadroone, of which, save at the
ball of the heel and near the toe, no part touched the
earth. The majestic breadth, yet symmetry of her
shoulders and bust were extraordinarily contrasted by
the smallness of her pliant waist, though in the
perfect
tournure
of her whole figure the unity and
harmony
were complete. Altogether, hers were the face,
foot, and figure of a quadroone, a race which, in form,
limb, and action of the body, are models of the human
species. She paused in surprise as she beheld the
maiden, and the angry light of her eyes, which the
long, heavy lid, and soft, sable fringes could not subdue,
betrayed that, amid all that voluptuous langour, there
slumbered a mine of passion, and that Hecate, as
well as Cupid, held empire there.
Azlie! girl, why art thou not on thy pillow? Is
it that thou mayest now spoil thine eyes and cheek that
I have been for years unfolding thy charms and
instilling
into thee the arts of loveliness? Up with thee,
girl!
At the first sound of her voice, the young Quadroone
shrunk instinctively within herself; but the moment
afterward she rose, and, with her hands folded upon
her breast, stood submissively and patiently before her.
What would you,
ma mre?
she asked, seeing her
mother fix her large full eye upon her, with the
deliberative
look of one who had not decided whether to
pursue towards her a course of forbearance or
sternness
.
Why art thou not in thy chamber?
Renault
Renault! It is ever Renault! The stripling hath
got to rule the household, by the Virgin! she said,
angrily. What hath he done now?
He bade me watch by the wounded cavalier's
couch, his duties carrying him abroad.
And didst thou come from thence, when now I
heard thy footstep and voice in the corridor, which
brought me hither? she demanded, almost fiercely
pressing her arm with passionate force.
I have,
ma mre
.
Sleeps he yet? she inquired, rapidly interrogating
her.
He hath awakened refreshed.
Hast thou spoken to him?
Nay,
ma mere!
Nor he to thee?
My brother came in and woke him, I believe, she
answered, now remembering, with sudden surprise,
that she herself had fallen asleep.
Her jealous mother saw the blush that mantled her
face, and fixed her eyes upon her as if she would read
her soul with a glance.
Tell me truly, she asked again, with slow and
terrific emphasis, hath he spoken with thee?
No,
ma mre
.
Nor thou to him?
No.
Nor by sign nor look? she demanded, more
severely
.
Nay, mother.
She looked into the maiden's countenance an
instant
after she answered, and then, as if satisfied of
her truth, said,
'Tis well for him it is so.
He should have died
.
Azlie buried her face in her hands and was silent;
but the words her mother had spoken were every one
of them as a strong cord of mingled pity and
resentment
to bind the young Spaniard closer to her heart.
Opposition, as it ever will, effectually secured to him
one who would be his firm protector if she menaced
him with danger. After watching her daughter's
countenance for a moment, she said, in a more gentle
tone,
It is well for thee and him. Thou knowest a
breath upon thy reputation would defeat my hopes of
N 2
thee. Thou shouldst remember that the honour of a
quadroone, till she hath her protector, is sacred as a
betrothed bride's. Thy brother Renault hath become
too independent; he spurns my authority, and would
control thee as if thou owed obedience nowhere else!
Is he with the Spaniard?
I left him there,
ma mre
.
See thou keep thy chamber while this stranger is
here. Renault shall send him away ere the day end.
Thou art too lovely a treasure, child, to be lightly
guarded. One stain upon thy maiden honour, and the
poorest bourgeois of the town would not accept thee.
As thou art, a prince might kneel for thee.
Mother, hear me! said Azlie, with spirit. The
destiny you have in store for me shall never be mine.
I would not share the unblessed couch of an emperor.
Thou carest for my honour. Mockery, mockery,
mother! Alas! thou knowest not the meaning of
honour save that it is the price of dishonour. Since
yesterday, light has broken in upon me. I will die,
mother, ere I become the thing you would have me!
The spirit of her eye and brow bore testimony to her
words.
What means this, child? demanded the
quadroone-mother
,
with surprise; and then asked
scornfully
,
Would you be a wife?
I will never be a concubine, she replied with
spirit, blushing crimson with shame, that her feelings
should be so rudely tried.
Ha! this young Spaniard hath done this!
I have done it.
He hath offered terms to thee?
Never! she cried, with indignation.
Art thou mad? What is this that hath possessed
thee?
Virtue.
Virtue! ha! Yes, I have taken care that thou
art virtuous, and that thou continue so till he who
would wear thee hath paid the price of thy beauty.
It is worth a princess's equipage, and shall win it for
thee. But calm thyself, my sweet child. I have come
to tell thee thou needest think no more, not will I speak
to thee more, of this Jules Caronde, whom thy
obstinacy
hath compelled to a course against me and
thyself
that he shall answer for. Does he think that by
enslaving the mother, even for one hour, in order to
possess the daughter, he shall succeed? No! This
hand shall deprive both him of its object and thee of
life at the same moment first.
Thanks, thanks,
ma mre!
she cried, embracing
her.
This obstinacy of thine hath turned to thy good
fortune, she continued, returning with a caress the
grateful expression of her feelings. The claim he
makes I have papers in my possession to defeat. But
I can never forget that he has made it, and that before
all men I and thou have been proclaimed slaves.
Slaves
, mother!
Caronde's slaves!
Azlie uttered a cry of despair, tottered, and would
have fallen but for the support of her mother's arm,
beside whom she sunk down almost insensible.
Fear not, my child! The instruments of
manumission
,
signed and sealed by his father, are in my
private cabinet, to be forthcoming if the crisis to call
them forth should ever arrive. But I have learned
that he has been carried to his fortress, heavily
wounded
,
in the affray in the
Place d' Armes
, and may not
livewhich the saints grant! Rise, child; thou shalt
never hear of him more from me, and I will forgive
thy disobedience to my wishes, as he has not proved
worthy of my choice or of thy gentle beauty.
She embraced her daughter as she spoke, who
returned
her unwonted kindness with a smile, brighter
than for many days had lighted up her features. She
then commanded her to retire, and kissed and bade
her an affectionate good-night, saying, with a smile.
I knew I should lighten thy heart,
enfante
, with
my news. Caronde hath made himself basely
unworthy
of you, and thou shalt not hear, at least,
his
name
again.
Nor
any
name, I implore thee,
ma mre
. I will
willingly die first.
Nay,
ma chre
, we will not talk of that now; go
to sleep, or thine eyes will be red and swollen with
these late hours. The night air and burning oil are
poison to beauty.
CHAPTER XII.
THE SORCERESS.
Thus
speaking, the stately quadroone-mother left
the apartment. The indignity offered to her by the
solicitor of her daughter's person was not the only
motive that influenced the change so agreeable to
Azlie in her manner, who had wondered that she had
betrayed no regret at her disappointment in the loss
of the young marquis, on whom, for his wealth and
rank, she had fixed as her vowless lord, and whose
suit she had for several weeks encouraged with the
exercise of all her authority. A noble mansion, a
train of slaves, gorgeous equipages, and a style of
appearance
above all other quadroones in the province,
were temptations, both to her pride and cupidity, that
were not to be thought lightly of; for they confirmed
her most sanguine hopes for Azlie, fulfilled the end
of her jealous care and education, and constituted, in
her opinion, the highest and happiest condition in which
she could place her.
Such was the highest happiness sought or wished
by the quadroone-mother for her daughter! Such
was the fate to which each lovely daughter was
destined
such
the fruition of their maiden hopes. That
she betrayed no regret, nor uttered a word of
disappointment
at resigning all these, but, on the contrary,
was calm and more than usually gentle, surprised
Azlie as she reflected upon it after her departure.
There was, indeed, a deep yet concealed cause for this,
which, for the present, the quadroone-mother kept
secretly
hidden in her own breast, but which, if known
to the lovely girl, would have redoubled the weight of
heaviness upon her spirits that her kind parting words
had so magically removed. The secret intelligence
and duplicity that marked her smile, and the proud
hopes that elevated her air and step as she retired
from the boudoir, were lost upon the daughter, who,
happy in the relief the words conveyed, sought beyond
them for no covert meaning.
Whatever the secret motive might be that reigned
so supremely in the breast of the quadroone-mother
as to leave no room for natural regret at the
destruction
of long-cherished hopes, it was plain, from her
manner, that it was sufficient to make amends for her
disappointment, and must be a high and
commensurate
cause to induce her so readily to permit her
daughter to cease to think of Jules Caronde.
That she was no longer to speak to her on the
subject
she so sensitively shrunk from was not to be
believed
.
Azlie was still a
quadroone!
Her spirited
protest had not been understood by the mother, who,
like the Circassian parent, looked to this disposal of
her daughter as a natural and suitable one. If her
feelings were understood, they produced no
impression
upon her. As well might the mothers of Europe
cease to regard the hymeneal welfare of their
daughters
,
as the quadroone-mother to cease to look after
the happiness and interests of a beautiful child. To
her custom has made concubinage as honourable as
marriage. There was, therefore, still another trial in
store for Azlie.
These reflections, however, scarcely flitted across
her mind, and left no more permanent impression
than the wing of the swallow upon the still lake. She
thought only of her present happiness, and scarcely
restrained herself from flying to her brother and
communicating
the intelligence. Once she thought of the
power
of the fierce young marquis, and that it might
be greater than her brother's, and she looked up to
heaven, as if her hope was there, and became
reassured
.
She was now about to prepare for her late toilet,
when the sonorous calls of the sentries throughout
the city drew her to the lattice where she had before
been seated. She listened to the answering cries, loud
and prolonged, of
All's well!
at first with a startled
ear, and then with a strange delight, as voice after
voice broke the stillness and died away in the distance.
She then cast a hasty glance at the quiet sky, with its
heraldry of stars, and with the half-breathed wish of a
child that she was there, far from the world's woes,
was about to retire from the chilly night air, when a
rustling in the branches of a tree before the lattice
attracted
her ear and eye. While in a half-flying
attitude
she endeavoured to penetrate the shadow into
which the lower part of the tree was cast, a tall figure,
wrapped from head to feet in a mantle, suddenly
stepped
forth from the obscurity, and, ere she could utter
an exclamation either of terror or surprise, or fly
from the casement, laid a hand upon her arm.
Maiden, fear notcry not out! I am thy friend,
and am here to save and bless thee!
The voice was gentle and kind, and was that of a
woman. She repressed the cry of alarm that rose to
her lips, and said with firmness,
What would you with me?
I may not speak with thee here, without, she
said, releasing her hold upon her arm; and, passing
through the doorlike window, she entered the boudoir.
Azlie retreated to the centre of the room, and
gazed upon her with emotions more of surprise and
curiosity than of fear; for the singularly gentle and
kind tones of her voice had instantly and surprisingly
dispelied all anxiety for her own safety, even when she
found herself alone with her.
A gorgeous abode, gentle maiden, said the
extraordinary
intruder, looking round the rich apartment,
which was seen by the soft light diffused by the
fragrant
lamp. It becomes thy birth; this is as it
should be! Nay, drop not thy head! Thou thinkest
I mock thee, and that there is irony in my words.
Thou wilt one day learn, my Lalla, that I speak no
riddles. 'Tis well, she added, surveying the
sumptuous
furniture and silken drapery; 'tis befitting thee!
I would have it so. There is an altar! thou art a
Christian, too! they have taught thee this faith!
Whose is this crucifix? she demanded, taking up the
image.
Mine, mother!
There is but one God, and Mohammed is his
prophet, she repeated, in a deep, impressive voice.
Surely I have heard those words before!
exclaimed
Azlie, starting with sudden recollection; and thy
form and voice are like an indistinct passage of a
half-remembered
dream of childhood.
Bless thee, child'!' said the woman, with a smile
of pleasure, thou hast not forgotten all! Memory
hath been faithful to her trust. Let me kiss thy hand
in token of my gratitude.
Ere she could withdraw it, she enthusiastically, and
with a look and air of adoration, seized and pressed
her lips upon it.
Who art thou, strange woman? demanded
Azlie
,
with increasing wonder.
Thy guardian angel. One who will watch over
thee for thy good; who will defeat the machinations
of thine enemies, and secure thy happiness on earth.
Dost thou know me?
No, mother!
Wilt thou believe and trust me?
I will, she said, earnestly; for friends to the
unfortunate are prized jewels not to be cast aside.
The sound of thy voice wins me. I will believe thou
seekest my good.
It is enough. I knew it. I knew I should find
thee of this spirit. Bless thee, child. Enemies are
around thee. But I know thy virtue, and the guilty
persecutions and evil machinations of the wicked and
beautiful woman who left thee but now. Fear her
not. I have power over her that you know not of.
Power to make her spirit tremble. One word from
me will be a poisoned dagger to her heart. Thy trials
are not yet over. I foresee danger to thee in the
future
.
It is even close at hand. But fear not! I, who
foresee the evil, can see the remedy. Trust to me,
and thou shalt be triumphant. The trial is less for
thee than for the retribution of one who, ere the
morrow's
sun, will have sought thee out and found thee;
for the fame of thy beauty hath reached him.
Save me, I beseech thee, mother! Thy foreboding
words are death! she cried, supplicating her with
clasped hands.
Nay, in thy utmost peril, lay not a hand upon thy
life! Here is a token of my truth. Take it and wear
it. It will ever command my power and presence!
When thou art in thy greatest extremity, use it.
She took from her neck a small hollow circlet of
gold, on which were inscribed some Arabic verses,
surrounding
an amethyst of singular shape, in the centre
of which was graven a mysterious sign, and placed it
around her neck.
Now, child of my heart, thou art under my
protection
,
and that of the good spirits. No harm shall
attend thee, though the danger that hangs over thee
will be great and imminent. She then placed her
hand upon her head, and, looking upon her pale but
beauteous face, said, as if unconscious of speaking
aloud.
There is the brow and eye of the motherthe
firm and beautiful lip of the sire. Maiden, thou art
very fair. There is no wonder that thy beauty hath
been, even as thy mother's was, a bane to thee! But
thy mother's fate shall not be thine.
Bless thee, bless thee for that word! cried Azlie,
gratefully.
Dost thou know of whom I speak? Nay, thou
canst not; nor neither shall the quadroon's fate be
thine, gentle Lalla.
Why call me Lalla, good mother?
It is thy name.
Nay, Azlie.
Be it so. Thou art Lalla to me. Adieu. I
have watched thee many a night when thou knewest
it not. The hawk hath now slipped its jess, and it
becomes
the keeper of singing birds to be present and
watchful. Therefore have I come hither now to put
thee on thy guard, and bid thee hope. I would have
thee know me too. See that no one, not even thy
brother, knoweth of our interview! Is he abroad
still?
He is with a Spanish cavalier who has been
wounded
And is beneath this roof. He hath done well.
How fares the stranger, maiden?
He hath slept, she answered, quickly.
He will be better, then. Guard thy heart, for
speech of him, I perceive, is already a talisman to
call the blood to thy brow.
Is he not worthy? she asked, earnestly.
If thy beauty and gentleness can win him, he is
worthy to win and wear even
thee
, she said, with a
smile that made even her dark countenance pleasing.
Now, good-night. I must go and make a visit of a
sterner kind to a warrior, and not to a maiden; and,
once more kissing the hand of the surprised Azlie, she
hastily passed through the window, and vanished amid
the foliage.
While the bewildered Azlie, to whom this brief
visit had been like a dream, still stood on the spot
where the sorceress had parted from her, gazing after
her dark, tall form, and wondering in her mind at the
event, a light touch was laid upon her shoulder, and,
looking round, she beheld standing behind her her
brother, who that moment had taken his leave of the
young Spaniard.
I heard a voice besides thine, sister; and this eager
Vol. I.O
attitude I find thee in, with thy gaze towards the
garden
!
Ha! there is no wind to move yonder acacia!
he cried, darting past her.
Stay, brother, stay! she cried, holding him by
the hand ere he could break from her.
Thou hast not been alone, then, he said, obeying,
and eying her with a look of inquiry; I know you
too well, he added, with the tone of confidence due to
her truth and love, to believe there has been
anything
wrong, whoever hath been with thee. It is
enough for me that you wish the intruder to escape.
Dearest Renault, I should die to labour under your
suspicions. Your generosity weighs more with me
than the command I received to keep her presence a
secret. Moreover, thou thyself hast discovered it.
It is but a woman, then?
A woman, indeed, but one whose voice and words
had strange power over me, she said, in an
impassioned
tone.
Was she not known to thee? he asked, in
surprise
.
No, brother; yet with early memories her tall
figure is strangely mingled.
Tall!
Ha! this chimes! Wore she a gray
mantle that descended to the ground? he eagerly
demanded
of her.
You have seen her, then, Renault!
I must believe that I have, and that it is the same
who bade me succour the Spanish cavalier. Spoke
she of this wounded stranger?
She did, and commended you for bringing him
hither.
It is the same. What will come of it all? It is
mysterious. What interest can she have in thee?
What was the matter and manner of her visit?
In a few words she related to him all that had
transpired, not omitting the interview with her mother,
and then watched earnestly the expression his
thoughtful
face assumed after she had ended.
The maturer mind of Renault was deeply impressed
by her narration. He judged and weighed together
corresponding facts without the medium of passion.
He took a calm and rational survey of what had been
said and done at both interviews. The result was, he
arrived at the just and certain conclusion that his
mother
had laid some deep and dangerous plot for the
sacrifice
of his sister, and that it was discovered by this
singular woman, who had warned her against it. Who
could she be, or why she should take such an interest
in his sister, he was unable to divine. He did not
communicate his opinions to Azlie, but internally
resolved
to discover the conspiracy, if such there was,
ere it should ripen, and, in the mean while, watch over
her safety against enemies, within and without, with
double diligence.
What think you, brother? she asked, seeing him
so long silent and thoughtful.
That Heaven hath given thee another protector
besides thy brother. I came hither to bid thee
good-night
,
and pray thee to keep within till my return at
noon. Walk not even in the garden, nor abroad, save
at mass. Nay, this barricade must be dropped.
As he spoke he touched a bar, and a framework of
iron slid from the wall, and, catching in the opposite
side of the window, presented a firm barrier to egress
or ingress. Thou wert careless, child, to leave this
open, knowing your danger from Caronde and his
minions. This visit of the sorceress, as thou callest
her, is a warning to thee! What said she of our
mother? was it not that she had power over her?
That would make her tremble!
Ah! this knowledge may be of use to me. I will
bear it in mind. Now good-night, dearest. Haste
to thy couch, and in the morning see that our guest is
well entertained, even as his need and wounded state
shall require.
Is he better?
Not so well. Let him be kept quiet.
Thus speaking, he affectionately took leave of his
sister, and departed by the door leading to his
mother's
apartments. Azlie, soon afterward retiring to
her chamber, took up her mandoline, and,
accompanying
it with her voice, created that flood of melody
which fell on the ravished ears of the cavalier, and
lulled his senses into sweet and calm repose. In a
few minutes afterward she herself was asleep, and
dreaming that she was watching by the pillow where
she had left her heart.
CHAPTER XIII.
SCENE BETWEEN THE QUADROONE-MOTHER AND HER SON.
Renault
closed the door behind him, and, crossing
a small paved hall, tapped lightly at a half-open door
on the opposite side.
Come in, Renault, said the richly-toned voice of
his mother.
He entered a sumptuous chamber, characterized by
luxury and voluptuous ease, and found his mother
reclining
on one of those elegant open couches so much
in use in tropical countries. She half rose to receive
him with an indolent, indifferent air, in which coldness
rather than affection was predominant.
What have you come for, Renault? she asked,
without looking upon him.
My beloved sister's happiness, he said, firmly.
You are ever a marplot, boy, she said, quickly,
fixing upon him an angry glance.
Azlie shall never submit to the fate of her race.
She is too lovely and pure. She has all the virtues of
a wife, and none of the vices of a mistress. Ere she
shall be one, I will kill her with my own hand.
Thou wouldst be a fratricide to save thy sister's
honour! Azlie is a quadroone, and must fulfil her
destiny. Surely there is nothing degrading to her.
She has all the luxuries and privileges of a wife,
without
its obedience and slavish duties. I would rather
be thy father's concubine than his wedded wife. This
silly notion and sickly sentiment that has possessed
thee, boy, and with which the girl has gone mad, will
ne'er make her a bride. The law has forbidden her
marriage with a cavalier and gentleman, and she shall
never wed with a quadroon.
It were more honourable to be the wife of a slave
than to be the mistress of a prince.
This is high language. Dost thou forget that
thou art a quadroon, and that thy sister is one also?
Dishonour in a quadroone is no less dishonour.
Has not the very law that has forbidden
honourable
marriage legalized its substitute, boy, and made it
honourable? If we are forbidden to marry, there is
no guilt in all that we have left to uswedlock
without
priest.
I cannot reason with thee, mother. Education
thy own lifeall that thou seest around thee,
strengthen
thee in thy singular opinion. I have thought that
female virtue in a daughter was dear to a mother.
So it is; and it is therefore that we provide for
our daughters, whom we cannot wed to whom we
would, suitable protectors.
Paramours, you should have said. But this, you
say, is not true, mother. Quadroones may wed with
quadroons; though so differently are our men
educated
,
that I must allow with sorrow that the union would
be unequal. Cease to educate your daughters as baits
to criminal passion, and their conditions will be less
unequal. It is your pride, your love of display and
finery, your female ambition and envious desire to
surpass
wives and honourable mothers, ay, to rob them
of the honourable love which is justly their due; to
share favours which are not thine own, but belong to
those whose title and claim to them is more sacred
than thine! Seek not to cast the blame upon others;
the fault lies in thee, and the secret of it is guilty
ambition
,
that, to attain its end, has degraded female
virtue
O 2
to an article of merchandise, till our sisters are
become a proverb and a by-word.
While the indignant youth was speaking, she fixed
her large eyes upon his excited countenance with
surprise
,
which, as he ceased, changed to anger.
Slave, thou hast sealed thy fate, and that of her
thou hast dared to teach rebellion.
Ha! what mean you by this dark threat? he
cried, alarmed at the malicious energy of her voice
and manner more than by the words.
I hold in my hands the papers of my manumission,
which the marquis gave me and forgot to record.
Then hath Heaven preserved them to prevent the
commission of a blacker crime than earth hath ever
witnessed. But that cold, dark eye tells me thou hast
not told me this for any good. Out with thy
wickedness
.
Azlie, as I have this night told her, shall never
more be troubled with thy brother's suit. I have
higher
game than even he!
I knew it, and came here to find it out, he
exclaimed
.
Knew it! she repeated, with amazement; how
knew you it?
By knowing
thee!
he replied, in a tone and
manner
that caused her to change colour, and for an
instant
shake her foot, that rested on an ottoman by
her couch, with a rapid and nervous motion. I
knew, he added, observing the effects of his words,
that thou wouldst never give up an end which thou
hast had so near to thy heart as this sale of Azlie to
the Marquis of Caronde, unless thou hadst a full
equivalent
for him.
She smiled meaningly, and then said, in a slow,
deliberate
tone of voice, I have done with Jules; he
shall never be master nor protector to your sister;
who will be, I shall not mention. But mark me, if
you step between her and me in my future plans for
her happiness and best interests, I will place the
papers
of my manumission in the hands of the Spanish
governor Osma, and enslave her to him.
And thyself
I care not for myself, so that I punish her pride
and have my revenge of thee.
Thou art an incarnate fiend if thou didst give me
birth
if
thou didstfor methinks thou shouldst have
been my brother Jules's mother.
Ah! what is this thou sayest? she cried, quickly,
following him with her eyes as he strode across the
room, spurred by his excited feelings. But, instantly
seeing that he spoke at random, and meant no more
than he said, she recovered her composure; for her
face had flushed, and she had half risen to her feet at
his insinuation.
Dare
to do this thing, woman! he said, returning
to her and almost whispering, so deep was his voice,
which seemed to issue from his soul.
She quailed before his piercing eye and menacing
tones, yet her spirit was not less firm than his.
I will do it, if thou come between me and thy
sister
.
Azlie shall become the bride of Death ere she
shall live in guilt, he replied, resolutely.
If she becomes a slave, thou mayst thank thy
fraternal
care and
love!
Thou art my mother, and I may not use violence
towards thee, as I am tempted to do, to get possession
of those papers. But, I repeat, beware how thou
makest
use of them!
Beware how thou thwart my plans! she
responded
,
in the same tone.
For a few moments Renault stood lost in thought.
All at once a change came over his countenance, as
if hope had been suddenly revived. With a careless
air, and assuming the indolent action of his mother, he
cast himself upon an ottoman beside the couch, and
said, with a light laugh,
Well, well,
ma mr!
have it thy own way.
She gave him her soft, elegant hand, the fingers of
which glittered with diamonds, and said with a smile,
which came like a flash of sunlight on her facefor
lightning is scarce quicker than the changes of passion
in the quadroone
You have done well, Renault. It is for the child's
happiness and thy own that she be well cared for.
You are armed, I perceive, and look as if you were
about to ride. Attend to thy own affairs, Renault,
abroad, and leave Azlie to me. Thou wilt not
repent
it!
Maybe notmaybe not! This is a rare jewel
on thy little finger, he added, as if for the first time
struck with its beauty; doubtless a gift from my
father
.
It was, Renault. Ah, the good, dear marquis!
He never thought I could be happy unless loaded with
diamonds! Azlie, I wish she could do as well; she
has beauty enough.
Never mind Azlie, mother. This turquoise
was that given thee by my father?
It was a gift from him the day Jules was born.
Jules! 'tis strange! he said, with surprise.
No, nothyself I meant.
The youth fixed upon her a glance of inquiry, and
then resumed his careless toying with her jewelled hand.
Ma mre
, he said, in a natural tone, though the
expression of his eye, as he rested it upon her face,
betrayed
a deep purpose beneath his careless manner,
do you believe in dreams?
I used to in childhood.
Thou dost not now?
No. They are idle nothings.
Dost thou dream now?
Seldom, save in fever.
Never of the sheeted dead?
No, boy. What mean you? she asked, turning
pale.
Nothing; I did but ask you. I had a dream last
night.
Dost thou believe in them?
Sometimes.
What are dreams, boy?
Dreams, some think, are of Heaven. I have also
thought so. But I can understand them now. Thou
hast doubtless observed that conscience sleeps in
dreaming.
Conscience!
Nay, I meant nothing. 'Tis so. Conscience sleeps
in dreams. The moral sense is then wanting. Then
we do commit the blackest crimes, nor think it wrong.
Crimes!
Nay, I meant nothing. We do bathe our hands
in innocent blood in dreams, and nothing teaches us
'tis wrong. Conscience  moral sense  that divine
something which, when waking, accuses or condemns
our acts, is then silent. 'Tis strange, but 'tis so. I
have thought we act in dreams as brute beasts act
with intelligence, but without reason. And that,
waking
,
we should by nature be and act the same way
but for that
divine light
. This light sets like the sun
in sleep, and leaves the soul to its unillumined native
darkness. There are,
ma mre
, he continued, in an
indifferent tone, human beings in whom this light
hath not shone when awake. Such persons, awake,
act as if they dreamed, so far as conscience hath its
play. Crimes to them leave no compunction. Thou
hast heard of such, doubtless.
The hand he held trembled in his, and the eyes of
his mother furtively sought his immoveable
countenance
.
Thou didst not answer. It matters not: such
persons
have lived as I speak of. Christ pity them, and
save them from wo; for death will wake them up, and
give to them back their consciences, armed with a
thousand
stings.
Of whom speakest thou, Renault? she faintly
asked, pale with some inward emotion she sought to
overcome and conceal.
Nay, I have tired thee: I will relate the dream I
had last night. Methought I slept within a bower in
the garden, when I was awakened by a voice, which
said,
`Renault, dost thou love thy sister?'
`Dearly as life,' I answered.
`She is in danger,' said the voice, which was like
that of a female.
`I will defend her with my life,' I replied.
What said the voice? asked his mother, eagerly.
`Thou wilt, unaided, be overcome,' said the voice;
`thy power is human, and thy enemies stronger than
thou. If thou wilt save her, go to thy mother, and say
to her that the Fates have marked the day of her
death!'
`Is the secret with thee?' I asked of the voice.
`It is with her. It is the day on which she does
with thy sister as she has meditated.'
What said she farther? asked the Quadroone, with
a contemptuous smile of incredulity; did she not bid
thee turn seer for thy wisdom, and prophesy in silly
women's ears? Out! Renault! This mockery is too
contemptible.
I saw her! he said, solemnly, and meeting her
eyes with a searching look.
It was courteous in the mysterious speaker to
appear
,
after amusing you so long unseen, she said,
striving to laugh, but with ill success; for in the
ghastly
smile that distorted her features she betrayed
herself
to be a guilty woman, and was in her soul
trembling
at the anticipated revelation of some secret crime.
She was tall, very tall, he said, without appearing
to observe her emotion, although keenly watching
every
motion of the least muscle of her face; and she
wore a long gray mantle, that covered her from her
eyes to the feet.
As he said this, his eyes seemed as if they would
pierce her soul. Instead of betraying the feelings he
had anticipated, he scarcely knew why, she seemed
suddenly relieved by the description, and breathed
freely; for she had ceased respiring to hang upon the
words as they fell from him, as if she feared some
dreaded result.
Ha! ha! ha! she laughed; thou hast made a
pleasant tale of it.
This did not escape him, but he was not to be
defeated. He was now more confident than before
that there was some secret, the discovery of which
would give him the key to her will; and he was fully
impressed with the conviction that the extraordinary
being who had visited his sister in her boudoir was
connected with it. He therefore betrayed no
disappointment
,
but, in the same tone of indolent
indifference
in which he had detailed to her his
readily-invented
dream, continued,
Her accent was foreign, which I thought odd in an
apparition.
Was it Moorish? she asked, with a rapidity that
surprised him.
Nay, I am not skilled in dialects, but methinks
'twas something so; her face was dark brown, like a
Moor's; and I noticed
Well and she caught him nervously by the
arm, and, looking with wild inquiry in his face, cried,
thou wouldst add something more
And, now that I remember, he added, with a
coolness
that ill concealed his anticipated triumph,
beneath
her mantle she wore the dress of a
necromanceress
.
The Quadroone uttered a wild shriek, and, burying
her face in the pillow, her whole frame became
convulsed
with
what feeling, whether of terror, of rage,
or of despair, or all three united, Renault could not
tell. But, alarmed at the violence of the paroxysm,
and almost repenting the course he had taken to
possess
himself of the secret of the stranger's power over
her, which he had now proved to exist, he was about
to confess his stratagem, and leave what he wished
developed
to the future, when she rose to her feet
without
assistance, but with the pallor of death in her face.
My mother, forgive me, he cried, casting himself
at her feet, overcome by the wo and anguish of her
looks.
Nay, Renault, thou art not to blame; Heaven hath
done this thing. Be it as thou wilt with Azlie. I
shall soon be beyond all earthly desires and human
ambition. Go: leave me, I would be alone.
Not so: I will remain with thee till thou art
better
,
he said, tenderly, and bitterly condemning
himself
,
while he wondered at the power of the strange
being who could produce such an effect upon the
human
mind as he was now a witness to.
No, Renault, I would be alone, she said, firmly.
Wilt thou not embrace me, mother?
She returned his filial kiss mechanically, and then
waved her hand commandingly for him to depart.
With his mind filled with wonder and his heart with
grief at the effect his words had produced, he obeyed.
Her eyes followed him until he had disappeared by a
door opening upon the corridor. She then bent her
ear, and listened till the last echo of his footfall ceased;
till she heard the sound of the closing gate of the
mansion
,
and until the receding hoofs of his rapid steed, as
he galloped away, could no longer be heard. Then
clasping together her jewelled fingers, with a face on
which fear and remorse were stamped, cried fervently,
This hath been Heaven's judgment. My doom is
sealed. The terrible threat, pronounced twelve long
years ago, now rings in my ears like my death-knell.
Yet the sacrifice has not been made; Azlie is yet
free and spotless! So shall my punishment be
lighter
.
My ambition and pride have endangered my
soul! Ah! 'tis strange, all! Do the dead come back
again? Do they, invisible to us, hold watch and ward
over the innocent they loved on earth? This is
terrible
to think of, when I remember of what I am guilty!
My soul shrinks, she said, fearfully, closing her eyes
with a shudder, lest her sudden presence from the
world of spirits should confound me! 'Tis wonderful!
Yet my guilt is not consummated; Heaven hath stepped
between my ambition and her innocence ere it had
been to late! and Renault hath been its instrument!
Doth he know, doth he suspect? Nay, it cannot be;
he would not have embraced me at parting!
She continued to reflect, now calmly, now with
excitement
,
upon the events related, and at length began
to weigh in her mind, as the impressions were gradually
weakened by the scale of probability, the circumstances
of Renault's relation. As she remembered he said it
was a dream, her fears strangely lessened; and the
supernatural
influence that at first so vividly affected her
sensibility, lost its power, till finally she was ready to
attribute the whole to one of those unaccountable
contingencies
of place, time, and events, which
occasionally
occur, as if to bewilder the human mind; or,
thought she, Renault, by some intelligible means
unknown
to her, might have acquired a knowledge of
some mysterious connexion between her and a
sorceress
(which it was now plain there had been), and made
use of it to accomplish his own ends by the influence
it would probably have over her.
Arguments are never wanting when the mind would
strengthen itself against its own fears. Renault had
not been absent half an hour, before nearly every trace
of the emotions he had awakened had subsided, though
they were not wholly eradicated. There yet remained
sufficient traces of superstitious fear to ensure, at least
for the present, the fulfilment of her promise to him,
that Azlie should be subject to his control. But the
event will show that even this lingering influence
became
too weak to restrain her when tempted by her
long-cherished interests and aspiring ambition, and that
in moral as well as in spiritual things, the heart
back-slides
when the present fear that moves it is no longer
apparent to the senses.
Vol. I.P
CHAPTER XIV.
SCENE BETWEEN GOBIN AND THE TRUMPETER.
When
Renault left the presence of his mother, he
traversed, with a hasty step, the corridor to the broad
portal which led from the street to the inner court.
As he approached the passage, his horse, which stood
in a recess beside the closed gates ready saddled,
neighed a recognition of his approach, and pawed the
paved floor with impatient hoofs. An old slave at the
same time came forth from the lodge on the opposite
side, and, taking the animal by the head, led him out
into the arched passage, which was dimly illuminated
by a small lamp placed in a niche above the door.
Has it struck one yet, Paul? he asked of the aged
porter, as he received the rein from his hand, and
lightly leaped into the high-peaked saddle.
It will 'fore you get to 'um barrier, young Mas
Renault. These is troublous times, he added,
shaking
his head, as if wishing to exchange opinions with
his master on the recent events, when poor old
African
,
in his gray head, hab serbe de Spanis' king. I
nebber 'spec to come to dis!
Keep to the lodge, good Paul, he said, smiling,
and thou wilt scarce know the change till thou be
called to serve a greater king than he of France or
Spain. Take thy keys from thy belt, and let me forth.
Thou keepest all well and secure. 'Tis right, when
citizens'
houses are stormed by ruffians in broad noon.
They made good four hours' work for the smith I
sent for, said the old man, angrily; and the iron
bar of the door is bent like a Comanchee's bow. But
I have had all made strong again, as you bade me,
Mas' Renault, concluded Paul, as he unlocked the tall
folding gates of oak. But before removing the bar,
he threw open a little square window in the gate, and
looked out, with the cautious scrutiny of a practised
doorkeeper.
All is still in the street, Mas' Renault, he said,
closing the window, and opening one half of the gate;
for this, like all other entrances in the houses of the
creoles, was a
porte cochre
, constructed to admit
volantes
,
the only carriage then in use, to pass from the
street into the quadrangle, around which were situated
the apartments of the mansion.
Thou seest our new rulers keep a quiet town,
nevertheless
,
said Renault, as he tightened the rein, and
settled himself firmly in his saddle; I shall return in
a few hours. Let not the bolt be drawn, after thou
hast turned it behind me, for
any one
during my
absence
,
save to let thy mistress to mass, as thou valuest
thy head, he added, with impressive authority; thus
plainly showing that it was his intention to hold the
young Spanish cavalier in another light than that of a
guestas a prisoner. For such was the crisis of
affairs
in the birth of a new dynasty, that it became the
foiled party to cling for protection to whatever held
out the prospect of being made available for personal
safety in the moment of personal danger.
Drawing his sword and laying it across his
saddle-bow
,
Renault then struck his spurs into the horse's
sides, and bounded through the dark arch into the
moonlit street just as the clock in the Cathedral tower
tolled one.
I am full tardy! thou must make up for it,
Baptiste
,
he cried to his steed, patting his arched neck;
then glancing an instant to the head of the street
which issued into the Place d'Armes, where he could
plainly descry the dark body of bivouacked troops,
relieved by the glistening arms as they caught and
flashed back the moonbeams, he added, in a half tone,
There slumbers, like a tiger in his lair, our new
master. I will to-morrow look on this Osma, and see
if he be worthy to govern us; if so, he shall have my
allegiance and that of my friends. The ever-active
villany of Caronde needeth some offset, and I will be
a sleuth hound upon his slimy track.
Thus speaking, he gave rein to his horse, and
galloped
down the long, narrow street towards a barrier
at its extremity. The windows of the dwellings were
all barricaded and dark, and his horse's hoofs alone
broke the profound stillness that reigned. He rode
on, without checking his speed, until he approached
the barrier, before the gate of which a sentinel was
pacing to and fro. When within a hundred yards of
him, and near a narrow avenue that led between a
double row of dilapidated old
casas
, with the gloomy
and deserted government-house at its extremity, he
reined up, and seemed to be deliberating whether to
continue on to the gate, or turn aside into the dark
lane.
Quien l!
challenged the sentinel from the
barrier
,
in a stern tone, ringing his arquebuss on the
pavement. At the same instant an officer and
several
soldiers issued from the guardhouse and formed
in a hostile attitude, while a tall, dark figure was seen
to glide from the shadow of the barrier along the low
wall, and disappear behind an angle of the buttress.
It instantly occurred to him that the form and height
resembled that of the mysterious being who had
commanded
him to fly to the aid of the Spanish cavaliers,
and who afterward had been seen by Azlie.
Prompted
by the impulse of the moment, he instantly turned
his horse's head to purpose her.
Quien l!
repeated the soldier, still more
sternly
;
and, although Renault saw that the muzzles of a
dozen muskets were ready to cover his body, he rode
on in the direction the figure had taken.
Quien l!
was loudly shouted a third time; and
the rattling of the muskets, as they were brought to
the shoulder, reached his ear. He turned back in time
to anticipate the word fire, which in the next instant
would have been given by the officer, and responded,
Amigo
.
Advance, and give the countersign!
He galloped up to the post, touched his bonnet, and
saluted the captain of the guard in Spanish as
courteously
as his impatient feelings would allow him to do.
Buenos noches, seor!
you are vigilant.
Servidor, seor!
returned the Spaniard, with
dignified
courtesy, but not without the tone of suspicion. The countersign, signor, if it please you?
Who was the person that just left the post as I
came up?
The countersign, signor? repeated the officer,
decidedly.
Orleans and Spain.
Bien!
Pas
.
Nay, who left the barrier but now?
Whether man or woman, I know not. 'Tis a
singular
messenger the captain-general has chosen to send
with a countermand of an order he had given out an
hour ago, to fire the town at dawn. A word or two
caught my eyes in the folds, and I opened it against
orders and learned this!
Surely such an order was never given out?
I received mine as captain of the posts on this side
of the city not half an hour since, and now this tall,
gray page of his excellency hath left this countermand.
He handed to him, as he spoke, one of the orders
written
by the Moor.
Then Osma hath a devil's nature in him! he
exclaimed
,
in creole French, as he perused the evidence
of such a sanguinary command having been issued by
the new governor, though afterward countermanded.
If this figure was
hers
, he said to himself, she hath
been the instrument of this change of mind in him!
She hath saved the city, or I have no knowledge.
Nay, close the gate; I will not go forth now. Adieu,
signor! he cried, and galloped onward in the
direction
he had seen the figure vanish from his sight.
He rode a few moments rapidly along the street that
was bounded by the wall, and issued in an open space
among ruins and ravines, through which there was no
passage for a man on horseback, without discerning
P 2
any trace of the object of his pursuit, though, from the
rate at which he had ridden, he must have overtaken
any not absolutely running at the top of their speed.
He leaped from his horse, and, leaving him beside what
appeared to be an uninhabited hovel of stones on the
verge of the ruins, clambered over the broken walls
and descended into the ravine, in the shadow of which
he thought he described a moving object. He was
not deceived; for an instant afterward he beheld the
same tall, gray figure leave the outlet of the
bayou
some distance from him, and proceed across a
desolate
palce, bordered with a few scattered houses of the
meanest description, and take her course with swift but
equal strides towards the south barrier of the city.
Without hesitation he descended the ravine, rapidly
following it to its source, and issued on the level space
beyond; but he here again lost the figure in a clump
of India-trees that shaded the guardhouse on the
opposite
side. He crossed the place at a rapid pace, and
in a few moments came upon the barrier.
Quien l?
cried the startled sentinel, bringing his
arquebuss to his shoulder, and cocking it.
Camarada, he replied, advancing.
The countersign?
Orleans and Spain.
Pas
.
Who crossed your post just now? eagerly
demanded
Renault of the sergeant of the guard, who
came forth with a paper in his hand.
The devil, I believe; and left this countermanding
order from the general.
You are at the barrier early, sir.
Draw no bolt, soldier, I do not go forth, said
Renault
,
seeing him preparing to let him out. Which
way went the governor's messenger? he asked.
Three fathoms at a step towards the east,
answered
the sergeant, with a laugh.
Gracias, seor!
returned Renault, and flew
forward
in the direction indicated.
Twice he thought he saw the dim outline of a
human
form gliding beneath the grove of Pride of India
trees that was before him, and he followed it like the
wind. But, on reaching the spot, all was silent, and
the seemingly illusive object of his pursuit as far from
him as before. At length he came to the head of the
Rue Ursuline, down which, from the nature of the
ground, the pursued must have turned, and which, for
two squares, lay exposed to the moonlight; but all
was motionless. Not an object was visible in the
whole range of his vision. He was about to turn
back, and give up the vain pursuit in despair, when he
heard close to his ear the same voice that arrested
his steps as he was returning the previous evening
from the council-chamber.
What seek you? was the stern demand.
His blood retreated to his heart with the suddenness
of surprise rather than of fear, to which his bold
spirit
was a stranger; and, looking round, he beheld,
standing
within three feet of him, the tall, gray-hooded
figure which, not only from motives of curiosity, but
of intense personal feeling, he had been for the last
ten minutes so eagerly pursuing.
What seekest thou? was repeated, in a voice of
angry reproof.
Thyself, he answered, firmly; though he drew
back a step from the gaze of eyes that, from within
the shadow of a cowl, shone as did those that rested
on him.
What wouldst thou have of me?
I would know who thou art, and wherefore thou
takest an interest in my sister.
Thou wilt know when the time is ripe for the
knowledge, not only of this, but of what else thou
desirest
to learn of me.
Thou meanest the secret of thy wonderful power
over my mother? he said, interrogatively.
Thou shalt know all when next we meet.
When shall this be?
Seek not to know, and beware that my path be
not a second time chosen for thine! Thy steed awaits
thy return! Go! thy companions expect thee. Haste!
there is no time for thee to idle away in vain
curiosity
,
to learn what is not yet for thee to know. To thy
rendezvous; and beware how thou dost lead those
under
thee to give their allegiance to Spain, and beware
how thou tenderest thine own. There will be
employment
yet for thee and a thousand spirits like thine in
thy country's cause! Remember and beware!
Thus speaking, the sorceress strode past him; and,
entering a narrow defile between the convent and a
street wall he had not before observed, and from which
she had so suddenly appeared before him, was in a
few seconds lost to his eye in the black shadow cast
by the building.
He lingered a moment on the spot where she had
left him, and then, with his mind full of wonder,
began
to retrace his devious way to the spot where he
had left his horse. In the mean while, this animal
became
the object of the attention of two worthies who
have before made their appearance on the scene, with
more or less credit to themselves.
In the hovel, by the side of which Renault had
hastily
secured his horse, and which, if he gave it a
thought, he supposed to be uninhabited, so rudely was
it constructed of the fragments of the edifice over
which he had climbed, were seated, when he
dismounted
in pursuit of the gray figure, no less
personages
than Gobin the First and his new friend and
ally
Boviedo, the disgraced and unhorsed trumpeter of
the captain-general's guard. The room in which they
were seated was scantily furnished with a dislocated
chair having a leathern bottom, on which Gobin
himself
sat gravely smoking a cigarillo; a low bench
with a high-back, filled by the paunchy bulk of
Boviedo
,
and a slenderly supported table, on which stood a
green bloated bottle half filled with a muddy claret,
which was represented by the purple contents of a
brace of tumblers that stood beside it, and which had
just been placed there by these bibulous brothers.
From their appearance, as well as from that of the
bottle before them, they had been passing the hours
that had elapsed since their acquaintance commenced
in a way that reflected credit upon the hospitality of
Gobin, who, from the aspect of things, and the glimpse
of an old woman asleep in a low cot in an adjoining
room, was in his own castle. They had been
conversing
upon the new occupation of the province, in
the course of which Gobin had given utterance to
much of the witless wisdom peculiar to him, which
must be lost to every ear but that of the edified
trumpeter
.
Wine and wassail had made the two fast
friends.
What is thine office now, great governor that
was? asked the trumpeter, blinking and hiccoughing
with the wine he had drunk, and pursuing the
amicable
conversation with which they had mutually
entertained
each other.
Call me not governor now, gossip! for a title
without power is like learning without wisdom; it is
the bells that hang to a fool's cap, which without them
were a cardinal's. Call me
gossip
.
Gossip Gobin, then, what may be thine occupation
and calling?
I am a cavalier on the towna promiscuous
gentleman
,
answered Gobin, emptying his cup of muddy
claret with an air.
Hast thou consideration with any honest
caballero
?
Caballero! that is Spanish! Translate me, gossip.
Give us the rendering o' it.
It meaneth partly a horse and partly a
gentleman
,
answered Boviedo, with a learned philological
look.
An amphibulous? asked, or, rather, assented
Gobin
.
Not an amphibulous, gossip. Caballo is for horse,
and caball
ero
for cavalier!
Is
ero
Spanish for gentleman?
Nay, gossip, caballero is.
Then a Spanish cavalier is half orse. Wert
thou a cavalier, gossip, thou wouldst not need to search
for another war-steed.
The fat trumpeter rubbed his forefinger across his
obese forehead a few times, as if endeavouring to
disentangle
the dilemma; but, finding it in vain with his
narrow compass of brains, he shook his thick head,
and again put his question as to Gobin's calling.
As to my calling, I am called Gobin the fool; and
by some, the fool Gobin, replied the jester, winking
within himself. My occupation is as folly is in
demand
and men's wit at discount; I daily served the
old governor with my counsel when he ruled; for as
diamond will only be cut by diamond, so a province
of fools, thought he (and he was a wise man), can
only be ruled by folly. If a priest wishes to send a
message to a fair penitent, it is Gobin that is the
confidential
messenger thereof. If a maid would send
a token to her lover, who but Gobin is its bearer?
Ah! I am in demand, gossip! If mischief is on foot,
Gobin is in it; prayers or plays, wedding or burying,
a brawl or a mass, Gobin hath a hand in all! Gobin
is the soul of the province! No Gobin, no
government
no
weddings, no massesno sins, no sinners
no brawls, no fightsno mirth, no mourningno
burying
,
no deaths! Put folly out o' the state, and it
would go lunatic. Too much wisdom maketh men
mad; 'tis a proper mixture, like the baser metal in
coin, that maketh the standard o' human wit. I could
carry out the figure to your great profit; but I see no
speculation in your eye, as the player hath it. Thou
hast more o' this alloy than the true metal in thee. I
marvel how I came to beget a friendship for such a
winesack. Fill thy glass again; it may sharpen, for it
cannot dull thee!
Nay, friend Gobin, I verily am in grief for the loss
of my horse and my disgrace with my master,
answered
Boviedo, sorrowfully, and heaving a sigh that,
with his words, instantly revived sympathy for his
condition
in the breast of the fool.
Cheer up, gossip! I will see that thou have a horse
ere the noon, if it be priest Buffo's padnag, he
answered
,
encouragingly, pouring wine into his cup for
him. I am latterly got in the graces o' a youth who
will win me with his sword a score o' steeds in an hour.
I have done him service ere now! I took to him
because
his sister took to me, gossip. Not a maid in all
the province hath not smiled on Gobin. This you will
learn if you stay in it! I have done many an office
for her, and ne'er would take a penny. She always
smiled showers o' gold, and that was enough for Gobin.
She bade me do her brother all the service I could
ever, and I swore it; for she sent comforts and medics
to the old mother when she got the rheumatiz.
Who is this master o' thine? Is that myrtle sprig
i' thy cap his badge?
It is a gentleman's badge, gossip. There's a
secret
in it.
Who dost serve?
Nay, dull trumpet-blower, I serve no master! I
conjoin with him as a frienda sworn friend. By the
holy marrow! he will give thee a horse an' I say it, if
he have to get it from the new governor himself, by
pitching him to the ground.
Give me thy hand, good fool, exclaimed the
joyful
Boviedo. Let us give a cup to this brave
cavalier
,
thy friend. What name and calling hath he?
Calling! repeated Gobin, indignantly. Dost
thou believe we provincials to be all craftsmen? We
are gentlemen cavaliers till found to be otherwise.
Hast thou ne'er heard of my cousin Renault the
Quadroon
?
He hath three hundred brave men at his beck
and bid for the freedom o' the state. There will be
doings, gossip, there will be doings the morn, he
added, looking mysteriously; let thy master look
warily to himself; for in that he hath gotten the city,
it argues not that he will hold it. Wait till the morn,
man. There will be events! Here's to cousin
Renault
the Quadroon.
Being thy cousin, gossip, here is to him, he said,
filling and emptying his glass. Is it he who did the
fighting in the square and slew so many?
Nay, that was Black Jules, as men call him. A
devil-born gentleman, with a cutthroat's breeding.
He hath been in rebellion against the province because
he could not rule after his father. Save us all, gossip!
There would ne'er be found an honest man in his
government
.
He hath great show of virtue, and talks
loudly of patriotism. He hath a dark soul, with a
bloody hand to serve it. But his hand will scarce
wield sword again. It hath ended its mischief, and
hath the colour o' red it likes so well. Wouldst
behold
a wicked man's hand?
Hath it more fingers than another man's? asked
Boviedo, with sober inquiry.
See for thyself, said Gobin, taking from his bosom
a human hand cloven at the wrist, and laying it upon
the trumpeter's knee. Boviedo looked upon it with a
cold shudder of affright, and moved back aghast.
There was a good blow, he said, after Gobin, at
his trembling entreaty, had removed it from his person.
Who dealt it, gossip?
My brave
bon cousin
Renault, who hath my
blessing
for it. Is it not a proper handshapely and
delicate
?
It should have been his ears; for rogues' ears
fetch a price now. Rascas will have the more work
to do.
It hath a diamond in a green stone upon it, said
Boviedo, Gobin's words rousing his cupidity.
And thus it shall remain as the mark by which all
men will know it, he answered, almost with
fierceness
.
It shall be a sign that Orleans was made free
the very hour she was enslaved to Spain, when they
do see it nailed up in the broad day, he added, with a
spark of that spirit occasionally emitted from his fitful
mind, betraying, amid a medley of wit and folly, the
existence
of generous feelings, that held their empire
independent
of the obliquity of his mind. His head, but
not his heart, was wrong; and when the latter, as it
often would, did obtain a momentary asendancy, there
was something in his character that commanded
respect
while he remained under its brief influence. He
spake, therefore, under the inspirations of his feelings,
with a degree of enthusiasm that for the time endowed
him with new attributes, and caused the surprised
Boviedo
to believe for the moment that his character had
hitherto been assumed.
Thou art a valiant fool to be a fool, gossip Gobin!
he said, looking upon him with surprise and doubt.
Thou wilt soon learn that Gobin's brain is motley
like his costume, said the fool, with a sad expression,
as if, by some wonderful operation of the mind, he had
become for a moment conscious of his inferiority.
Poor Gobin, he hath no wit. Folly is his birthright.
Mother tells me I shall die one day, and God will give
me my soul back again! Dost know, gossip, he said,
with a change-like thought to his former manner, the
devil stole away my wits when I was born, lest Gobin
should be wiser than himself! This was whispered
as a fearful secret in the ear of the trumpeter.
Thou shouldst go to the pope! He'll have it out
o' his black clutches for thee, if he have to knock him
down with the key o' heaven to get it! Come with me
to Rome! added Boviedo, patronisingly.
Hast seen this key, gossip? asked Gobin, with
simple curiosity, his ideas flying rapidly from subject
to subject, the lightest word acting upon his brain like
a revolution upon the phase of a kaleidoscope.
Marry have I, gossip! It is a league and a half
long, and solid gold.
How big, then, is the pope? asked the fool, very
sensibly.
Seven leagues, said the unblushing trumpeter,
whom Gobin's question rather staggered. But he had
the gift of lying, and got over it without stumbling.
I have heard o' his boots, said Gobin; I would
not like to have the cleaning o' 'em.
He makes the devil do it for him, answered
Boviedo
,
stoutly.
And useth his tail for a brush, gossip, doth he
not? asked Gobin, gravely.
Verily, gossip, thou hast a brain and wisdom in't,
said Boviedo, who saw the fool had taken his vein.
Vol. I.Q
Nay, gossip, it cometh by contagion. I do but
catch it from thee! The saints grant I take not thy
lying
with it, which thou hast come by in the natural
way! It is by contagion I grow wiser than wise men
I hold discourse with, catching their wisdom while
they catch my folly to balance it. Thus do I make
wisdom out of folly. Marry, gossip! folly is a rare
capital i' the world.
Thou art scholarly, good fool! Hath thy mother,
who snoreth in her bed like an ill-keyed bugle, taught
thee what thou knowest?
Nay. How got thy trumpet hacked so, gossip?
I' the wars.
Thou hast thyself done it to swear by!
Nay, an' it were not done in fair battle, I will eat
it.
Then wilt thou have as much brass in thy belly
as in thy face.
Thou art witty! Come thou to Spain, and I will
make thee tutor to the king's son.
Art thou in favour at court?
None higher; the king hath nodded to me.
I know thou art a courtier, then, by thy lying.
'Tis true, said Boviedo, roundly.
The lie? asked Gobin, mischievously.
That I am a courtier!
Then the lie is true.
Thou hast, methinks, somehow the better o' me,
gossip, said Boviedo, after endeavouring to make his
dull brain comprehend the subtlety of his speech.
I will puzzle thy scull anon; dost thou know what
is a paradox?
Is it a tune?
A gamut for thy wit.
Ne'er heard of it, good fool, as I am a courtier.
I'll prove thee no courtier by thine own mouth.
Thou art challenged.
Are not all courtiers liars? Confess.
Liars most villanous, answered Boviedo, stoutly.
But thou sayest thou art a courtier?
Yea! gossip Gobin.
Therefore what thou sayest is not true, and
therefore
thou art no courtier.
By the blessed Saint Jude, thou hast rogue's wit.
I am no courtier, as sure as my cup is empty. Here's
to thy devil's scholarship, Master Gobin, he said, with
an amazingly perplexed air, as he turned over in his
mind the classical Gobin's paradox.
I will prove thee a courtier again by thine own
lips.
Do it, and I will make thee a present of a new
jerkin, thine being something worn, said the
trumpeter
,
with animation, fixing his dull eyes upon the
playful
visage of the jester with mystified wonder.
Art thou not a liar? Confess.
Yea, gossip! I confess I have lied in my life
twice.
Twice in a minute!
Nay, in an hour.
Then thou art a courtier; and being a liar if thou
sayest thou art a courtier, then thou art not a courtier.
So thou art both a courtier and no courtier.
Thou hast got the better o' me in some sort,
friend Gobin, said the trumpeter, staring in his face
with inebriate wonder, and looking ludicrously
bewildered
.
Save in round lies, I can square with thee over a
bottle, gossip. We must finish the jug, then I will
put thee to bed; for state matters call me to be
abroad. I have great affairs on hand, brother, of
which, if thou hadst the tenth to do, thy head would
be top-heavy, but not with good wine, as it now is.
Didst play on thy bugle before the king?
Till he hath fainted with the delight o' it
Till thou didst affright him with thy braying
discord
.
If mother weren't asleep, thou shouldst give
me a note or two o' thy skill.
I'll do it, gossip, said Boviedo, briskly; if she
wake not at her own nose, she will scarce hear my
bugle.
Nay, let her sleep; she is a poor creature, and
hath not had an idea since she gave birth to me. It
took her whole stock to furnish me out, gossip.
I would thou hadst heard me play before the king,
Gobin.
Verily, brother gossip, said Gobin, with a sage
nod, it is a wisdom that hath kept cousin Don
Carlos
from turning his crown into a cap and bells if he
listened to thee.
He hath the art o' fooling by begetting, I have
been told. He needeth not to go to school to learn
folly.
Let us drink his health, comrade mine, said the
trumpeter, stoutly. He is a brave king, and carrieth
a long sword.
Then be he henceforward dubbed cousin
Long-sword
,
said the jester, quickly; but, if he hath
bravery
,
saints bless us! he should inoculate some of his
warriors. I wot of some that have more wind than
valour.
That's a well spoken, and hath a moral to it,
gossip Gobin; I'm a coward an' it haven't.
It hath, and thou art a coward, nuncle Pauncho.
Nay, sayest thou I am a coward, gossip?
By this green-bellied monster, that is thy twin
brother, I swear it, answered Gobin, flourishing the
globular-shaped jug, and bringing it down again upon
the table with an emphasis.
There lieth wit in that, gossip, an' I could dig
it out, said Boviedo, with a tipsy, knowing look.
Wherefore am I twin brother with that green bottle?
Because thou art a wineskin, a liquor puncheon,
a leviathan claret-bottle.
Prove me green! prove me green, gossip!
I can prove thee green till thou art blue, from
which thou art not far off. Thou art green in wit,
and green to lose thy horse, and greener to trust
thyself
to me, not knowing me to be an honest man.
Nay, gossip Gobin, thou carriest it in thy visage.
Then my countenance giveth me the lie in my
face. Doth my nose look virtuous, gossip?
Yea, as an icicle.
And thine is a most modest nose; verily, it
blusheth
like a pomegranate.
Nay, gossip Gobin, I will swear a pleasant jest
lieth in the kernel of that speech, an' I could come at
it.
Make a hammer of thy head, gossip, and crack
it.
By my valiancy, thou art a humorous fool, said
the thick-sculled trumpeter.
And thou a bragging coward.
Call me not coward, comrade.
Thou art an arrant coward, a white-livered
coward
,
a chicken coward! Dost thou deny?
Nay, I am a coward were I a fighting soldier, an
it like thee, gossip; yet, being a trumpeter, I am no
coward.
Prove me that, and I will help thee to a steed.
A soldier, gossip, hath his valour in his arm, his
occupation being to lay on blows stoutly.
Nay, his valour lieth in his soul.
A soldier, worthy Gobin, hath no soul but the
captain's
word to go and come; to do this or to do that.
He hath no soul, being one in the ranks. His
courage
,
therefore, like a smith's strength, lieth in his
strokes. Now, if he lay them on thick and fast, it is
courage.
Bravo, gossip; now to thy second-part.
The trumpeter, friend Gobin, not being, as thou
knowest, a soldier to deal blows withal, but to blow
the trumpet, being, as it were, the smith's man at the
bellows, his courage lieth not in his arm, but in his
wind; and the longer his wind, the more courage hath
he; and the larger his abdomen, the greater his wind.
Who taught thee logic, gossip? asked the fool.
An' logic be a note on the bugle, I got it by
induction
!
Is induction a tune?
I will play it for thee, then thou shalt judge.
There is ne'er a tune thou canst name I have not
Q 2
played before his majesty, he said, loosing his bugle
from his belt.
There be
braggato, braggadocioso, liaralto!
Dost
play 'em, gossip?
I have them all three at my fingers' ends.
Thou hast them at thy tongue's end, I will swear,
gossip: play me logic.
I will do it, so thou wilt ne'er come to listen to
music again, if thou canst not hear mine.
To it, to it, gossip; I would have a touch of thy
windy valour.
The doughty and half-tipsy trumpeter, whose brain
and abdomen were of nearly equal mental calibre,
placed his brazen bugle to his lips, and, distending his
scarlet cheeks like a pair of bagpipes, wound a low,
preparatory note, and then blew a long, clear blast.
It was instantly answered from without by the loud,
martial neighing of a horse, which caused them both
to start from their seats.
El diablo
, shouted the astonished Gobin.
It is a horse! cried the trumpeter, on whose
brain the image of a horse had been painted from the
moment of his disgrace, while his wits had been ever
busy to divine some means of making himself master
of one, although his faith in Gobin's often-promised
assistance was firm. In his eagerness to reach the
door, he threw over bench and table, while Gobin, with
a doubtful look, seized the bottle by the neck, and
followed
close in his rear.
When he opened the tottering door, they beheld,
within a few feet of it, a finely-limbed white horse,
standing with his ears erect, his neck arched, and his
whole attitude that of a war-charger, who smelleth
the battle afar off, and cries among the trumpets,
`Aha, aha!'
It is the horse I promised thee, gossip, cried
Gobin
,
with ready quickness, instantly recognising
Renault's
steed. Mount him and ride. Wo! ho!
Baptiste
.
I fear me he hath a wicked spirit, said Boviedo,
with hesitation, his joy at once subsiding on observing
his startled eye and spirited attitude.
Thou wilt ne'er be restored to thy condition of
trumpeter, gossip, if thou falter. See, he knoweth
me! Lay thy hand upon his mane.
But he knoweth not me; I have a misgiving of
him.
If thou do not get on him, thou art an ass. Hast
thou not won him by thy valour, as thy master bade
thee do, else not come before him?
Nay, I have not struck a blow for him, said the
fat Boviedo, eying the animal askance.
Doth not thy valour lie in thy wind, and did not
the blast o' the trumpet bring him?
Thou shouldst ha' remembered my flesh, gossip,
and got me a quiet beast. He hath a devil in him.
He hath spirit: climb to his back, and spur.
When thou hast returned to favour, speak a good word
for Gobin to thy master. Boviedo, seeing that the
animal
remained passive, and permitted the fool to touch
his bit, grew confident, and, placing one foot in the
stirrup, essayed to mount. At this instant, the
cunning
and ever-watchful Gobin chanced to see the
plume of Renault waving above the ruined wall; and,
prompted by the subtlety and mischief inherent in his
nature, instantly vanished behind a projection of the
ruin, and left his fat companion to the tender mercies
of the animal's master. The broad back of the
unfortunate
trumpeter was turned towards the direction
from which Renault was approaching, and he was,
moreover, too busily engaged in the achievement of
getting into the saddle to give heed to anything but
his own footing, the while most tenderly soothing the
horse, with many a Spanish diminutive of kindness,
to induce him to remain quiet. Suddenly he felt the
grasp of a strong hand upon his shoulder, and before
his eye gleamed a sharp steel weapon.
Mercy, in the name of the mother of Heaven!
he cried, taking his foot from the stirrup, and
dropping
bodily on his knees.
Who art thou I find in the act of robbing me of
my steed? demanded Renault, with a slight smile, his
hostile manner at once changing on seeing the fat, oily
body of Boviedo. Speak, or thou diest! By thy
speech thou art a Spaniard, and art taken to thieving
early after thy coming!
Nay, I am no thief, signor, he said, seeing the
change in his manner; ask Master Gobin, whom I
have drunk with; he knoweth me to be an honest
man.
Nay, cousin Renault, he is the greatest rogue in
all Spain, and hath been sent to the provinces lest he
should corrupt the kingdom with his iniquities and
diabolities
,
cried Gobin, suddenly making his
appearance
on hearing this appeal. He hath married
seven
wives, all living, and hath sinned other ways. See
his lusty fat! He hath got drunk on the church's
wine, and kissed a holy nun of seventy through the
grate; look at his lecherous lips! He hath robbed the
king's treasury, and slept in his pew of a Sunday
fore-noon
;
hath he not a godless look! He hath killed a
monk, trod on a cardinal's great toe, and twice sworn
by the queen's beard, which is heresy! Moreover,
he hath been a courtier, which were a summing up
and a crowning of his enormities!
Gobin, did I not give thee a message to bear to
Charleval? Wherefore art thou here? demanded
Renault, when Gobin had finished his testimony to the
astounded Boviedo's honesty.
I would ha' done it, but this bale o' swine's flesh
tempted me to go iniquitizing with him. Should I tell
thee, cousin, what loose questions he put to me
respecting
certain temptations o' the town, ere we had
been acquainted ten minutes, thou would stick him
with thy daggerthough, by'r lady! there be laid six
inches o'fat to go through ere it draw blood! Out upon
him, to get me to vouch for his honesty! Marry! was
he not in the very act of stealing thy horse? an' thy
dagger be seven inches long, give him one inch o' it
aneath his ribs.
Do it not, good youth; heed him not; he is
brainless
and thin witted! I am an honest man and true, as
I am a Christian.
He is a pagan, and worshippeth his belly. Stick
him, cousin.
Nay, Gobin, thou art at thy mischief. Thou art
a companion of his, and, spite of the character thou
hast given him, I will let him go, and shall make thee,
he being a Spaniard, surety for his good behaviour.
Thou hast an errand to do: delay it not! he added,
in a tone of authority. Spaniard, wert thou stealing
my horse?
No, signor, as I am a poor devil trumpeter! It
were this graceless gentleman fool, who calleth himself
cousin to your excellency's worship, bade me mount
and ride, I having been discomfited of my own, he
averring on the Gospels that he were himself the owner
of it.
Take heed, Gobin, what thou doest! Rise, signor!
I think I can divine the cause of your discomfiture.
Be patient, and thou mayst get thy steed once more.
May the blessed saints bless your excellency, said
Boviedo, embracing his knees. If I get not my horse
again, I shall break my heart of grief.
An' thou hadst got on Baptiste, thou wouldst ha'
broke thy neck, said Gobin, shaking at the same time
his head at him, as if he intended to have his revenge
for what the trumpeter had said of him.
See thou follow me, cried Renault to Gobin, as he
mounted his horse. I have something for thee to do
ere the dawn.
Adios, seor
! If thou wouldst mount
thyself again, trust not to Gobin's ownership, lest thou
escape less easily than thou hast now done! Thus
speaking, he put spurs to his horse, and galloped away
in the direction of the barrier he had first approached.
Thank Heaven, nuncle Pauncho, that thou art
standing beside me safely on thy two short legs,
instead
o' being astride that flying horse's back, said
Gobin, in as amicable and confident a way as if he had
not defamed his friend.
He would ha' broke my neck, said Boviedo,
instinctively
moving his head to see if it worked right on
his shoulders, likewise showing in his voice and
manner
no ill-will towards Gobin for his charitable backing
of his character.
Thy neck will one day be broken, gossip,
answered
Gobin; but it will be by hemp, and not by
horse. In with thee, cousin Spain, and drink or sleep,
as thou wilt; I have matters to keep me abroad; and
see thou stir not forth till I come back.
The bottle is wellnigh emptied, worthy Gobin,
insinuated Boviedo, taking the capacious jug from the
ground, where the fool had dropped it on seeing
Renault
,
and holding it up between his face and the moon.
Thou wilt find another aneath the table. In with
thee, cousin! If mother wake up, quick clap the
bottle
to her mouth, and she will be soon off again.
Adios,
seor
, he added, after the manner of the quadroon;
when next thou choosest a friend, see that he hath
less brain than thyself, which, by'r lady! thou'rt ne'er
like to do till thou find one of thine own or thy father's
begetting. Thus speaking, he bounded away like a
harlequin.
Good wine is too precious for an old woman,
soliloquized
the trumpeter, entering the house; it shall
ne'er be said Boviedo Pauncho e'er poured wine down
an old woman's throat. This Gobin hath a rare wit
a rare wit hath he, an' I could get to the top and
bottom o' it. Natheless he is rare, and hath wit.
Here, taking a long look after his late companion,
who was gliding swiftly along the wall of the street in
the direction taken by Renault, he closed the door
behind
him and disappeared within the ruinous tenement.
CHAPTER XV.
SCENE WITHIN THE BARRIERS.
When
Renault left the ill-jointed friends, he rode
rapidly back in the direction of the barrier he had left
in pursuit of the sorceress.
As he approached the post, the sentry levelled his
arquebuss, and challenged him as before. Renault
hastily gave the countersign, galloped with unchecked
speed across the avenue that connected the barrier with
the
Place d' Armes
, and entered the dark lane into which
he had been about to turn when first challenged from
the barrier. The lane was bordered on one side by a few
low-roofed, ancient houses, stuccoed with white plaster,
having their windows guarded by upright iron bars;
and on the other by a line of that universal
shade-tree
in the south, the Pride of India, or
China-tree
.
They stretched their umbrageous limbs quite
across the narrow alley or court, and so shut out the
moonlight, that the horseman proceeded on his way
almost in total darkness. At length he came to the
extremity of the lane, where, stopping up farther
passage
,
stood a vast, gloomy edifice, with a single tower
at one angle, in ruins. It was built after the massive
models of the age, with a low, elaborate facade,
embrasures
around the roof, long, narrow, iron-fenced
windows
,
with a projecting balcony to each, and a surface
of gray stucco, dingy and crumbling with time. It
was in the midst of a grove of majestic sycamores;
and so densely were they planted, it appeared to stand
surrounded by a vast forest. The gateway, or
grande
porte
, was a low arch, from which the keystone had
fallen out, and the bastions of which had partly sunk.
One of the massive leaves of its gate hung by a single
hinge; the other was gone, while the long grass grew
rank and thick wherever it could find roothold in the
crevices of the broken flagging. It had the
appearance
of an edifice of a public nature rather than of a
private abode; and an unhung bell in the tower, the
decayed fragment of a flagstaff rising from the centre,
and the royal arms of France carved in stone above
the entrance, showed that at a former period this must
have been its destination.
As Renault approached the gloomy building, with
its dark, iron-guarded windows, through which the moon
shone into tenantless apartments, save that the lizard
and the owl abode there, he slackened his rein; but,
without stopping, his horse trotted through beneath the
echoing arch, and issued into an area open to the sky,
the four sides of which were bounded by the inner
walls of the edifice. All was dark and still around
him, and the iron fall of his horse's hoofs reverberated
with startling loudness.
In the midst of this court towered a lofty palm-tree,
half shielding with its spreading leaves the whole
space within. Beside it was a broken fountain, now
become a silent and motionless pool, in which the
water
lay black and dead, while rank verdure grew around
it. Here, as elsewhere, the pavement was broken and
in ruins. At the opposite side of the court was a
lofty
door, which, from its height and situation, appeared
to lead into an extensive hall beyond. Renault rode
across the court to this door, and, without dismounting,
took his bugle from his belt, and wound a low, peculiar
note upon it. It was immediately replied to by a
similar
one within, and the quick fall of bars and the
clanging
of chains were instantly followed by the opening
of one of the gates, and the appearance of a young
man in the costume of a
courreur du bois
, like that he
wore, but less rich in its decorations.
I am tardy, Jean, said Renault, riding past him
into a long, paved passage or corridor. A lamp hung
above a door at the far-distant extremity, by the light
of which numerous saddled horses were rendered
visible
,
secured by their bridles to the iron bars of a row
of windows, and guarded by two young men in the
same costume as the other. Are all here?
All, Signor Captain. Alfrde had feared something
had happened to you with these dangerous times.
I sent Gobin to tell him I should be detained till
one; but he chanced to fall in with some gentleman
of his own capacity, and forgot my message. Ha!
Charleval is impatient!
While he was speaking, a door beyond the farthest
of the troop of horses was flung wide open, and a vast
lighted apartment was shown, crowded with men. A
handsome young man, dressed precisely like the
quadroon
,
save the addition of a scarlet sash worn across
his breast, came forth, and warmly welcomed Renault,
who dismounted beside him, giving his horse in charge
of one of the young men.
You are well arrived, Renault, said the youth.
Gobin should have informed you of the cause of
my delay. I met him as I came in from the fortress,
and bid him hasten to say I should be detained an hour
after midnight.
There is yet time for action ere the dawn,
answered
the other, with spirit.
Patience, Charleval! How is the band?
Enthusiasm itself!
I will see them.
Renault entered the hall as he spoke, and four
hundred swords clashed together in the air to
welcome
him, but not a voice was heard; it was one
martial
ringing of steel alone, such as would make a
soldier's
blood leap. The apartment was lofty and wide,
and beneath the white flag of France at one end hung
drooping a Spanish flag, its silken folds soiled and
torn.
Renault waved his sword in acknowledgment, and
then, while every eye was fixed in silent expectation
upon the two, walked apart with the young man he
had called Charleval to a recess, where stood an
elderly
soldier leaning upon his sword, beneath whose
military
hat were visible the noble features of the
president
Vol. I.R
of the council. He was surrounded by several
gentlemen in arms, who a few hours before were
presiding
in the council-chamber.
Are we to ride? asked the president, with
interest
.
Osma's night-landing hath defeated our plans
utterly
,
answered Renault, with mortification; there
is no alternative but retreat.
For this we may thank the Count Jules, replied
the president, quickly.
My brother Jules hath more than this to answer
for, answered Renault. We must to the fortress,
and plot now with Ihuahua how to recapture, now that
we can no longer save the town.
One hour earlier, said the other, warmly, and
Orleans would have been lost to Spain for ever!
A few words will explain the character and object
of this midnight assembly, and the ends of its leaders,
which were so signally defeated, as it appears, by the
sudden step taken by Osma in occupying the city
before
morning. In the first demand made by Spain
three years before for the submission of Orleans,
Renault
had made himself conspicuous by cutting down
the Spanish flag after the Count of Osma had hoisted
it upon the flagstaff. This gallant deed operated as
an act of oblivion to the memory of his acknowledged
Ethiopian blood, and, in the enthusiasm of patriotic
feeling, the youth of the province and city passed a
resolution to receive him as one of themselves in all
relations and circumstances. This at once gave him
a high degree of influence, not only among the
quadroons
,
but, being a youth of a military spirit, brave,
daring, and patriotic, and gifted with eloquence, he
soon gained a moral power over those around him;
and in the preparations made for the defence of the
city, and maintaining of the allegiance to France, he
had conferred upon him the rank of major, and was
appointed by the Marquis of Caronde, his father, one
of his
aides-de-camp
. Two years having glided away
without any interruption from Spain, the diligence of
the citizens abated, their military spirit subsided, and
the troops were so far disbanded, that only a nominal
guard was kept on duty at the barriers of the city.
The marquis, who had so long governed them under
France, at length dying a few months before the
second
appearance of the Cond of Osma, the city
became
divided into two parties, which had their origin
in the bold claim of young Jules Caronde, who, at the
head of some forty young men as unprincipled, took
possession of the government-house and the insignia
of rank, and proclaimed himself governor.
This step was met with indignant surprise by the
better portion of the citizens; but his gold, which he
lavished freely, brought to his party a large accession
from that class whose desperate condition any
political
change might improve; from men whose
patriotism
lay no deeper than their interests, and who,
flattered
by the notice of a noble, attributed to their
worth what was due only to their worthlessness, and
became willing paws to the subtle leader who
would make use of them. The citizens got
possession
of the gates of the armory and of the treasury,
while Jules and his insurgents maintained their
position
in the government-house and Place d'Armes.
There they were regularly and closely besieged for
twenty days, at the end of which time they were
forced
to capitulate: the
canaille
, in number three or
four hundred men, being permitted to resume their
occunations, and retain the freedom of the city as
before
,
while Jules and his party were banished from the
capital for the term of a year and a day.
They retired to a small fortress on a lake a league
from the town, adjoining one where a horde of the
Ladrones of the Lagoons, ninety in number, had
their stronghold, with whom they formed a treaty of
amity, and afterward admitted, with subordinate
privileges
,
several of their number to their companionship.
These
Ladrones
were composed of outlaws of the
province, escaped criminals from Cuba, and others
who, by their crimes, had become outcasts from the
civilized world. Their position commanded, by
various
outlets, both the bay of Mexico and the river, and
their pastime (or profession, it may be) was that of
piracy. This they carried on by small, sharp-prowed
boats of great speed, in which they issued from their
inland fastnesses, and suddenly, like a troop of hawks,
pounced upon their unsuspecting prey, whether it were
the voyager descending the Mississippi with his
richly-laden
barge, or the lugger freighted with ingots
from the mines of Mexico; while the murdering steel
silenced for ever all claimants to the ill-gotten booty.
Such were the
allies
of the leader of the insurgents,
though Jules and his friends had no share with them
in their piracies. Their alliance was based on mutual
jealousy and fear rather than on feelings of love or
amity; although, if kindred tastes offer any basis for
friendship, the two chiefs should have been on terms
of the closest brotherhood.
After the expulsion of Jules, which restored the
city to its civic propriety, and made a happy and
bloodless end of a civil war that threatened to
over-turn
the state, the citizens assembled, and chse from
their body six councillors or rulers, who, four months
afterward, as has been seen in the person and conduct
of their president, showed so much virtue and honest
patriotism. Among the warmest movers for, and
subsequent
supporters of, the electoral government, was
the young quadroon Renault, who also was the most
direct and formidable opponent of the young Caronde.
The hostility of these two young men had originated
in parental partiality, and was nourished on the part of
the latter by the various mortifications and
disappointments
of which he had been made the victim. He
hated
Renault also, naturally enough, because he was his
brother, and had Moorish blood in his veins; but he
hated him most for his virtue, and the superior rank he
held in men's minds. He garnered up vengeance in his
soul, and fed upon it; and, knowing Renault's heart's
dearest idol, he resolved (not that the lawless passion
which the beauty of Azlie kindled in his thoughts
was not incentive enough) to couple his vengeance
with his lust, and with the same blow gratify the two
deepest feelings of his bosom. Renault knew the
heart of his brother well, and hated him, as the good
man hates sin, with a virtuous and indignant hatred,
and free from any mixture of vengeance. He also
feared him and watched him!
Lest he should visit upon the city, in alliance with
the
Ladrones
, some retributive mischief, the councillors
had appointed a municipal guard, consisting of one
hundred quadroons under Renault, and one hundred
and fifty young creoles under Sieur Charleval, the son
of a noble exiled friend of the Marquis of Caronde, and
of whom the marquis became guardian on the death of
his father. Between himself and Renault there existed
a firm friendship, which had been formed on the
eventful
day Osma had been so disgracefully driven back to
his ship. He was the leader of the band of Seven
Brothers, all of whom, save himself, had united
themselves
now to the cause of Jules, thus eclipsing the
bright star of gallantry they had won on that day.
About this time a deputation arrived from the
Commanche
warrior Ihuahua and his son Prince Tlasca,
offering to come with a thousand men to aid the
defence
of Louisiana against Spain, if Count Osma should
return. This extraordinary offer was viewed with
suspicion, as no motive could be assigned for it; and
answer was returned, that when the province should be
in a strait to call in foreign aid, it would avail itself of
this prince's courtesy.
Affairs remained in this condition until the day Count
Osma again appeared below the town and demanded its
submission. On the morning of that day it happened
that Jules was in town with eight or ten of his party;
for he himself, with small bands of his adherents, were
permitted by the mild councillors, at the earnest
solicitation
of relatives and friends (all of them being in
some way connected with the leading families of the
place), to enter the town occasionally, and remain until
sunset. It was on this occasion that he conceived the
R 2
plan of getting possession of the person of Azlie, by
the diabolical plea of the bondage of her mother. It
was the silence of the council that imboldened him,
aided by a few of his former adherents among the
lower class of citizens, who furnished him and his
friends with weapons to attack Renault, unsuspicious
of danger, in the public thoroughfare, and subsequently
to assail his dwelling, for the prupose of seizing Azlie
and bearing her away to his stronghold. This latter
step was only required to rouse the lion in the breast
of Renault, and arm him with the deadliest hostility
towards the author of it. The startling report of the
arrival of the Spaniard had alone preserved the life and
honour of his sister. At the news, the mind of Jules,
which was ever active to seize upon advantages that
would escape less subtle men, was impressed with a
scheme to obtain an influence in the city that might
ultimately lead to his investiture of the sole authority.
He instantly acted upon the impulse; and, hastening
from the assault, presented himself before the council,
which he knew opposed to the Spanish yoke, and
offered
his services and those of his adherents for the
defence
of the city. It was a crisis that admitted of no
deliberation; and, hoping the best, the rulers
consented
to accept the aid he offered, seemingly with much
fair patriotism. This step gained, he hastened from
the city to the fortress, and returned with the sixty
young men composing his band. The magistrates,
however, with all the precaution circumstances would
admit of being taken, deprived them of their arms when
they appeared at the barrier, with the intention of
returning
them in the council-chamber, when the crisis
should arrive for demanding their aid. They, however,
had succeeded in obtaining arms of a peculiar invention
from a skilful smith, who was a tool of Caronde, and were
not long in making use of them for purposes of their
own. Their object, whatever it might have been
beyond
the possession of the keys of the treasury, and,
through the defeat of the Spaniards, to inspire
confidence
in the rabble, was, however, not only
unsuccessful
,
but, as has been seen, attended with the most
disastrous consequences to the person of their chief.
This hostile and untimely slaughter in the Place
d'Armes, by inducing the captain-general, Osma, to land
his troops and take possession of the city by night, also
defeated a plan for his disputing his anticipated
occupation
of the town by daylight, which had been formed
by the patriotic Renault and Charleval, with the
consent
and aid of the president and council. The plan
had been conceived by Renault when the council was
first called together by the missive of the
captain-general
;
and he secretly sent a messenger, none other
than Gobin himself, with a sprig of myrtle to every
young man who had composed his former command
under the marquis, as well as to those who constituted
the municipal guard, and who were denominated
courreurs
du bois
, from the resemblance of their costume to
that of the Mexican hunters. This silent message
was understood by every one who received it, as well
as the time and place for the meeting; for, on sudden
emergencies, he had before called them together by
the same sign. There was no hesitation. Each youth
placed the myrtle sprig in his bonnet; and, keeping
himself away from the Place d'Armes,
notwithstanding
the excitement there, when night approached
hastened
to the well-known rendezvous. Hither Renault
himself instantly repaired, after conveying the
wounded
Don Henrique to his dwelling, and found four
hundred
of the bravest spirits in the province, with
Charleval
at their head, ready to receive him. He here
detailed to them a plan for defending the town, and
explained
to them the means by which it could be carried
into successful execution.
Concert in action, courageous hearts, and the full
determination to cast off the yoke of Spain, were
sufficient
,
he said, to effect anything. We have twelve
pieces of cannon in the Place d'Armes, and
ammunition
in abundance, he continued. In twenty
minutes
we can form a battery that shall blow the
Spanish
fleet out of the water. If the Spaniards are
permitted
to land in the morning, the first imprint of their
feet upon our sands will be indelible. If they attempt
to land, let us dispute their foothold, knee to knee,
breast to breast! If we would be free, the blow must
be struck this might. Let us march to the Place
d'Armes, and save the city. It is a sword in our
hands now, or fetters about our necks to-morrow.
If we are defeated, Renault? asked Charleval.
I had laid my plans for success, not defeat, he
answered. If Heaven give us not the best of it, we
must return from the town, and form an alliance with
Tlasca, and try to regain what we have lost. The
fortress of St. John will, till then (if God be not with us
to-night!), alone represent the liberties of Louisiana!
At this moment, the bustling and ever-busy Gobin
came running to the hall, and cried that the Spaniards
had left their ships in great numbers, and were making
a landing.
The battery, then, is lost to us! Alfrde, ride, I
pray thee, and bring back the report. I will marshal
the men, and be ready to gallop to the Place d'Armes
at a word, cried Renault to Charleval. Ride fast
and free! If the landing is effected, the city is lost,
and not a blow struck to save it! It is the night's
work of Jules that hath done this for us! added the
indignant quadroon, as he turned to give the stirring
orders for his party to mount.
Charleval flew at winged speed towards the spot,
swiftly followed by the inquisitive jester on foot,
whose restless desire to know what was happening on
all sides would not permit him to miss seeing the end
of Sieur Charleval's errand, whom, without doubt, he
expected to behold attack, sword in hand, the whole
Spanish army, and drive them back into the river,
which would have been a rare spectacle for Gobin,
and an event by no means to be missed.
When Alfrde reached the Place d'Armes, he saw
at a glance that all was lost. The
leve
was already
bristling with long lines of steel, and waving with
plumes, while a squadron of Spanish horse was drawn
up along the shore, ready to ride forward and take
possession of the square.
He dismounted, and, leaving his horse loose, glided
along within the dark shadow cast by the Cathedral,
for the purpose of observing them and ascertaining their
numbers, when he saw, waving in the sky above him,
the white flag of France. He was more than sixty
yards from the foot of the staff, and, forgetful of his
steed, immediately, and with but one thought in his
mind, ran towards it. Gobin came up at the same
instant
,
and, divining his purpose from the upward
direction
of his eye, bounded after him across the green.
Charleval already had the cords in his hand, and
was endeavouring to lower it, when he discovered that
it was entangled near the summit of the pole. Gobin
also saw the obstruction, and, without a word, clasped
the mast and rapidly ascended it. At this instnat
they were surprised by the approach of a horseman
from the Spanish party, who galloped towards the
flag-staff, bearing the standard of Spain. Alfrde at
once divined his purpose.
Haste, Gobin, he cried, and we may win a pair
of them.
The rider came up as he spoke, and Charleval,
turning upon him at the moment he himself was
discovered
by him, seized his horse by the head and
struck the rider a blow upon the helmet that made
him reel. Boviedo, the horseman being none other
than the Andalusian, recovered himself, and
instinctively
interposed his trumpet between his head and
abdomen
,
and several rapid blows which the
ambuscado
aimed at them. Never trumpet did such service!
never brass met steel so stoutly! never trumpeter
fought so with trumpet! The clash of steel against
brassthe clanging reverberation of the hollow
metal
the
warlike din! it were no marvel the Count
Osma believed his herald engaged in terrific mortal
combat! When Charleval beheld the Spaniard riding
across the
Plaza
to his rescue, finding his endeavours
to hit his antagonist fruitless (such skilful and
praise-worthy
use did he make of his trumpet), he suddenly
sprang upon him, pitched him outright from his
saddle
,
tore from him the Spanish flag, and, throwing it
across the saddle-bow, leaped into his place. Gobin
at the same instant having disengaged the-cord,
lowered
the broad standard within reach of his grasp.
The next moment, with it wound about his body, he
spurred past the surprised Cond at full speed, and
regained
the rendezvous. On reaching it, he flung
himself
from his horse, and entered the hall with a
triumphant
step.
The Place d'Armes is occupied, and Orleans is
now under a Spanish king, he exclaimed; but her
flag has not yet been raised, nor the unstained banner
of our own land dishonoured. Behold!
He displayed, as he spoke, the Spanish banner
affixed
to his sword, and, waving it above his head, cast it
upon the ground, and, in his enthusiasm, trampled it
beneath his feet.
Gaze on your own proud standard! he cried,
waving that of France in the air; it is sacred to our
cause, and be it consecrated the winding-sheet of every
brave man who dies for the liberties of his country.
Vive
France!
Vive
Louisienne!
Shouts of
Vive
Louisienne,
Vive
France,
resounded
through the assembly; and, in the enthusiasm of
the moment, all forgot that the object of their heart's
wish had been defeated.
After Alfrde had related what he had discovered
on his arrival in the Place d'Armes, and stated the
number of troops to be at least one thousand men, and
then, in fewer words, mentioned the part he had acted
in getting possession of the two flags, he himself, with
the president Sieur d'Alembert, Renault, and one or
two of the subordinate officers, retired apart to consult
upon the step to be taken for the expulsion of the
Spaniards
before they should extend their power from the
city over the whole province. It was at length
decided
,
after an hour's deliberation, to withdraw secretly
that night in a body from the town, and hoist the
provincial
flag beside that of France upon Fort St. John,
on the borders of Lake Pontchartrain.
This formidable body then broke up, secretly to
reassemble
at the same place at midnight, and there
leave behind them that city which they had hoped soon
to re-enter as conquerors. Renault passed the
intervening
hours until twelve o'clock in preparations for
the contemplated movement, and then hastened, as has
been seen, to see and bid a good-night to Azlie, in
whose charge he had left the wounded youth.
After his departure from home he again sought the
rendezvous of the Orleanese patriots, or
Amis de
France
, as they came to be designated, where, after
being turned aside by the pursuit of the sorceress, he
tardily arrived, finding the brave band already some
time assembled.
CHAPTER XVI.
THE PASSAGE OF THE BARRIERS.
Renault
now informed them of Osma's intention
and command given (though afterward
countermanded
)
to fire the city. The intelligence was fuel to their
patriotic resentments. After a few minutes passed in
animated discussion of their present plans and future
views, it was decided that the president, with the
councillors
,
and a guard of forty young men, should remain
in the city in their homes, to observe and report the
progress of events, keeping only so far in concealment
as the course of the new governor should render it
expedient, disguising their object, and outwardly
appearing
as quiet citizens who had cheerfully
determined
to submit to a government they found it in vain
longer to resist. This determination being taken as
the clock tolled three, the young leaders embraced the
president and his friends, and the order was given to
mount.
The vast hall was instantly deserted, and above three
hundred young men leaped across the backs of as many
saddled steeds in the long corridor; for then, as now,
in Louisiana, every creole was the owner of a
favourite
riding horse, was an admirable horseman, and was
ever in the saddle. The vast, gloomy corridor now
presented a stirring and martial scene. The doors
opening into the court were swung back, and, with
Renault, the president, and Charleval at its head, the
spirited cavalcade wound around the fountain, their line
moving half in the light and half in the shade cast from
the spreading palm-tree.
Beneath the outer arch they halted, and the president
and his party of young citizens took leave of the
youthful leaders, and, turning aside to the left, rode
along a by-street to the hospitable, dwelling of the
chief councillor, there to remain until day should
permit
them to go to their several homes undiscovered.
Renault then gave the command to ride forward.
At a slow trot the whole troop moved along the
shaded
lane by which he had come towards the barrier,
where he had been challenged. The course they
should pursue to get out of the city had been decided
on between him and Charleval, provided Gobin, whom
he had commanded to meet him, should not make his
appearance, which it appeared he was not likely to do.
It was their determination, therefore, to ride against
the barrier, carry it at the sword's point, and gallop
through to the interior; a course Renault determined
upon only as an alternative to one less likely to arouse
the city, which, for the sake of those in it, he desired
should rest in quiet so long as the Spaniards would
suffer
its repose. This less violent plan was to send
Gobin
to amuse the guard, and trust to his cunning and
address, when they should ride up, to throw open the
gates for them. While he was regretting the
necessity
of a violent course, that might needlessly alarm the
citizens, he saw directly before him Gobin himself,
seated on a stone in the path, grievously bewailing,
and perseveringly lifting up his voice louder and
louder
at every step of their approach towards him. To
return a page or two to this personage!
When Gobin came in sight of the barrier, a few
moments after parting with the trumpeter, he stopped
suddenly, as if he just then remembered that the gates
of the town were in possession of the Spaniards.
Here be the Philistines, and Gobin 'll get a
baggenet
in his ribs, he said, with ludicrous fear.
At the same instant he beheld before him Renault,
galloping across the avenue leading from the gate, and
heard the quick challenge and reply as he disappeared
in the lane.
His reply did not distinctly reach his ear, and he
was perplexed to know how he should pass the barrier
without bodily danger. A baggenet was ne'er a
bodkin i' the flesh. I ha' been stuck i' the thumb wi'
a bodkin, and ne'er minded it, he soliloquized: but
a baggenet and a bullet make a penetration! I would
I knew the password! Cousin Renault should ha'
lent it me till I get by these enemies. I must needs
now trust to my folly, as I ha' done all my life. 'Tis
a quality hath stood me in stead, when wit would ha'
ben hanged. I care not how many wounds they put
in my soul, so they harm not my body. I am brave
i' the soul, but my flesh hath cowardice in it.
He instantly turned from the street in the direction
of the wall, which, by the aid of a bastion, he climbed
with activity, and gained the top of a rampart at a
spot about one hundred yards from the barrier. He
ran, or, rather, skipped swiftly but noiselessly along the
summit; and, without being perceived by the
steadily-pacing
sentry, in a moment stood above him over the
arch of the gate. There was a bastion within reach
of his foot, and he prepared to descend by it. The
sentinel turned at this instant in his walk, and, seeing
Gobin's shadow added to the bold outline of the
ramparts
,
stopped short with astonishment, and watched its
motions as it appeared gradually to sink into the
Vol. I.S
shadow of the wall. Just as intelligence seemed to
break upon him, his musket was mysteriously lifted
from his hands into the air, and he felt himself clasped
around the neck by a pair of legs, and his throat
grasped by no gentle hand.
The devil has got me at last! he hoarsely
exclaimed
,
with horror in his face.
And he hath caught no saint, brother! The
countersign
out
with it, or I will choke thee!
Orleans and Spain! answered the soldier,
between
pain and affright.
Treachery! treason! Ho, guards, up! shouted
the captain, rushing from the guardhouse on hearing
the voices, but stopped with surprise at the singular
scene.
If thou open thy mouth now, villain, I will kill
thee! whispered Gobin in the soldier's ear. A
bon noche
to thee, brother Spain. Have I disturbed
thy sleep? he asked, with great address, coolly
turning
to the officer. If I have, I meant it not. Cousin
Blue-cap and I are having a moonlight gossip o' it. I
sit upon his shoulders, I being a-short-legged, and
gossip
something long in the bones.
In the fiend's name, tell who thou art?
demanded
the captain of the guard, who was now at the head
of a score of men, all equally surprised at what they
saw. Gaspar, what means this?
Cousin Gaspar hath the lockjaw, brother,
answered
Gobin. I leave him to your skill. Give him a
glass o' wine; nothing like wine to loosen the
jawhinges
.
Take thy arquebuss, Gaspar, he added,
placing the weapon in the hand of the soldier, whose
fear was rapidly turning to rage, which was not a
little
increased by the smile that he detected lurking in
the face of his captain, who by this time began truly to
appreciate the character of Gobin.
Jump to the ground, and I will give thee a cup o'
my best Malmsey, merry Jackanapes, he said to the
jester, whose broad visage could not be long in
producing
its legitimate effect upon the risible muscles of
those who for the first time beheld it.
Wilt thou treat me fairly, cousin, if I get down?
he asked, warily.
Down with thee, and may Beelzebub have the
roasting of thy carcass! cried the huge soldier,
furiously
,
vainly endeavouring to shake him off, amid
the maddening roars of laughter of his comrades.
The fool gave him a ringing box on the ear; and,
leaping to the ground with a loud laugh of mischievous
triumph, ran off with the speed of the wind.
Nay, thy cup of wine, gossip mine, called after
him the amused captain of the guard.
I will give him a barrel of it, fiercely said the
soldier Gaspar, levelling and cocking his piece.
Hold! or I will cut thee down, cried the officer.
I will fire if I die for it! he answered, fiercely;
and deliberately he pulled the trigger and discharged
the piece.
Gobin, who had not got eighty yards from the post,
instantly fell with a loud shriek, rolled over on the
ground several times, and then, to the surprise of all,
jumped up, and fled along the path taken by Renault
with renewed speed, while, at the same instant, the
soldier received the sword of his enraged officer deep
into his shoulder, and sank, with a heavy groan, to the
ground.
Gobin, who had fallen between sudden pain and
affright
,
on getting to his feet, ran a few hundred yards
farther, when, feeling his hand wet and glutinous, he
looked at it with misgiving (for the pain had instantly
passed away with the first shock), and to his horror
discovered that the joint of his little finger was shot
off. He instinctively gave utterance to a loud,
terrific
yell, and cast himself headlong upon the ground,
where for a few minutes he rolled and roared in the
most extraordinary mannernow with rage, now with
grief, now with pain. At length becoming exhausted,
he sat down upon a stone, and began to comfort
himself
with shreds of philosophy, and see how he could
best turn his wound to his own personal profit and
account
,
not forgetting, meanwhile, to bind it
tenderly
in his handkerchief. He was at length about to
rise up and go towards the old government-house,
when he saw the troop approaching, with Renault
at their head. He then changed his mind and sat
down again; and presently began to give voice to the
wailings that reached the sympathizing ear of the
quadroon.
What aileth thee? asked Renault, feelingly,
dismounting
from his horse beside him.
Slain, cousin Renault! Slain! Bullets and
baggenets
!
Gobin ha' got it! I have bled a barrel and
a bucket full. I haven't two pints o' pure red blood
left!
What hath harmed thee, Gobin? I see no wound.
If any one hath hurt thee in malice, he shall repent it!
Show me thy hurt!
Here Gobin tenderly raised his left hand, and
showed
Renault the mutilated member.
What brute hath done this? he asked, with
indignation
.
Gobin informed him in a few pathetic words, and
Renault bade him mount behind him and he would
avenge him.
Nay, he ha' got it; I saw him cut down by the
captain for it.
Then rest content, fair cousin, said Renault, with
playfulness; thou wilt ne'er be the worse for the loss
of thy finger joint; the story of it will be worth to thee
a silver penny each one of the seven times an hour
thou wilt tell it, if thou canst find listeners so often.
Go back to the gate, and couple with the merry
captain
thou hast told of, and see if thy blood-letting hath
not cleared thy wits, for thou must, by stratagem, open
the gates, that myself and troop of brave riders may
sally out. Thou knowest, with thy quick perceptions,
all I want. Do it fairly, and I will give thee a pension
for thy little finger's sake, and no man shall say thou
didst not get thy wound fighting side by side with
stalwart
men-at-arms. Bind up thy finger, and forget it
till morning. I will then give thee golden salve for it.
Go now to the barrier, while we ride slowly forward.
Let me hear from thee within a quarter of an hour.
All depends on thy address, remember, Gobin!
Wit, cousin, is not perfect wit without folly. Wit
is a golden
louis-d'or
in the pocket when a penny is
needed, while folly is its small change. As thou and
thine are all gold coins, and must needs have some
light money to pay thy toll through the barrier, I must
e'en give it thee in charity. When thou hearest an
ass bray, cousin Renault, know I am among asses, and
that the gate is open for thee.
Thus speaking, Gobin, in whom the prospect of a
pension and the consideration his wound would give
him, with all his former character returning upon him,
limped ludicrously away as if he had lost a toe instead
of a finger, and soon disappeared in the direction of
the post. He had not been absent above twenty
minutes
,
when Renault, who, with Alfrde and his whole
troop, had been impatiently listening, heard the loud
braying of an ass just as he had turned himself in his
saddle to give the order to dash forward and surprise
the post.
It is the signal, Charleval! The fool hath done
it: though I must confess, much as I trusted in his
peculiar
powers and cunning, I had not calculated on
success. It may still be doubtful. But let us ride.
Fall in two by two, and trot forward in double file and
close column! he cried, spurring on.
The whole line was instantly in rapid motion, and,
issuing from the shaded lane into the broad avenue,
wheeled round the corner and pressed towards the
barrier, which Renault and Alfrde both at the same
instant saw was open.
Victoire! brave Gobin!
they
both exclaimed in the one breath.
Advance! at a gallop! shouted Charleval.
Close column, and spur to the rowel! added
Renault
.
Sword in hand they came up to the wide opened
S 2
barrier, over the top of which Gobin was descried,
grinning from ear to ear with mischievous triumph
and extravagant delight, capering and shouting as if
gone mad with the excitement of the moving
spectacle
;
while on either side of the gate, paralyzed with
sudden fear, stood the astonished Spaniards and their
captain.
Orleans and Spain! shouted Renault, as he dashed
through.
Orleans and Liberty! cried Charleval, following
him like the wind.
The Spanish captain looked on with fear, as if a
troop of spirit-riders were prancing by, while with
ringing chains, thundering hoofs, and a loud, rushing
noise, the three hundred horsemen passed through the
barrier into the open country. In a few minutes
afterward
they were lost to the eyes of the awe-stricken
soldiers in the windings of a forest path, which
penetrated
deep into the gloomy recesses of the forest.
CHAPTER XVII.
SCENE AT MASS.
The
morning sun shone on a stirring and brilliant
scene in the Place d'Armes. Trumpets were sounding;
banners of gold and green were flouting in the sky;
arms flashed like noonday lightning; horsemen
glittering
with steel, and gay in plumes and velvet, galloped
to and fro across the
Plaza
, and the voices of captains
marshalling their men, mingled with the heavy tramp of
moving columns, and the thunder of squadrons
wheeling
into line. The Count of Osma had commanded a
Te Deum
in gratitude for his conquest, and was
preparing
,
with his whole army, to enter the Cathedral,
where, obedient to his orders, the priests were already
assembled, waiting only for his presence.
In few towns taken by storm has there been known
any suspension of daily mass; and with the
occupation
of this province and subversion of the former
government
,
the captain-general did not, therefore, desire
to proceed so far as the suspension of religious
worship
on the very day of his triumph; and, fearing that
the daily oblation should cease through his agency, he
had yielded to the control of certain superstitious fears
rather than to any feelings of religious veneration.
With his proclamation for
Te Deum
to be celebrated
an hour after sunrise, he issued an invitation, or, rather,
mandate, for the citizens to assemble at mass as usual,
promising that a space on either side of the crypt should
be appropriated to the females, while the porch and
places
not occupied by the soldiery should be given up to
the males: to this invitation he annexed an amnesty
for all past offences, on condition of its being generally
complied with. Consequently, when, an hour after
sunrise, the chimes tolled for mass, the hitherto
deserted
streets were filled with citizens, the majority of
whom were females, on their way to the Place d'Armes.
Here the men lingered a while to survey the spectacle,
while the women entered the Cathedral, and, with
feelings
of mingled curiosity, devotion, and expectation,
crowded around the altar.
The count had just come forth from his pavilion, and
now stood in front of it, surrounded by his principal
officers
,
his hand upon the mane of his warhorse,
accompanied
by his daughter, the bridle of whose palfrey
was held by the Ethiopian eunuch.
The face of the haughty chieftain was pale, and his
brow, partly shaded by the sable plumes of his casque,
was thoughtful and gloomy. He had evidently passed
a sleepless morning since the departure of the
enchantress
,
and remorse was as evidently not unmingled with
the motives that led him to proclaim a
Te Deum
. He
sought in it also the peace of his own conscience, which,
chased by guilty fear, would fain fly to the altar for
refuge
and protection. The fitful clouds of emotion that
now passed across his face betrayed a troubled spirit
rather than a devotional heart; and his eye roved
piercingly
over the troops into the crowd beyond, as if in
search of some person whom he feared, yet hoped to
discover. At length, as if satisfied with his scrutiny,
he assumed a more cheerful countenance; and, turning
to his daughter, who, habited,
l'Amazon
, in a suit of
silver cloth scaled like armour, with a green robe
fastened
across her left shoulder by a single diamond,
stood by his side anxiously watching his face, said, with
a smile,
To thy saddle, Lil! The troops are marshalled,
and the mass waits our presence.
I am most happy, dearest father, she said,
pressing
his hand and speaking low, that you have the
will to do this holy duty this morning, instead of the
fearful
deed thou didst contemplate. The glorious sun
smiles on thy piety.
Thou wouldst have made a rare abbess, girl!
Thou art infected with piety, and hast prayers ready at
thy tongue's end, like a saintly nun, he said,
pleasantly
returning her caress.
Had I not religion, father, I should ne'er have had
the courage to follow thee into battle at thy command.
It has taken from me all fear of death, and so o'ercome
my woman's weakness.
By the red rood! thou dost not, in truth, fear death,
as I have often witnessed! but I did lay thy gallant
bearing to the blood in thy veins.
Lay it to my faith and my duty to thee, sir,
neither
of which shall fail while Heaven gives me life and
hope.
Thou art a good girl, and a brave! Thy piety
hath done thee little harm; yet I would, for my pride's
sake, thou hadst borne thyself in the field as thou hast
done alone by the blood that thou hast gotten from thy
ancestors. Put thy prayers to account, then, child, this
morning, for I know thou lovest thy father, and he hath
full need of them!
He spoke with scornful bitterness the last sentence,
and, turning from her, sprang into his saddle. His
example was instantly followed by those about him;
and with his daughter on his left, and beyond her
Sulem
the Ethiopian, whose gigantic size and ferocious
aspect drew all eyes upon him, rode to the front of the
line, and gave the command to fall into open column.
Having stationed himself, with his staff, before the
grand entrance to the Cathedral, the whole body of
troops, with slow and solemn martial music, passed in
review before him. First came the cuirassiers,
shining
with poitrel and casque, mounted on
gayly-prancing
steeds, and moving noisily along with jingling
chains and clashing sabres. In their midst, lifted
proudly aloft, was borne a crimson standard, on which
was inscribed, in letters of gold,
ESPANIA IN NOVO ORBE VICTRIX.
Then came the body of lancers, with a cloud of
flying
pennants fluttering from the upraised lances, and
helms streaming with flaming horsehair. Then came,
in a long column, the body of men-at-arms, marching in
close phalanx to the slow measure of the military
music
,
mingled with which, occasionally, was heard the
deep thunder of the organ within the Cathedral. As
they approached the entrance, the cuirassiers opened
to the right and left, and formed on either side of the
door: the lancers did the same; and the foot,
marching
down between the lines of cavalry, entered the
church. The count then dismounted, which was a
signal for the whole troop to leave their saddles; and,
preceded by a Spanish standard, surmounted by a
crucifix
,
borne by the
alfarez real
, the royal
standard-bearer
,
passed into the church; the dismounted
troopers
,
marching six abreast in his rear, filed off to the
right and left, and filled the entire body of the vast
temple; while the men-at-arms occupied the sides,
and the cuirassiers and lancers the centre. Lifting
his helmet, which the soldier raises only to his Maker,
as he crossed the threshold with Estelle by his side,
the count dipped his finger in the font of holy water,
and blessed his brow and breast, and was about to
proceed
on when his eyes rested on Sulem. They
instantly
blazed with fierce light, and he cried, with indignant
horror,
Dog of a Mohammedan! would you defile the holy
church with your presence? Back with thee beyond
the outer portal, and wait my coming!
The Moor crossed his hands submissively upon his
bosom, and retired from the vestibule amid the holy
execrations of the soldiers, while with slow and martial
tread the Count of Osma moved up the aisle of warriors
towards the high altar. Numerous candles, towering
like columns of marble, burned around and upon it;
and with the dazzling display of gold, and silver, and
precious stones on cross and crozier, with the rich
dresses of the priests, and all the pomp and
circumstance
of Roman worship, the whole seemed a blaze
of glory.
When the men-at-arms first began to march in, the
priest at the foot of the altar commenced chanting
In
nomine patris;
and, as the knight entered, he
ascended
it, chanting
Aufer  nobis
in a clear, distinct
voice that filled the house. The count advanced to
the crypt, and, kneeling above it before the altar,
seemed
for a few seconds to be engaged in inward prayer.
He then lifted his head, and, apparently forgetful of
all around him, was intent solely on the progress of
the mass. The gorgeous apparel of the altar; the
imposing manner and costume of the priests; the
religious
tone of the temple; the clouds of ascending
incense
;
and the sublime anthem of
Gloria in excelsis
,
swelling from the choir and filling all the dome,
impressed
his mind with holy and reverential awe. His
soul was overpowered; his spirit enchanted; and,
willingly yielding up his senses to the scene, he deluded
himself with the belief that his emotions of pleased awe
proceeded from reverential piety. The worship of
Estelle, who knelt beside him, was as pure as her own
spirit. It originated in the soul, and was far elevated
above sense. Her responses were deep and fervent,
and her adoration humble and sincere.
After the adoration and oblation of the Host and of
the chalice, and when the priest had blessed the
incense
,
the count rose from his knees as if he were
wearied with his devotions, or had performed enough
of an accustomed duty to make his conscience easy,
and began to survey the worshippers about him. His
eyes, after glancing with military pride over the
serried
hosts that kneeled along the vast pavement, rested
on a group of female worshippers on the left of the
crypt, and became suddenly fixed, as if fascinated.
There were many lovely forms clad in flowing veils,
and many dark eyes of beauty in that group; but there
was one figureone pair of eyes, that timidly
encountered
histhat enchained his vision, and the glances
of which penetrated his heart. They were of a most
piercing black, yet so soft that they seemed to be
dissolving
in their own fire. They had no sooner met
his, being inadvertently directed towards him as he
rose from his knees, than they were again turned upon
the altar full of adoration, while the lips of the fair
owner moved in prayer. He thought she shrunk from
his gaze with fear. He observed, too, that her cheek
grew pale; that the hand that held the silver-clasped
missal trembled; and he was skilled enough in
woman's
heart to know that, though her lips were praying,
and her eyes turned towards the altar with devotion,
she was thinking of his fixed look with alarm. He
was conscious that she was terrified, and he became
more deeply interested in her; for her alarm
heightened
her rare beauty, and filled him with curiosity to
know who she was. Passion at the same instant
inflamed
his bosom, and he inwardly resolved, if the
maiden was to be won, she should become his. That
she was a quadroone, the flowing lace veil fastened at
the top of the head and descending to the feet, the raven
hair, and voluptuous outline of the symmetrical person,
sufficiently betrayed. As he gazed, his soul was fired
with the guilty desire that had taken possession of it,
and the sublime anthem of
Te Deum
swelled unheeded
upon his ears, for thenceforward he had neither ears,
nor eyes, nor thought, save for the fair creature who
had fascinated his senses.
Beside the maiden he observed that there kneeled a
dark and singularly handsome woman, who, from her
air and manner, was her mother or her
duenna;
and he
saw with pleasure that she had discovered his silent
admiration of her
protge
, and by word and look
reproved
the timidity with which she shrunk from it.
He acknowledged her favouring part in this pantomime
by a glance, which she returned with such intelligence
that he was at once assured that the chief obstacles to
his success were removed. It has been said that the
Count of Osma, notwithstanding he was the father of a
beautiful girl of sixteen, was still a gay and gallant
man; and that, although forty years of age, female
beauty had for him the charm and fascination of his
youth. Enough, too, has been given of his character
to show that, in seeking the indulgence of his wishes,
he was likely to be restrained by no very lofty moral
sense. It was Azlie who was the object of his
passion
;
and the proud and gratified look of her mother
betrayed that the moment she had hoped for had
arrived
;
that the plan she had conceived for the
ambitious
advancement of her daughter, and her own
revenge
upon the gay Marquis Caronde, had opened as
she would wish it. From the hour of the Spanish
governor's
arrival, after being satisfied that she could look
no longer towards the outlawed Jules, she had secretly
determined, trusting to the surpassing charms of
Azlie
,
to place her, on the first public occasion, in the view
of the captain-general. The proclamation for mass
presented to her active mind an opportunity not to be
passed by; and, commanding Azlie to follow her, she
entered the Cathedral, and kneeled with her near the
spot reserved for the governor. She saw, as she had
anticipated, the effect of her beauty upon him, and her
triumph was thus far complete.
The mass at length terminated with the brief
ceremony
of consecrating the standard by sprinkling it with
holy water, and the benediction of the priest was
pronounced
upon the assembly. A thousand voices
responded
Amen;
a hundred banners waved above a
sea of plumes, and the organ sent out its answering
thunder, while through clouds of incense gleamed the
lances of the retiring columns. The Spanish knight,
whose piety had so soon changed to passion, and whose
adoration for the image of the Virgin had so readily
become transfixed to a living maiden, after vainly
endeavouring
to encounter once more the timid gazelle
eyes of the lovely quadroone, which had produced such
an extraordinary effect upon him, left the altar with
Estelle, and passed at a hastened step through the line
of men-at-arms to the door. They here received their
horses from the Ethiopian, and sprung into their
saddles
.
With an impatient eye, the count then watched
the lively tread of the men-at-arms as they marched
forth to the loud, martial crash of instrumental music,
and, as the rear platoon crossed the threshold, he
commanded
the cavalry to form column and trot forward,
and ordered the troops to display their line across the
Place d'Armes
as before. He then remained in his
saddle near the door until the female worshippers came
forth, when his eye sought among them for the form of
Azlie. At length he discovered her shrinking within
the throng from his observation; and, though modestly
veiled from head to foot, he could not mistake the air
and figure of her who had captivated his senses.
Bending in his saddle, he touched the ear of the Moor.
Sulem, seest thou yonder maiden, veiled, yet
vainly
striving to conceal the celestial beauty that shines
through? he said, in a low tone, in the listening ear
of the ready slave.
He followed the direction of his glance as he spoke,
and replied with a look of secret intelligence.
'Tis enough, Sulem, he answered, approvingly; I
would know who she is, her abode and condition.
Your slave lives but to obey, replied the Ethiopian.
Signors! cried the count, turning from him, and
addressing the officers and regidors of the provincial
cabildo, who were on horseback around him, we have
done our duty to God and the church, now let us do
Vol. I.T
it to the king and his province! We will presently
review the troops, and appoint them quarters, and then
take possession of the government-house and offices
of state. I would, once for all, this day settle on a
firm basis both the municipal and provincial
government
,
and see the
alcalde
and
alguazil mayor
, he
continued
,
bowing to each of these chosen dignitaries,
forthwith assuming the honours and duties of their
stations. Before sunset the Spanish laws shall have
superseded those of the former superior council, and
Spanish officers shall administer them. By the rood,
signors, we will have a loyal Spanish city of it ere
many hours.
With the cutting off a few heads, said one of the
officers, with a decided tone and manner, that
sufficiently
showed his willingness to have the recent slaughter
of the men-at-arms atoned for by blood.
We have enough on hand to-day, Don San Juan,
to establish ourselves firmly in power; there will be
time enough to-morrow to look to these things, said
the governor, with a meaning smile of anticipated
vengeance
;
we must do nothing now to destroy the
happy
confidence our proclamation of this morning has
inspired in the citizens. All in good time. The
town's-people must be encouraged to resume their
occupations
,
pursuits, and amusements: by this means
we shall at once secure their confidence, and we may
then take our vengeance into our own hands. We
will imitate the chirurgeon, who gives a sleeping
potion
before he proceeds to amputate the limb. The
line is formed! Let us ride, signors!
There was a smile interchanged by the gentlemen
present ere they spurred after him, partly at themselves,
that they should be mistaken for a moment as to the
known character of the count, and be deluded into the
belief that he was about to exercise unusual clemency
towards the town, with the blood of thirteen of his
body-guard
not yet drunk up by the earth, and partly at
their mutual gratification on the prospect of retribution
upon the authors of the massacre.
In less time than the Count of Osma had named, the
government was settled, and all its offices filled, from
the
alguazil mayor
down to the
guarda major;
and by
the middle of the day all the former laws and usages
of the province were changed or abolished. The
Cabildo
he established was composed of six perpetual
regidors
, two ordinary
alcaldes
, an attorney-general
syndic
, and a clerk, over which he presided in person;
but it was provided, during his absence, that one of the
ordinary alcaldes should assume the chair, and
immediately
on adjournment, that two
regidors
should go to
the palace, and report to him what had been done. It
held its first session the same afternoon in the
council-chamber
,
and from that time the laws of Spain became
the sole guide of this tribunal in their decisions; but
as these, as well as those of the former
rgime
, were
founded on the Justinian Code, the transition did not
become apparent to the citizens before it became
complete
.
The count, as governor, reserved to himself
the exercise of judicial power, both in civil and
criminal
matters, throughout the province, and was the sole
arbiter in the tribunal of the cabildo. Thus, in a few
hours, Louisiana changed laws and masters. The
citizens
,
judging it useless to repine at what could no
longer
be avoided, at once threw off their hostile
character
,
and received the Spaniards with, if not real, at least
outward cordiality. Before night things resumed their
wonted course, and the hum of business and the laugh
of pleasure were again heard from the bench of the
craftsman and the
boudoirs
of beauty; and, save a
body-guard retained at the gate, no troops remained in
the Place d'Armes, and nothing was suffered to remain
to offend the townsmen's eyes.
The sumptuous chambers of the governor's palace
were at noon thrown open to the possession of the
new ruler, and its corridors echoed to the step of a
Spanish master. Here Estelle found a suite of rooms
that seemed to have been expressly prepared for her,
and met with a luxury and elegance that compensated
her for the gorgeous apartments of the Spanish
mansions
she had left behind. To confirm the universal
confidence, and to give the citizens an opportunity of
paying their court to him, he being now in full
possession
of the governor's house, the count issued a
proclamation
from his private cabinet for a
leve
to be
held in the hall of his palace in the evening, to which
he invited all citizens friendly to his government, while
to the former councillors he sent a courteous command
requiring their attendance. Thus, in one short day,
with consummate address and wisdom, and with a fair
countenance of peace, did the wily and politic
governor
lay the foundation of his power, which shortly he
was to exercise in a deed of barbaric revenge, that has
no parallel save in the conduct of an Asiatic despot.
In the mean while, during the hours that intervened
before
the approaching
leve
, he made himself
acquainted
with the state of parties in the city, and also
learned
who were the true authors of the attack upon his
embassy.
CHAPTER XVIII.
SCENE AT THE LEVE.
The
eventful day closed amid the roar of artillery
from the fleet and the battery, and the hour at length
arrived when the new governor was to receive the
homage of the townsmen and of the chief men of the
province. The moon had just risen, and shone
brightly
upon the Place d'Armes, where a military band of
music was playing national Spanish airs, surrounded
by crowds of spectators of the lower class, gayly
dressed in their holyday attire, while around, on
casement
and balcony, were grouped beautiful women,
listening
to the martial melody, and gazing with
curiosity
upon the lively throngs beneath. All was life and
brilliancy. The windows of the palace were
illuminated
with a thousand lamps, the lights glancing upon
the steel and silver of the governor's body-guard, who,
in their rich and brilliant costume, were drawn up
before
the door, increasing the dazzling effect and
enchantment
of the scene.
The citizens already began to enter and ascend
towards
the audience-chamber, some advancing with
timidity, yet with stronger curiosity, to behold the face
of their new ruler, and mingle in the splendid pageant
of the evening; some going from self-interest, some
actuated by their love for
spectacle
, some governed by
one motive, some by another, but very few influenced
by a sincere desire to pay homage to the Spaniard.
The hall of audience was an upper room, of large
dimensions
,
opening on one side, by windows descending
to the floor, upon the Place d'Armes, and on the
opposite
side upon a corridor, which ran around a spacious
inner court, paved with marble and ornamented by a
magnificent fountain, shaded by fruit-bearing lemon
and orange trees. From the lower porch or hall of
entrance
,
which extended from the front through to the
court, a spacious stone staircase, guarded by an iron
balustrade, conducted to the lofty door of the
audience-chamber
,
which, thrown wide open, displayed the
greatest magnificence within. The tall, deep
windows
were draped with curtains of purple and damask
silk, falling from gilded spears like trailing banners;
columns were wreathed with vines and flowers; the
standards of France and Spain, intertwined, festooned
the arched ceiling, and from a choir at one extremity
the softest music floated through the apartment. The
floor was already crowded with citizens, above whose
heads danced the plumes of many a Spanish officer,
mingling amicably in their midst. Near one of the
windows that looked upon the
Plaza
stood the Count
of Osma, in the splendid uniform of a Spanish general,
his breast blazing with diamonds. On his arm leaned
Estelle, no longer the youthful Amazon, but robed like
the noble maidens of her country. A spencer of
sable
T 2
velvet fitted her bust and waist, and was secured
at the throat by a ruby of great size and rare beauty.
From the girdle a light green robe of satin descended
to her feet, and, flowing into a train, was looped up on
one side just far enough to display an exquisite foot.
Her hair was braided and bound above her temples
like a coronet, with a wreath of pearls entwined in it;
and a single star of rubies above her brow. Her
manner was all grace and feminine witchery. How
gloriously beautiful she appeared! How many charms
had been disguised by her Amazonian costume! Hadst
thou vanity, Estelle, and didst know the power of thy
sex's attire, thou wouldst scarce don helmet or corslet
more!
With embarrassed eyes and heightened cheek, yet
with the grace and dignity of a Juno, she stood beside
her stately sire and received the homage of the
citizens
;
for his wily wisdom led him to embrace this
occasion
of presenting to them a daughter in whom he
took such pride and loved so tenderly; a sort of love
and pride that made him, rather than be separated from
its object, give a soldier's education to a maiden whom
Nature had endowed with every feminine grace; that
led him to convert the lute into a lance, and seek to
make a warrior of a woman. Yet, save a certain
degree
of decision, and a
brusque
air of independence,
that came as much from her father, perhaps, as from
the camp, she was still gentle, delicate, and femininea
woman to love and to be loved with all a man's heart.
By the side of the count stood the
alguazil mayor
,
who, first demanding the names of all who came
forward
,
presented them in turn to him. Nearly all the
chief citizens had paid homage to the Spanish ruler,
and, after having delivered and answered one or two
phrases of courtesy, had retired up the hall to
converse
with one another upon the events of the day, to
listen to the music from the orchestra, or curiously
watch the progress of presentation. Osma had
hitherto
worn a placid brow and a smiling lip; but as the
evening advanced without the appearance of the
councillors
,
he became impatient; and by the knitting of
his brow, and his inquiring glance directed towards the
door, showed that a storm was brewing that would
soon burst upon the heads of the objects of his
displeasure
.
What mean your laggard councillors, sirs? he
asked of several of the citizens who were near him
ominously watching their indications of angry
disappointment
.
Why loiter they in their duty? Do
they hesitate to acknowledge, or dare to withhold their
allegiance? By the red cross of Calatrava! if they
be not here presently, their heads shall roll upon the
scaffold!
Nay, father, bear them with patience! said
Estelle
,
gently. They are perchance old men, and
may not have had time to reach the hall of audience.
They shall be dragged hither by their beards if
they are not here within a quarter of an hour.
They will be, sir, she said, earnestly. Nay,
see how thou hast disturbed the confidence and hilarity
reigning here but now. Surely, sir, this general
homage
of the town should gratify thee!
Peace, daughter! And you, signors, he cried,
turning and sternly addressing those about him, shall
be answerable for their appearance with your lives.
Sulem, he added, in a low tone, to the Ethiopian, who
stood behind him, bid Garcilaso hither!
Garcilaso lieth wounded to the death, interrupted
the Moor.
'Fore God, 'tis truth! and these shall answer it.
Bear then this signet to Don Guzman, captain of my
body-guard! He will know its import.
The eyes of the slave glistened with sanguinary
delight
;
and, receiving the ring, he was about to leave the
hall, when there was heard a sudden movement near
the door, and the cry of The councillors! rose
from a hundred voices.
Stay, Sulem, commanded the count; and the
slave, kneeling, offered him the signet.
Nay, keep it; we may yet need its aid.
Those about the governor now gave back, and left
a space for the approach of a small body of men, at
whose head walked the venerable and dignified
president
of the abolished council.
Silence,
mayor!
these need no usher, said the
count to the officer, who was advancing to meet them
to demand their names and rank, as he had done to
the others.
As they approached, the count assumed a stern
bearing
;
but when they came nearer, apparently struck
with the calm and dignified port of the president, and
the firm and manly presence of his companions, he
addressed
them with less severity than he had
determined
to do, but still with a displeased tone.
You are well arrived, signors! We had wellnigh
given up the honour of your countenance to our poor
leve
, which had been naught you being absent. You
are well come, though, by'r lady! full late; and I am
at a loss whether I shall refer your tardiness to
contempt
of my proclamation and express command, or
to the fashion of your province.
We have no fashion of homage with us towards a
conqueror, signor, never before having done homage
save to our king and Heaven, answered the president,
stopping near the governor, and looking him full in
the face.
Then, by the rood! you would doubtless have us
refer it to your contempt of us, he demanded, with
angry surpise.
The Count of Osma may interpret his own words
as best suits him, answered the president, with irony.
Nay, father, speak not! said Estelle, interposing:
they are here to show you that form of homage you
commanded, doubtless that they may obtain for their
families and goods the undisturbed security and
protection
you appended to their obedience. I pray thee
receive them with grace!
Signors, you see an intercessor for yourselves in
my lovely child. For her sake I accept your
presence
as a sufficient homage and token of your
allegiance
.
Nay, signor, our allegiance hath no king but Louis
of France, answered the president, quietly.
Be it so, Signor President. If thou hadst an
army
to back thee, thy words were of weight; but,
methinks
,
without such, thy allegiance will little avail
France.
The president smiled meaningly. The count saw
the smile, and seemed for a moment to be
endeavouring
to interpret it; but, being foiled, he appeared to
forget it, and said, with the courtesy of a hospitable
entertainer, yet with awakened suspicion,
Now that you are arrived, signors, we will
proceed
to the banqueting-room, where you will find
something
for the refreshment of yourselves and
fellow-citizens
.
A signal then being given, the doors on the south
side of the hall were immediately thrown wide open,
and the guests, preceded by the count and his
daughter
,
went into a large and lofty room, where was spread
a sumptuous entertainment of wines and fruits. Here
the governor pledged his numerous guests, and, by the
suavity of his manner and unexpected condescension,
worked an extraordinary change in the minds of all
present in his favour; while the beauty and grace of
his daughter won all hearts.
Now, Signor President, he said, with a smile, to
the Sieur d'Alembert and the other councillors, we
will leave these loyal town's-people to their repast, and
retire to a more orderly entertainment, which I have
prepared purposely for yourselves.
From the peculiar manner of the speaker, the
president
thought that there was more meant in this
invitation
than met his ear, and would have declined it;
but, seeing no suspicion awakened in the minds of his
friends, and trusting for security from treachery to the
promise of amnesty and the present company of his
lovely daughter, he replied, evasively,
We thank your excellency! We are plain
burghers
,
and have ever mingled freely with our
fellow-townsmen
,
and are now satisfied to share what thou
hast provided for them.
Nay, signors, replied the count, I would do you
especial honour; and, besides, knowing how loyally
you have held the trust reposed in you, I have hopes
that I shall possess eloquence enough to persuade you
to transfer this loyalty to Spain.
The councillors knew not whether to construe his
words literally or ironically; but they felt sure that
they had to do with a crafty man, who, with an
outward
seeming of friendship, cherished a spirit of
hostility
against the people he had come to govern. Still,
trusting to his knightly word of general pardon to the
province, they followed him into a smaller chamber,
hung with crimson and gold, lighted with costly
girandoles
,
having a table spread in the midst, dazzling the
eyes with gold and silver vessels with which it was
laid, and tempting the palate with the rich and rare
viands that covered it. There were eight covers, and
by each, save that placed at the head, stood a black
slave, silent and statue-like.
You see, signors, I have prepared a private
banquet
for ourselves; therefore your absence to-night
would have been ill-timed. Be seated, and by-and-by,
over our wine, we will discourse of those matters of
which I just now hinted. I will but see my daughter
to her apartment, and be with you.
Thus saying, the count departed by a side-door with
Estelle, who secretly gave the president a warning
glance as she passed him; and in a few moments he
returned, followed by the Moor, ere the surprised
councillors could exchange opinions upon this
extraordinary
courtesy. At the moment the door had
closed upon them, the Sieur d'Alembert, who could not
fail to translate the earnest look of the maiden, also
quitted the apartment and returned into the general
banqueting-room, where he gave a signal to a young
man in the costume of a
courreur du bois
, lounging
near, to approach. He whispered a few words in his
ear, and the youth instantly left the hall, while he
himself
quickly returned into the room he had left, just as
the count himself re-entered, followed by the Moor.
He had scarcely taken his seat, however, before the
massive doors were closed behind him by some
invisible
agency, convincing him that the supper was meant
to be at least as private as it was costly and elegant.
Now, signors, let us to our banquet, said the
count; our number is small, but the zest of a feast
consisteth rather in the spirits around the board than
in the number of guests.
CHAPTER XIX.
SCENE IN MASQUERADE.
When
the count left Estelle in her chamber to
return
to the banquet-room, he sternly commanded her
not to leave it, nor suffer her slaves to quit it that night.
His manner startled her; and a suspicion which
entered
her mind on beholding the magnificent
entertainment
,
the silent slaves, and the privacy of the room,
which had prompted her to seek the eye of the
president
,
became impressed upon her mind, and she
believed
that her father meditated evil to the councillors.
She vainly strove to banish the thought, but it grew
more vivid with the effort. The peculiar look of
sinister
gratification with which he parted from her; his
firm, confident tread as he walked away; the private
nature and costly character of the entertainment
which could not have been given solely in honour of
men against whom he had, more than once that day,
breathed vengeancewith her painful knowledge of
his dark character, all led her to the conviction that
these men, whose age and dignity of appearance (
especially
that of the venerable and patriotic president)
had interested her, were in danger of death or of foul
wrong.
To boldness of spirit in the young is ever united a
generous nature. With the singular education her
father had given her, she retained all the tenderness of
a virgin that had never roamed beyond bower and
boudoir
. She was proud, noble-hearted, and
self-sacrificing
.
Pure in heart, she knew no evil herself, and
wondered at it in others. Loving her father, she was
not blind to his errors; and, while hating his crimes,
and, like a guardian spirit, working to avert the
consequences
of his imperative and wicked disposition,
she loved himself no less. It was a hard task for her
to cherish love and hate towards the same objectto
nicely discriminate between the good and evil; to
preserve
the balance between filial affections and virtuous
indignation; to know where to love and where to
condemn
!
She had now a bitter and sore trial of her
filial love and sense of moral duty. That her father
contemplated evil to his guests, the more she dwelt
upon the idea, the more firmly her conviction was
settled
.
Humanity and every benevolent feeling
prompted
her to save themfrom what fate she knew not.
Poison, assassination! each pressed upon her mind in
turn, making a distinct and terrible picture. But,
whatever
threatened them, she felt she was called upon
to exert herself to prevent crime. How she should
proceed, she knew not! Her love for her father
pointed
out a course, that, while operating for their safety,
should protect his honour and shield him (if the act
could be averted) from having contemplated it. It was
a hard trial between filial love and moral justice.
What I do must be done now. A moment of
delay may be fatal to them, and involve my poor,
mistaken
father in a crime that men will shudder to name.
How shall I proceed? How shall I take the first step?
If I enter the banquet-room, my poor arm and voice
will avail nothing! Heaven in mercy direct me
aid me to save a beloved father's honour! she cried,
casting herself on her knees.
For a few moments she remained in deep
meditation
,
and then rose with a countenance full of hope and
resolution. Looping her flowing train to her belt, she
cast over her shoulders a military cloak, which
completely
enveloped her person, and placed low upon her
jewelled brow a broad creole's
sombrero
. Then
placing
a naked sword beneath her arm, she left her
chamber
,
and, entering the long, cloistered gallery that
surrounded
the court, cautiously moved along in the
shadows
of the vines that crept luxuriantly over it.
Directed
by the sounds in the general banqueting-room
at its extremity, she approached one of the open
windows
,
through which the cool night-wind was suffered
to enter into it, and looked in upon the revellersfor
such they had now become. There she lingered a
moment, and then, as if her mind was made up, she
more carefully arranged the folds of the
roquelaure
about her form, drew the hat deeper over her eyes, and
passed through the lofty Venetian casements into the
hall. The loud music from the orchestra, the
bacchanalian
voices of the banqueters, the sound of a
thousand moving feet, and the ringing of clashing
wine-cups
,
created a scene of confusion that she paused an
instant to contemplate, and to assure herself of her
self-possession.
This is the way my father would enslave the wills
of the town's-people, and gain their approval of his
contemplated deed. Men feasted and made drunk, as
they have been, will be willingly blind to the evil acts
of their entertainer. This, then, is the policy that hath
assembled this multitude here. Alas! my dear father,
flowing seas of wine will not wash out from thy
conscience
,
or Heaven's dread doom-book, one drop of
blood! were the thoughts that passed through her
mind. Now must I seek for one of those youths I
have to-day learned were devoted to the party of the
councillors. I should know them by a sprig of myrtle
worn in their bonnets and worked on their breasts.
Thus soliloquizing, the bold and generous maiden
mingled carelessly with the feasters, scarce attracting
attention amid the crowd as she slowly passed along,
her eye fixed upon every man's bonnet with anxious
scrutiny. She moved towards the upper end of the
Vol. I.U
hall, where the door led into the banquet-room of the
councillors, that she might, perchance, learn something
there of what was transpiring within before she took
her final step. As she approached the upper end of
the table, she observed that here the noise and
confusion
of voices were greatest, and that some one was
seated in a chair upon the table, surrounded by a great
number of the revellers, who were applauding and
encouraging
what appeared to be an address to them.
At the same instant, she caught sight of a
myrtle-sprig
in a bonnet twenty feet from her, and was about
pressing forward towards it, when she was rudely
addressed
by a man whom she had rubbed against
somewhat
quickly.
Not so fast, signor, he said, speaking thick with
wine, till thou showest thou art better than those thou
treadest upon!
Nay, good fellow, I meant not to touch thee. Pray
let me pass on.
He hath made apology, Rascas, said one near,
who seemed his companion; let him go.
Nay, I bethink me he looketh like a traitor, said
the other with a hoarse laugh. Cock thy hat, master,
and let us look thee i' the eye.
Thou wilt see but a youthful one, signor, said
Estelle, putting back the flapping brim of her
sombrero
,
and looking him steadfastly in the face.
The creole surveyed for an instant the fair and
boyish
countenance presented to his gaze, and then said,
roughly,
Hadst thou a beard, boy, I would have made a
quarrel of this matter. But I have none with a
stripling
like thee. Pledge me and pass on.
Willingly, said Estelle, receiving the cup he filled
and gave to her.
Name the cup, master, he said, eying her with
fixed suspicion.
Osma, she answered, firmly, lifting the
wine-flagon
to her lip. Instantly he dashed it from her hand to
the ground.
I would have sworn thou wert one of them. He
who pledges the Spaniard with Rascas shall drink his
next pledge from a poisoned cup.
Ha, villain! she cried, indignantly, and thou,
too, drinking and feasting at his own board! Thou
shalt be remembered, sirrah!
Lest thou shouldst forget me, take this! he
cried, ferociously, drawing from his breast a stiletto,
and striking savagely at her heart.
His arm was arrested ere he could effect his deadly
purpose, and the weapon torn from his hand by a
stranger, habited precisely like herself, in a
sombrero
drooping over his eyes, and his person wrapped in a
dark roquelaure.
Wouldst thou mingle blood with wine? he
demanded
,
in a deep, stern tone.
The man, foiled and abashed, turned away with a
lowering brow, and mingled with the throng, though
Estelle trembled when she saw that his final glance
rested upon her with vindictive hate, and she feared
he might again cross her path, and defeat her success
in the work she had undertaken. But, trusting to the
purity of her purpose, she instantly banished this fear,
and turned to thank the mysterious individual who had
so opportunely interposed to save her life; but he had
already retired several paces from her, and the closing
throng hid him from her view. She sent after him a
grateful thought, and then pursued more guardedly
her way to the door of her father's banquet-room.
As she approached it, she saw that the individual
upon the table, whose head only she had before seen,
was a person of an extraordinary fantastical
appearance
,
with a broad, extravagant visage, uncouth in
feature, but glistening with quirks and smiles, while
around him she heard roars of laughter, excited by
some jest issuing from his cavernous jaws. She
thought it was the ugliest and merriest face she had
ever beheld; and, notwithstanding the weight of
anxiety
upon her mind, she could not forbear smiling at
the grotesque appearance made by this singularly
strange being. Near him, above the heads of the
crowd, towered the myrtle sprig she sought. Pressing
forward, she was within a few paces of the wearer,
when, as she was urging her way eagerly along, her
form caught the eye of this elevated personage, who,
with an orange impaled on the point of a knife held in
his right hand, and a huge cup of wine elevated in his
left, seemed to be the presiding spirit of the revel.
Ho, cousin Broadbrim; too much haste maketh
ill speed, he cried, singling out the hapless Estelle,
and directing all eyes towards her.
She stopped confused, and trembled with alarm; but
she felt too much was at stake for her to yield to
womanly
weakness, and that, at every sacrifice, she must
now sustain her assumed character.
Art thou bailiff? he continued; there be no
rogues here, no escapados from justice! Art thou
priest? ne'er penitent wilt thou find till day dawn, and
then we shall repent us all that we be too drunk to
drink more! Art thou
Nay, your highness, said the disguised maiden,
at once taking the humour of the king of the feast,
and anxious to escape as soon as possible from
observation
;
were I bailiff, I should be better bred in my
duty than to seek escaped rogues in thy august
presence
!
Were I priest, I should be at my prayers for
thy soul's benefit, as in duty bound; or did I seek
penitents
,
it would be at a fast and not at a feast. May
your highness live for ever!
He has well answered, my subjects and gossips,
gleefully cried Gobin, now become a priest of
Bacchus
.
What shall be done in honour of his rare
wit and wisdom? Doth he not deserve to be chosen
my prime minister, and to sit at my left hand. If we,
both together, rule you not wisely, then there lieth no
virtue in good government.
He was answered by a general cry of approval,
and one or two of the bacchanals laid hold upon their
newly-chosen prime minister to elevate him to the
destined
honour.
Thou hast heard our decision, cousin Gray-cloak.
Mount! ascend! elevate! Seat thyself at our right
hand. We will induct thee into thine office with three
pint cups, one poured on thy head, and two down thy
gullet. Thanks to cousin Osma, wine is not lacking.
Here, cavaliers, let us drink to him! Cups were
filled
and lifted in the air, and at cries of
Viva
Osma!
Viva
Gobin! they were emptied
at a draught. Estelle set her cup down untasted, and,
in the temporary excitement, sought means to
withdraw
.
But the eyes of Gobin were unusually vigilant.
Nay, cousin, thou hast too rare a wit to be lost to
the state. Come up on the table and be prime
minister
,
he cried, or give a weighty reason why thou
shouldst not, he added, with humour.
Listen, then, great king of the revels! I am in
the court of Cupid, and am hither sent to bid thee and
thy court to a feast in the planet Venus on Wednesday
se'nnight. I pray thee, therefore, that, having now
delivered my message, thou wilt do no injustice to
King Cupid by seeking to rob him of his prime
minister
,
and wilt graciously permit me to depart.
A proper speech, and a conclusive, exclaimed
Gobin, whom the humour of the stranger pleased;
thou art at liberty to go after thou hast borne
testimony
to our regard for thy master, Don Cupid. Fill
bumpers, gossips, round! and let us drink to the health
of King Cupid, who hath the wisest of prime ministers.
May his shadow never be less.
While every cup was upturned on the lips of both
Gobin and his courtiers, Estelle adroitly passed
behind
the revellers, and gained the upper end of the
table
and the rear of the jester. She was now within a
few feet of the door, which she approached in a
listening
attitude; but the noise in the hall prevented her
from hearing anything from within; but her worst
fears were confirmed by discovering that a bar was
dropped across the door, and that a bolt on the side
next to her was shut down into the sill.
Treachery! involuntarily fell audibly from her
U 2
lips. She fortified herself for the duty she had
imposed
upon herself by remembering both her father's
endangered
honour and the imminent peril of the
councillors
.
She now looked anxiously around, and saw
standing near her the individual distinguished by the
myrtle sprig, whom she had such difficulty in reaching,
and whom she had lost sight of during her detention
by Gobin, who now once more pursued his orgies, as
if of Don Cupid and his prime minister he had never
heard.
This person appeared to be observing her with
interest
,
and had evidently approached near the door
when he saw her advancing towards it. This did not
escape her; and the suspicion that he might be one of
her father's instruments passed across her mind, and
she feared she might betray herself to an enemy,
instead
of one who should prove a friend of the victims
of his displeasure. Nevertheless, the crisis called for
decision, and without hesitation she approached him.
There was an expression of honesty and good-nature
in his countenance which invited rather than repelled
confidence, and, as he seemed to be something under
the degree of a gentleman, though young and
well-favoured
,
she felt less embarrassment in addressing him
than perhaps she would have done had he been a
cavalier
of rank.
Signor, if it please you, step aside with me; I
would have a brief word with you, she said, coming
near him and speaking in a low tone, then passing him
and crossing over to the shadow of a column.
He started with evident surprise, followed her with
his glance suspiciously, and then, loosening his sabre
in its sheath (for the flapped hat and closely-folded
mantle looked treacherous to his eye), walked up to
the spot where she stood awaiting him.
By the myrtle sprig in thy bonnet and on thy
breast, thou art one of the
courreurs du bois!
she
said, in the same tone in which she had first spoken to
him.
If thou art a friend of the
courreurs du bois
, thou
wilt give me the sign; if thou art an enemy, this hall
is no place for the show of thy sword-skill, answered
the young man, haughtily, and with something like
defiance
in his tones.
He was turning away, when she said earnestly,
reassured
by his lofty spirit and bold language, and
confident
that nothing like murderous guilt or treachery
dwelt in his bosom,
Nay, brave sir, I know no sign of brotherhood
save that which binds in one all noble hearts. Art
thou a friend of the venerable president of the late
provincial
council?
I love him as a father, answered the youth,
fervently
;
and the warmth of Estelle's inquiry assured
him the speaker was not less a friend to him.
Then Heaven bless thee, for thou art he I seek.
Doth danger threaten him? he demanded, half
drawing his sword, and taking a step towards the inner
room.
Hold! be not rash! she cried, detaining his arm;
the president and his council, I fear me, are in great
peril!
Then are his suspicions true.
How! did he suspect?
From the first; and, returning after he had
entered
,
he sent word by one of our number to our chief,
Renault, that peril menaced him.
My poor father! Thy honour is already shaded;
yet I will save it and thee, if there is virtue in a child's
love! she said, mentally. Wherefore art thou
here, then? she asked.
To see what passes, and that no one enter but
tried men, save across my body. So I promised the
good president when he sent my comrade Martin
away for Renault!
Bless thee, bless thee! she exclaimed, pressing
his arm with sudden earnestness in her thankfulness.
Yet the danger is not from without. Dost thou see
the heavy bars and bolts that repel all ingress from
this side? she added, pointing with her finger towards
the door. What force will thy captain bring with
him?
Forty young men, signor, that have but one will,
and that one his. He should be here; it is a quarter
of an hour since Martin went for him, and he is not
wont to be slow when there is a friend to succour or
work to do.
Yonder is a myrtle sprig; but, alas! it is but a
single
one, cried Estelle, speaking with animation at first
as she descried it, and then dropping her voice with
disappointment.
Thou wilt be disappointed, signor, if thou lookest
to see them marching like a Spanish phalanx into the
palace. Look by yonder column, and thou wilt see a
second myrtle sprig; and, wert thou an inch or two
taller, thou couldst discern, as I can, two more of our
green plumes waving in the entrance. Even the
windows
opening upon the corridor are means of
admitting
them into the hall.
Estelle clasped her hands together in silent
gratitude
,
for wherever she turned her eyes appeared a
myrtle sprig; and the bonnets to which they were
attached
were seen moving, one here and one there, in
the direction of the spot where she stood, seemingly
without design, but all with a certain and steady
advance
towards the same object. She trembled with
mingled joy and apprehension as they came, one by
one, towards the column, feeling that the moment had
now come when her father was either to be saved from
crime and his knightly honour preserved, or to have a
hundred witnesses of his consummated guilt.
She turned listeningly towards the inner door; as if
she would catch an outcry, and shuddered lest it should
be too late. This latter reflection restored her
self-possession
,
and assured her there was no time to lose.
Yet must no wrong come to
him
. He must be
saved if guilty, if I lay down my life for him, said
she.
There is our captain, signor; would you speak
with him? asked the youth.
Without delay. Is he among these?
There, he said, pointing to a tall young man,
slowly, and with a careless air, walking up the hall,
nodding pleasantly and shaking his head in the
negative
to those who, as he passed, would have him pledge
them in their wine. When he came near Gobin, this
personage immediately laid claim to him, and swore on
his goblet he should not pass through his vinous
dominions
without cracking a cup with him.
I will crack thy crown for thee, he replied, with
a good-humoured smile.
Thou wilt do me a kindness, cousin Renault, an'
thou dost; it is over-full with good wine, and I would
let out some to make room for more; I have many a
round goblet to put aneath my belt the night.
Thou wilt scarce get that goblet in thy hand aneath
it, Gobin; thou wilt have to steal those of less size,
an' thou wouldst not have the governor's guard
opening
thy girdle.
Out upon thee, gossip! Twit not thy cousin upon
his failings! Have not I been i' the wars? continued
the jester, showing his finger bound up. Because
thou didst know I had stolen a silver bodkin or so,
shouldst thou blab it? Discretion should ha'kept it
secret. It will hurt my credit i' the town. I had
looked for better charity at thy hand, cousin. Ah,
cousin! he added, with a sad countenance, thou hast
done me great mischief. Go onand leave this
goblet-stealing
rogue with the rogues thou hast found him
companying with. Rogues allarrant rogues all are
we!
The young chief smiled, and, passing on, came into
the broad area that intervened between the upper end
of the table and the door, near which, in the shadow
of one of a row of columns that supported this
extremity
of the roof of the hall, stood the
courreur du bois
and the disguised Estelle, who by this time had
counted
above twenty bonnets bearing the myrtle-sprig,
within a few paces of the young chief. With his
lofty
bearing and fine face she had been struck, as her
companion pointed him out to her advancing up the
hall; and while she wondered at his coolness and
self-possession
with so weighty a matter as she knew to
be upon his mindhis deportment defying the keenest
scrutiny of a covert purposeand while she yielded
her admiration to the tact with which he escaped from
the king of the revels, she felt awakened in her bosom
an undefinable interest in him, that made her heart
palpitate with emotions hitherto unknown. The deep,
manly tones of his voice; the rich beauty of his smile;
the haughtiness, yet becoming loftiness of his manner,
as if speaking forth a noble spirit, deepened the
instant
impression; and, without hesitation, she
determined
to place the fullest confidence in him.
Yes, I would speak with your captain, she said,
earnestly, while the blood that quickly mounted to her
cheek and brow at her own ardour, which she could
not conceal from herself had a deeper source than the
safety of the councillors, would have told one skilled
in reading the open heart of a young maiden that in
hers already was the germe of what, if not suffered to
die, would one day become a flourishing tree. From
a careless glance cast by a passing eye often grows
the strongest love. Alas! how many a germe,
bursting
from a seed thrown by the wayside of the heart,
has withered for want of the sower's care, for ever
unknown
to him; or has grown up to blossom and then
perish in the heart's waste! If in thy bosom, gentle
Estelle, one seed of true love has fallen, may it take
deep root, and grow till the sower shall lie down in its
shadow, and the golden birds of affection come and
lodge in its evergreen branches, Love, love, love,
their undying song!
The young man directly crossed the area, and
spoke in a low tone to his captain. Renault glanced
in the direction of the column against which Estelle
leaned, and then, after a hasty inquiry if any one had
passed in or out, and all had remained quiet in the
banquet-room, moved across the space towards her.
Her heart almost ceased its pulsations; for the danger
of the councillors, the honour of her father, and the
responsibility she had drawn upon herself, all rushed
upon her thoughts. What, before seeing the
courreur
du bois
, had been only strong suspicion, was now
certainty
.
Danger and death hung over a body of
innocent
men, and her father's hand was ready to be dyed
with the crimson stains of murder. The thought nerved
her with resolution; and when Renault, coming up,
addressed her in an under but earnest tone,
Monsieur
,
would you speak with me? she answered
firmly
,
The president and his council, banqueting within
yonder chamber, are menaced with danger, sir.
Am I then too late? he demanded, loosening his
bugle from his girdle. They must be rescued, if I
have to contend with the whole Spanish army.
He was about to place the bugle to his lips, which
would in an instant have gathered about him the
determined
band of forty young men, that had
fortunately
been left in the city that morning with the
president
,
when she caught his arm, and said
commandingly
,
Wind not a note, or you will perish with them!
If you would save your rulers, follow me forthwith
with twelve tried men.
May I trust you?
If I prove false, am I not in your power? Lose
not a moment here, but follow me! We have delayed
too long!
Yonder is not the way to the banquet-room,
monsieur
,
cried Renault, seeing her advance with a quick
step towards one of the windows.
Dost thou not see that this door is barred? she
demanded.
I do. Treachery most foul! Lead on! It shall
be as you desire, for there is an earnestness and
sincerity
in your tones that are no part of treachery!
Send your men upon the corridor singly, and meet
me there, she said, crossing the hall, and
disappearing
through the casement.
Renault immediately walked down through the hall,
speaking a word or two to one here and there, each
person addressed at once separating himself from the
crowd, and moving towards one of the windows,
through which he disappeared. This movement was
made with caution and an assumed carelessness in the
change of position, without attracting the attention of
the banqueters, who, amid the miscellaneous and
moving
throng, would scarcely note the particular
movements
of any one individual. Two of the party were
Martin, who had been sent away by the president, and
the
courreur du bois
who had been left to guard the
door of the banquet-room. Renault (who had arrived
in town from the lake fortress, whither he had ridden
at the head of the chief part of his troop in the early
morning, but a few moments before the message from
Sieur d'Alembert came to him informing him of his
suspicions), having seen the men he had chosen leave
the hall, followed them shortly afterward himself. Here
he found the stranger, to whom he had surrendered his
motions, awaiting him at the extremity of the corridor.
You see, monsieur, he said, addressing him, that
I have obeyed you, and placed in you the most open
confidence.
It shall not prove misplaced, brave signor,
answered
Estelle, warmly. I, as well as yourself, have
reason to believe danger menaces the liberties, if not
the lives, of the venerable body of councillors; and I
was seeking in the hall for some of your band (having
knowledge of their attachment to the president), to
communicate my suspicions and seek their aid, when
I fell in with the young man who had constituted
himself
guard at the door. In a few moments you
appeared
,
as if in answer to my prayers, with a host of
strong arms and brave hearts.
Who art thou, fair youth (for such thy
scarcely-seen
cheek and voice betray thee to be), who hast
taken
so deep an interest in the father of our city? Thou
art a stranger with us!
It matters not, so that I am the friend of those
thou lovest. Will you be led by me?
I were a base craven were I to refuse thee,
generous
stranger. For, though I do not see thy features,
I see thy heart. Lead on! he cried, with energy.
Without a word, Estelle walked forward a few steps,
and, turning to the left into a dimly-lighted anteroom,
crossed it to an opposite door, which was partly open.
Renault, with a sign for his men to fall in and move
with silence after him, followed close to her, his hand
upon his sword, not from fear of treachery on the
part of his guide, but with the ready grasp of a man
who is prepared to use his weapon in open and hostile
encounter with a foe. At this door, which led into
the passage that conducted past her own chamber to
the private banqueting-room, she paused to listen
before
proceeding farther. Hearing no sound, she threw
it open, and, motioning them to follow, led them into
the passage, which was brightly lighted from the lamps
shining into it through her own chamber door.
Now, signors, she said, with a beating heart (for
paternal love was struggling with the duty humanity
called upon her to perform), if you will be guided by
me and obey my orders, you shall, if not too late, save
the lives of many innocent men. But first, on your
crossed blades, sacredly swear that the Count of Osma
shall not come to harm! for, if I may not save his
honour
,
I must his life. As she spoke, she drew her
own sword from beneath the folds of her cloak, and
held it aloft.
Comrades, let us take the stranger's oath, said
Renault, drawing his sword, and crossing that of
Estelle
.
Twelve more glittering weapons were laid across
these, forming a brilliant star of martial crosses, upon
which every eye was fixed.
Swear! she said, fervently.
We swear! repeated Renault.
We swear! responded the rest, in one deep and
solemn voice.
It is well, she said, folding the mantle about her;
at the extremity of this passage is a private door
Vol. I.X
leading into the banqueting-room. Follow me
silently
;
and you, signor, I trust, will do nothing save by
my orders.
Till this event be accomplished, I yield thee
obedience
,
monsieur. Pray lead the way!
With a quick but noiseless tread, they moved along
the narrow hall, and came to a low door covered with
green cloth, which, after a moment's listening pause,
she softly opened. It led into a dark and spacious
closet, the width of the passage, and one that seemed
to be the ante-chamber to the banquet-room, the door
of which was on the farther side, and was the same
through which her father had conducted her to her
own apartment.
A whisper or careless movement may be fatal to
both them and us, she said, softly, as she stood on the
threshold. Enter one by one, signors, and station
yourselves in the dark sides of this closet, ready to
obey me when the time shall come to demand your
swords' aid.
Yes, comrades, said Renault, over whose mind a
sudden suspicion of foul play crossed on finding
himself
and his men led into this dark chamber as if to
an ambush; yes, my brave comrades, be every man's
weapon in his hand, for we know not what nor whom
we have to deal with. But, if I have led you to death,
I shall die with you.
Shame on you, signor! said Estelle,
understanding
his words; look with me through this aperture,
and trust a cavalier's honour henceforward.
She placed her hand upon his wrist, and led him to
a recess behind the door; then drawing carefully aside
a curtain from a small lattice, that seemed to have been
made for the occupant within to communicate with
attendants
in the little anteroom where they stood, she
showed him the interior of the banquet-room, with
the Count of Osma seated at the head of the
sumptuous
table surrounded by the seven councillors.
Pardon me, signor, he said, pressing Estelle's
hand deprecatingly, but instantly withdrawing his grasp,
as if astonished and surprised at the softness of it; I
will be guided by thee.
Do so, and thou mayst save them. Let us be
thankful to Heaven we are not too late.
'Tis a sumptuous feast, and methinks the rulers
share it with convivial zest. Our president hath done
the Spanish noble wrong, said Renault, looking in upon
the gorgeous festive scene with admiration.
The deepest danger lies deepest hidden!
answered
Estelle.
Poison! would he poison the cup? he exclaimed,
with sudden suspicion and alarm; then are they
dying
men as they sit there! They have already drank
to the dregs the poisoned cup. There remains nothing
for us but vengeance on the assassin.
Thine oath! said Estelle, impressively.
Nay, it should scarce save him!
Then, by the twelve sacred crosses thou hast
perjured
thyself upon, I will set upon thee an armed band
that shall not leave one limb among thee joined to its
fellow, said Estelle, whom fear for her father's safety
roused. But enough! thou hast no fear of poison.
Dost thou not behold behind each chair a silent
Ethiopian
slave?
The attendants whom the courtesy of the Spaniards
has given to each guest. I see in it no more.
Dost thou see each slave has his right hand in his
bosom?
And, by Heaven! there was then, half drawn out
by one of them, the shining hilt of a dagger!
Thou seest the danger! Be not too hasty. Dost
thou not hear that courteous words fall from myfrom
the Spanish knight's lips? The time is not yet come.
Is this door open, that we may enter to the rescue?
asked Renault, burning with ardour, his soul filled with
horror and indignant surprise at what he saw.
'Tis just ajar, and a single effort will fling it wide.
Let us be patient, and, with the blessing of Heaven,
which has inspired me to this thing, we shall yet save
the Spanish noble's honour and the rulers' lives.
Methinks, fair sir, thou art equally affected towards
this wicked knight and the councillors. If thou art a
Spaniard, as thy speech and bearing would bespeak
thee, verily 'tis wonderful thou art a friend of these
rulers
;
and if thou art of the province, I marvel at thy
regard for the new governor.
He hath virtues with his crimes, signor, said
Estelle
.
No man is altogether badno one so
wholly
wicked that he hath not some redeeming quality that
invites love and confidence. How else is it that the
darkest bandit and most ferocious outlaw have ever
found woman's affection to entwine itself around their
rugged hearts?
Truly woman's love is ever a mystery! Methinks
it loves most where men hate most, answered
Renault
,
surprised at the ardour of his companion. It
may be that Heaven in mercy hath given her to us for
this very end, so that the heart, outcast and desolate,
shrinking from the scorn and contempt of men, may
not be utterly desolate and lost to humanity.
Thou sayest, perhaps, truly. Heaven hath never
suffered a human mind to live, however lost to the
world's charity, without a witness of its benevolence.
It would not have any of its creatures live among its
fellows without awakening the sympathies that are its
birthright. The divine image, however obscured, is
never extinguished, and it is given to woman alone to
revive it with the torch of affection.
Your words, signor, are worthy a cavalier, and,
heard by a maiden, might win you laurels, said
Renault
.
Doubtless thou hast been taught this pretty
sentiment by some gentler lip than thine ownthough,
by'r lady! thy lip, what I can see of it, is full gentle
for one who carrieth a sword.
Thou mayst repeat it to the lady of thy love,
signor
,
said Estelle, with a tone that seemed to ask if
the youthful chief, in whom she became more and
more interested as his ingenuous and generous nature
unfolded itself to her, possessed a ladye-love.
Signor! if thou knewest me, thou wouldst
scarcely
have dared to venture that speech! said Renault,
taking a step backward, and speaking in a gloomy and
sad tone of voice.
Good Signor Captain, pardon me! I meant no
offence
to thy feelings. But we forget our object here.
Listen now to their words! The crisis approaches!
Remember thine oath!
END OF VOL. I.Headquarters, Place d'Armes
,
12
o'clock night, Sept.
10
th
, 1767.
You are ordered to have your command under arms
half an hour before sunrise. At sunrise you will re
ceive orders to sack the town. The public buildings
and dwellings on the Place d'Armes are to be spared
.
(
Signed
)
Osma
,
Lieutenant-general of the armies of Spain,
Governor
and Captain-general of the province of
Louisiana
.Headquarters, Place d'Armes
,
1
A.M., September
10.
The order issued at midnight is countermanded
.
(
Signed
)
Osma
,
Governor and Captain-general
.